Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2644.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Highway-Railroad and Highway Bridge Capital Budget Supplemental Act for 2026-2027.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Highway Bridge Improvement Restricted Account within the Motor License Fund."Capital project." A capital project as defined in section 123456789101112131415161718192021 302 of the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, and shall include a county or municipal bridge rehabilitation, replacement or improvement project as set forth in this act."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of Transportation of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Total authorization for bridge projects.(a) Total projects.--The total authorization for the costs of the projects itemized pursuant to this act and to be financed from current revenue or by the incurring of debt shall be $4,766,821,816.(b) State projects.--The authorization for capital projects in the category of highway bridge projects and forestry and State park bridge projects to be constructed by the department or the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, or their successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt or from current revenue, itemized in this act under the category of State bridges, shall be $3,804,519,537.(c) Non-State projects.--The authorization for non-State highway bridge projects to be constructed by municipalities and to be financed in part with grants not exceeding 80% of the non-Federal share of the costs made to the local government municipalities by the department from current revenues itemized in this act under the category of local bridges shall be $962,302,279.Section 4. Itemization of bridge projects.The individual capital projects in the category of highway projects to be constructed by the department, its successors or 20260HB2644PN3625 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assigns, and to be financed from current revenue or by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial costs, in the following sections.Section 5. Adams County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1020 over Tributary of Latimore Creek, Huntington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 213, Project ID 90727Project Allocation 1,014,500(Base Project Allocation - $364,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 2009 over Plum Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 238, Project ID 80962Project Allocation 700,000(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 2027 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Conewago Creek, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 253, Project ID 99756Project Allocation 1,635,000(Base Project Allocation - $960,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) SR 3001 over Tributary of Bermudian Creek, York Springs Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 278, Project ID 87432Project Allocation 820,000(Base Project Allocation - $170,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) SR 3005 over Tributary of Marsh Creek, Freedom Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 290, Project ID 90752Project Allocation 1,970,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,320,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 3008 over Tributary of Plum Run, Freedom Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 302, Project ID 10932620260HB2644PN3625 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(7) SR 3020 over Tributary of Marsh Creek, Highland Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 339, Project ID 122680Project Allocation 455,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $130,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(8) SR 34 over Conewago Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 61, Project ID 122676Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,250,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(9) SR 34 over Tributary of Quaker Run, Butler Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 67, Project ID 122678Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) SR 4001 over Mill Race, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 352, Project ID 92564Project Allocation 1,313,000(Base Project Allocation - $663,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(11) SR 4008 over Conewago Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 366, Project ID 90782Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(12) SR 4008 over Conewago Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 367, Project ID 90782Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(13) SR 7206 over Middle Creek, Freedom Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 422, Project ID 115658Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 97 over Piney Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Germany Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 84, Project ID 90686Project Allocation 2,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(15) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 6. Allegheny County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) City of Pittsburgh, SR 2108 over CSX Railroad and Boundary Street, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2411, Project ID 119406Project Allocation 1,125,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,125,000)(2) Collier Township, SR 7102 over Chartiers Creek Flood Channel, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2113, Project ID 11747320260HB2644PN3625 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 990,000(Base Project Allocation - $990,000)(3) Penn Hills Township, SR 7113 over Union Railroad, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2178, Project ID 119371Project Allocation 823,500(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $216,000)(4) Ross Township, SR 7116 over South Branch of Pine Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2204, Project ID 103295Project Allocation 698,400(Base Project Allocation - $698,400)(5) Scott Township, SR 7117 over Pitt-Ohio Railroad and Wheeling & Lake Erie Railroad, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2218, Project ID 121649Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(6) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Monongahela River and Private Railroad, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 40785, Project ID 119367Project Allocation 4,875,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $4,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(7) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Smallman Street and Allegheny River, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2384, Project ID 118872Project Allocation 4,687,500(Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $187,500)(8) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Beechwood Boulevard and Parkway Ramp, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2431, Project ID 119404Project Allocation 2,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,400,000)(9) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over CSX Railroad and Boundary Street, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2438, Project ID 119384Project Allocation 2,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,250,000)(10) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2404, Project ID 122958Project Allocation 2,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,250,000)(11) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over SR 376 and CSX Railroad, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2388, Project ID 118910Project Allocation 1,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(12) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Negley Run Boulevard, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2426, Project ID 119403Project Allocation 1,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,950,000)(13) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Panther Hollow, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2439, Project ID 119383Project Allocation 1,875,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,875,000)(14) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Farragut Street and Jack's Run, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 2387, Project ID 117776Project Allocation 1,710,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,545,000)(Design and Contingencies - $165,000)(15) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Gomer And Greely Streets, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2427, Project ID 119364Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(16) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Railroads and Busway, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2416, Project ID 117366Project Allocation 1,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,350,000)(17) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over CSX Railroad and Gloster Street, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2409, Project ID 117367Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(18) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Sycamore Street, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2424, Project ID 119375Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $825,000)(19) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Streets Run Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 2414, Project ID 117368Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(20) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Hillside, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2430, Project ID 119376Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(21) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over North Charles Street, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2422, Project ID 117365Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(22) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Streets Run Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 2399, Project ID 117369Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(23) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Ravine, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2466, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119388Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(24) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and East Busway, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2450, Project ID 119405Project Allocation 555,000(Base Project Allocation - $555,000)(25) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over I-279 Northbound and Southbound HOV, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1060, Project ID 119378Project Allocation 450,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(26) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Woods Run Road and Lecky Way, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2448, Project ID 119385Project Allocation 375,000(Base Project Allocation - $375,000)(27) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over SR 376 and CSX Railroad, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2388, Project ID 120085Project Allocation 309,975(Base Project Allocation - $309,975)20260HB2644PN3625 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (28) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Verner Avenue, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2458, Project ID 119379Project Allocation 300,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(29) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over South Braddock Avenue, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55956, Project ID 122587Project Allocation 230,000(Base Project Allocation - $201,250)(Design and Contingencies - $28,750)(30) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over South Avenue, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55958, Project ID 122587Project Allocation 230,000(Base Project Allocation - $201,250)(Design and Contingencies - $28,750)(31) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Parkway East, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1174, Project ID 122587Project Allocation 230,000(Base Project Allocation - $201,250)(Design and Contingencies - $28,750)(32) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over I-279, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1062, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119387Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(33) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Pedestrian Walkway, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2471, Project ID 122968Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(34) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Pedestrian Walkway, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2470, Project ID 122969Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(35) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Hillside, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2460, Project ID 122971Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(36) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Rebecca Avenue, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55960, Project ID 122587Project Allocation 120,000(Base Project Allocation - $105,000)(Design and Contingencies - $15,000)(37) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Dahlem Street, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 2496, Project ID 122587Project Allocation 120,000(Base Project Allocation - $105,000)(Design and Contingencies - $15,000)(38) City of Pittsburgh, SR 7301 over Wood Street, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55959, Project ID 122587Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $91,250)(Design and Contingencies - $8,750)(39) Edgewood Borough, SR 7426 over Race Street, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 55954, Project ID 122586Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,785,000)(Design and Contingencies - $65,000)(40) Edgewood Borough, SR 7426 over Kelly Avenue, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 55953, Project ID 122586Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,785,000)(Design and Contingencies - $65,000)(41) Millvale Borough, SR 7445 over Girty's Run, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 2621, Project ID 119502Project Allocation 497,537(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $26,250)(Design and Contingencies - $171,287)(42) Millvale Borough, SR 7445 over Girty's Run, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40020, Project ID 119501Project Allocation 401,250(Base Project Allocation - $225,000)(Land Allocation - $26,250)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(43) Monroeville Borough, SR 7446 over Abers Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2630, Project ID 119961Project Allocation 450,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(44) Rankin Borough, SR 7456 over SR 837 and Monongahela River, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2666, Project ID 56960Project Allocation 4,237,500(Base Project Allocation - $4,050,000)(Design and Contingencies - $187,500)(45) Wilkinsburg Borough, SR 7478 over Penn Avenue Wilkinsburg, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 2722, Project ID 122585Project Allocation 2,870,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,870,000)(46) City of Pittsburgh, SR 885 over Monongahela River, Three Railroads and Carson Street, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1310, Project ID 118863Project Allocation 2,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,250,000)(47) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) Allegheny River Boulevard over Plum Creek, Verona Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1615, Project ID 100674Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(2) Freeport Road (West 7th Route 20260HB2644PN3625 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1001) over Bull Creek, Tarentum Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1374Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(3) Frey Road over Thompson Run, Monroeville, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1596, Project ID 63552Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(4) Rodi Road over Branch of Chalfont Run, Penn Hills Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1265, Project ID 78440Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(5) SR 1005 over SR 8, City of Pittsburgh, O'Hara Township and Aspinwall and Sharpsburg Boroughs, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 45260, Project ID 118946Project Allocation 6,180,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $6,180,000)(6) SR 1005 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Allegheny River and Allegheny Valley Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1380, Project ID 118946Project Allocation 6,180,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,180,000)(7) SR 1005 over Freeport Road, O'Hara Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1384, Project ID 118946Project Allocation 6,180,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,180,000)(8) SR 1028 over Branch of Deer Creek, West Deer Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1450, Project ID 122710Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(9) SR 2001 over Smith's Run, Forward Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1482, Project ID 113636Project Allocation 2,200,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(10) SR 2005 over Kelly Run, Forward Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1492, Project ID 113344Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,600,000)(11) SR 2038 over Monongahela River and Various Railroads, City of Clairton, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1552, Project ID 118913Project Allocation 3,914,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,914,000)(12) SR 2058 over Branch of Sandy Creek, Penn Hills Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1589, Project ID 113674Project Allocation 4,715,500(Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,015,500)(13) SR 2075 over Allegheny Valley Railroad, Plum Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1626, Project ID 102648Project Allocation 1,008,528(Base Project Allocation - $765,440)(Land Allocation - $90,000)(Design and Contingencies - $153,088)(14) SR 2085 over Monongahela River and CSX Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1640, Project ID 118912Project Allocation 8,157,600(Base Project Allocation - $8,157,600)(15) SR 2085 over Parkway East, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1642, Project ID 118912Project Allocation 2,719,200(Base Project Allocation - $2,719,200)(16) SR 2085 over SR 376 Ramp V and 2nd Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2878, Project ID 118912Project Allocation 1,359,600(Base Project Allocation - $1,359,600)(17) SR 2085 over SR 376 Ramp V and 2nd Avenue, City of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 2877, Project ID 118912Project Allocation 1,359,600(Base Project Allocation - $1,359,600)(18) SR 279 over Reedsdale Street and General Robinson Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 42749, Project ID 115119Project Allocation 6,142,500(Base Project Allocation - $5,625,000)(Design and Contingencies - $517,500)(19) SR 279 over I-279, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1943, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 3,415,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(20) SR 279 over SR 4003, SR 4009 and SR 8102, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1068, Project ID 115119Project Allocation 3,139,500(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,875,000)(Design and Contingencies - $264,500)(21) SR 279 over SR 4003, SR 4009 and Ramp J, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1069, Project ID 115119Project Allocation 2,457,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $207,000)(22) SR 279 over SR 79, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 44257, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 1,390,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(23) SR 279 over Suffolk Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1056, Project ID 115119Project Allocation 1,228,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $103,500)(24) SR 279 over SR 4014, Gass Road, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1086, Project ID 115119Project Allocation 682,500(Base Project Allocation - $625,000)(Design and Contingencies - $57,500)(25) SR 279 over Camp Horne Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1089, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 390,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(26) SR 279 over Camp Horne Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1090, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 390,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(27) SR 279 over SR 4014, Gass Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1088, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 340,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(28) SR 279 over Mount Nebo Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1095, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 290,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(29) SR 279 over Mount Nebo Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1094, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 290,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(30) SR 279 over McAleer Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1097, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 290,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(31) SR 279 over McAleer Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1098, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 290,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(32) SR 279 over Bear Run, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1093, Project ID 112483Project Allocation 215,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (33) SR 3027 over SR 376 and SR 8041 Ramp F, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1743, Project ID 119169Project Allocation 1,275,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)(34) SR 3027 over Monongahela River and CSX Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1742, Project ID 119169Project Allocation 1,275,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)(35) SR 3027 over Pedestrian Walkway, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 1741, Project ID 119169Project Allocation 1,275,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)(36) SR 3027 over Station Square Access Road, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1740, Project ID 119169Project Allocation 1,275,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)(37) SR 3038 over Port Authority Trolley 9830, Bethel Park Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1764, Project ID 116925Project Allocation 2,040,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(38) SR 3094 over Shouse Run, Crescent Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1857, Project ID 119847Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(39) SR 376 over Cliffmine Road and Montour Run, Moon Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 776, Project ID 112479Project Allocation 3,000,000(Design and Contingencies - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $3,000,000)(40) SR 376 over Whiskey Run and Bell Road, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 980, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 1,705,000(Design and Contingencies - $1,705,000)(41) SR 376 over SR 50 and Jane Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2802, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 1,430,000(Design and Contingencies - $1,430,000)(42) SR 376 over Service Road and McClaren Run, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 787, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)(Design and Contingencies - $857,143)(43) SR 376 over Service Road and McClaren Run, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 786, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)20260HB2644PN3625 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $857,143)(44) SR 376 over SR 376, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2940, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)(Design and Contingencies - $857,143)(45) SR 376 over SR 376 and Business Route 376, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2937, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)(Design and Contingencies - $857,143)(46) SR 376 over SR 376, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1891, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)(Design and Contingencies - $857,143)(47) SR 376 over SR 376, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1828, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)(Design and Contingencies - $857,143)20260HB2644PN3625 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (48) SR 376 over McClaren Run, Findlay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 780, Project ID 112480Project Allocation 1,035,714(Land Allocation - $178,571)(Design and Contingencies - $857,143)(49) SR 376 over Monongahela River and Wharf and SR 376 Westbound, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1116, Project ID 112473Project Allocation 625,000(Design and Contingencies - $625,000)(50) SR 376 over Monongahela Wharf, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2906, Project ID 112473Project Allocation 625,000(Design and Contingencies - $625,000)(51) SR 376 over West Carson Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2813, Project ID 112473Project Allocation 625,000(Design and Contingencies - $625,000)(52) SR 376 over Point State Park and Monongahela River, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1020, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 112473Project Allocation 625,000(Design and Contingencies - $625,000)(53) SR 376 over Monongahela River, Norfolk Southern Railroad, SR 837 and SR 376, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1011, Project ID 112473Project Allocation 625,000(Design and Contingencies - $625,000)(54) SR 376 over Ramps B, D, G, F and Q, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1014, Project ID 112473Project Allocation 625,000(Design and Contingencies - $625,000)(55) SR 376 over SR 376, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 524, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 550,000(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(56) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2903, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 550,000(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (57) SR 376 over Banksville Road Southbound, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 999, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 440,000(Design and Contingencies - $440,000)(58) SR 376 over SR 8010 Ramp B, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1170, Project ID 104334Project Allocation 333,334(Base Project Allocation - $333,334)(59) SR 376 over Parkway East, Edgewood Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1174, Project ID 104334Project Allocation 333,333(Base Project Allocation - $333,333)(60) SR 376 over Braddock Avenue, Edgewood Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1171, Project ID 104334Project Allocation 333,333(Base Project Allocation - $333,333)(61) SR 376 over Campbell Run Road, Carnegie Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2756, Project ID 112475Project Allocation 275,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(62) SR 376 over SR 50, Wheeling and Lake Erie Railroad and Chartiers Creek, Carnegie Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 977, Project ID 112475Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(63) SR 376 over Busway, Township Road and Pitt-Ohio Railroad, Carnegie Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 975, Project ID 112475Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(64) SR 376 over Campbells Run Road, Carnegie Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 971, Project ID 112475Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(65) SR 376 over Poplar Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 988, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(66) SR 376 over SR 376, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 933, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(67) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Carnegie Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2805, Project ID 112475Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(68) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Carnegie Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2799, Project ID 112475Project Allocation 275,000(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(69) SR 376 over Saw Mill Run, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1006, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 165,000(Design and Contingencies - $165,000)(70) SR 376 over Abandoned Railroad, 2nd Avenue and 10th Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1133, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(71) SR 376 over Ardmore Boulevard, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1182, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(72) SR 376 over 10th Street at 2nd Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2913, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(73) SR 376 over I-376 Westbound Underpass, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2912, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(74) SR 376 over Beechwood Boulevard, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2753, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(75) SR 376 over Hodge Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2749, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(76) SR 376 over Braddock Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1171, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(77) SR 376 over SR 8010 Ramp B, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1170, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(78) SR 376 over CSX Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1157, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)20260HB2644PN3625 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (79) SR 376 over Pedestrian Underpass, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1148, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(80) SR 376 over Brady Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1145, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(81) SR 376 over Brady Street and Pedestrian Trail, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1143, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(82) SR 376 over Second Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1137, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(83) SR 376 over Local Road 1039 20260HB2644PN3625 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Monongahela River, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1120, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(84) SR 376 over Bates Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1152, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(85) SR 376 over Ramp E and Brady Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2743, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(86) SR 376 over Saline Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1159, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(87) SR 376 over Branch of Saw Mill Run, City of Pittsburgh, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1004, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(88) SR 376 over Whiskey Run, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 984, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(89) SR 376 over Branch of Whiskey Run, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 985, Project ID 112474Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(90) SR 376 over Branch of Chalfont Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1195, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(91) SR 376 over SR 8012 Ramp A, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 1183, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(92) SR 376 over SR 8010 Ramp B, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1170, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(93) SR 376 over SR 2110, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1192, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(94) SR 376 over Braddock Avenue, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1171, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(95) SR 376 over Beulah Road, Churchill Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 118920260HB2644PN3625 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 50,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $50,000,000)(96) SR 376 over 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1176, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(97) SR 376 over Leak Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1210, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,648)(Design and Contingencies - $82,352)(98) SR 376 over Haymaker Road, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1212, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(99) SR 376 over Sunset Drive, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1200, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(100) SR 376 over 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1207, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(101) SR 376 over Rodi Road, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2794, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(102) SR 376 over Branch of Chalfont Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1196, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(103) SR 376 over Haymaker Road, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1216, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(104) SR 376 over Ramp A Westbound, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1197, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(105) SR 376 over Local Road 187, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1201, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(106) SR 376 over Business Route 22, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 46974, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(107) SR 376 over Chalfont Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1194, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)20260HB2644PN3625 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (108) SR 376 over Old William Penn Highway, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1208, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(109) SR 376 over SR 376, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 881, Project ID 112477Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(110) SR 376 over Parkway and Campbells Run Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2759, Project ID 112477Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(111) SR 376 over Campbells Run Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2756, Project ID 112477Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(112) SR 376 over McMichael Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 557, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 112477Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(113) SR 376 over SR 22, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 877, Project ID 112477Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(114) SR 376 over Branch of Thompson Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1203, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(115) SR 376 over Forward Avenue Ramp H, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1163, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(116) SR 376 over SR 376 Ramp V and 2nd Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2878, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(117) SR 376 over SR 376 and SR 8041 Ramp F, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1743, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(118) SR 376 over SR 376 Ramp V and 2nd Avenue, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2877, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(119) SR 376 over I-79, SR 376 and Campbells Run Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 45197, Project ID 112477Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(120) SR 376 over Local Road 763 Ramp G, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1185, Project ID 11246920260HB2644PN3625 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(121) SR 376 over Old William Penn Highway and Leak Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1206, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(122) SR 376 over Bates Street Ramp B, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1153, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(123) SR 376 over Ramp D Underpass Eastbound, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2908, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(124) SR 376 over Rodi Road, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1198, Project ID 11246820260HB2644PN3625 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(125) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2752, Project ID 112471Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $52,174)(Design and Contingencies - $47,826)(126) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1581, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(127) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Braddock Hills Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2770, Project ID 112469Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(128) SR 376 over Union Railroad and Thompson Run, Churchill Borough, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 1204, Project ID 112468Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,647)(Design and Contingencies - $82,353)(129) SR 4031, Babcock Boulevard over Branch of Breakneck Creek, Pine Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 1972, Project ID 113629Project Allocation 2,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,100,000)(130) SR 4059 over Branch of Breakneck Creek, Pine Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 2005, Project ID 113347Project Allocation 2,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,800,000)(131) SR 51 over Lebanon Church Road, Pleasant Hills Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 731, Project ID 119351Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,300,000)(132) SR 579 over Forbes Avenue and Diamond Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2739, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(133) SR 579 over 7th Avenue Ramp D, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1240, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(134) SR 579 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1241, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(135) SR 579 over I-579, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1236, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(136) SR 579 over Ramps C and K, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2891, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(137) SR 579 over Allegheny River, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1244, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(138) SR 579 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1245, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(139) SR 579 over SR 279, SR 28, Norfolk Southern Railroad and East Ohio Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1254, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(140) SR 579 over Ramp D, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2890, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)20260HB2644PN3625 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (141) SR 579 over Crosstown Boulevard, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2733, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(142) SR 579 over Ramp B Bigelow Boulevard, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2887, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(143) SR 579 over Madison Avenue and Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2932, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(144) SR 579 over Local Road 1026 Ramp M, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2740, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(145) SR 579 over Railroads and Busway, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2886, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,66720260HB2644PN3625 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(146) SR 579 over SR 28, SR 8108 and East Ohio Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1248, Project ID 112467Project Allocation 366,667(Design and Contingencies - $366,667)(147) SR 6279 over Ramp, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2032, Project ID 112460Project Allocation 500,000(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(148) SR 6279 over Four City Streets, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2030, Project ID 112460Project Allocation 500,000(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(149) SR 65 over Eckert Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 827, Project ID 115421Project Allocation 3,000,000(Design and Contingencies - $3,000,000)(150) SR 65 over Reedsdale Street, North Shore and Allegheny River, City of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 804, Project ID 121799Project Allocation 600,000(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(151) SR 65 over Jack's Run and Farragut Street, Bellevue Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 832, Project ID 118947Project Allocation 2,060,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,060,000)(152) SR 6579 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Ramps and East Ohio Street, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2044, Project ID 112459Project Allocation 500,000(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(153) SR 6579 over State Road and Railroad, City of Pittsburgh, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 2043, Project ID 112459Project Allocation 500,000(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(154) SR 79 over Pitt-Ohio Industrial Railroad and Robinson Run, Collier 20260HB2644PN3625 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 869, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 420,000(Land Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $367,500)(155) SR 79 over Pittsburgh and Ohio Central Railway, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 867, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 360,000(Land Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $315,000)(156) SR 79 over Coal Run Creek, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 852, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(157) SR 79 over Railroad and Chartiers Creek, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 858, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(158) SR 79 over Chartiers Creek 20260HB2644PN3625 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Wheeling and Lake Erie Railroad, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 44993, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(159) SR 79 over Railroad and Chartiers Creek, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 855, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(160) SR 79 over SR 50, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 857, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(161) SR 79 over SR 50, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 854, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(162) SR 79 over SR 79, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1752, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(163) SR 79 over SR 79, Bridgeville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1748, Project ID 104325Project Allocation 281,250(Land Allocation - $218,750)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(164) SR 79 over Thoms Run Road and Flood Channel, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 864, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 240,000(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $210,000)(165) SR 79 over Thoms Run Road and Flood Channel, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 863, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 220,000(Land Allocation - $27,500)(Design and Contingencies - $192,500)(166) SR 79 over SR 8009 Ramp B, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 876, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 160,000(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(167) SR 79 over SR 79, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 1984, Project ID 112454Project Allocation 140,000(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(168) SR 79 over SR 79, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 44257, Project ID 112454Project Allocation 140,000(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(169) SR 79 over SR 4051 (Mingo Road), Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 913, Project ID 112454Project Allocation 140,000(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(170) SR 79 over Mingo Road, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 914, Project ID 112454Project Allocation 140,000(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (171) SR 79 over East Branch of Big Sewickley Creek, Franklin Park Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 912, Project ID 112454Project Allocation 140,000(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(172) SR 79 over SR 376, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 881, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,000)(Land Allocation - $2,500)(Design and Contingencies - $17,500)(173) SR 79 over Campbells Run, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 872, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,000)(Land Allocation - $2,500)(Design and Contingencies - $17,500)(174) SR 79 over Campbells Run Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 879, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,000)(Land Allocation - $2,500)20260HB2644PN3625 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $17,500)(175) SR 79 over Branch of Robinson Run, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 870, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,000)(Land Allocation - $2,500)(Design and Contingencies - $17,500)(176) SR 79 over Campbells Run Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 882, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $60,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $35,000)(177) SR 79 over SR 3048, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 866, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $60,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $35,000)(178) SR 79 over Noblestown Road, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 868, Project ID 11245020260HB2644PN3625 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $40,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $52,500)(179) SR 79 over Chartiers Creek, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 860, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $87,500)(180) SR 79 over SR 79 Southbound Ramp B, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 875, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $87,500)(181) SR 79 over Chartiers Creek, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 861, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,000(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $87,500)(182) SR 79 over SR 22, Collier Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 877, Project ID 112450Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $60,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $35,000)(183) SR 88 over Small Stream, South Park Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 926, Project ID 119906Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(184) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 7. Armstrong County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 156 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Kiskiminetas 20260HB2644PN3625 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3043, Project ID 120999Project Allocation 5,047,600(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $47,600)(2) SR 156 over Long Run, Kiskiminetas Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3047, Project ID 123623Project Allocation 2,080,000(Base Project Allocation - $980,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(3) SR 66 over SR 2011, Manor Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 3424, Project ID 109622Project Allocation 482,913(Design and Contingencies - $482,913)(4) SR 66 over SR 422 and SR 2025, Manor Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 3007, Project ID 109622Project Allocation 482,912(Design and Contingencies - $482,912)(5) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various 20260HB2644PN3625 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 8. Beaver County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Ambridge Borough, SR 9102 over Ohio River and Railroads, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3894, Project ID 117987Project Allocation 5,775,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $525,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1037 over Small Stream, Rochester Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 41587, Project ID 89157Project Allocation 2,199,586(Base Project Allocation - $1,410,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $639,586)(2) SR 168 over SR 68, Industry Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3595, Project ID 122712Project Allocation 2,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(3) SR 18 over Service Road and Wallace Run, City of Beaver Falls, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3454, Project ID 113669Project Allocation 8,240,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,000,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $220,000)(4) SR 18 over Kelly's Creek, Potter Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3432, Project ID 122800Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(5) SR 18 over Branch of Service Creek, Raccoon Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3428, Project ID 122709Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(6) SR 2006 over Snake Run, New Sewickley Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3685, Project ID 119904Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(7) SR 3027 over Branch of Mill Creek, Greene Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3721, Project ID 119903Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(8) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Hopewell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3729, Project ID 112484Project Allocation 1,250,000(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Brighton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3756, Project ID 112492Project Allocation 704,000(Design and Contingencies - $704,000)(10) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound and Westbound, Brighton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3741, Project ID 112492Project Allocation 704,000(Design and Contingencies - $704,000)(11) SR 376 over Relocated Raccoon Creek, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3514, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 405,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(12) SR 376 over Relocated Raccoon Creek, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3516, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 405,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) SR 376 over Beaver Valley Expressway, Beaver Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3518, Project ID 112491Project Allocation 360,000(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(14) SR 376 over Two Mile Run, Beaver Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3524, Project ID 112491Project Allocation 360,000(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(15) SR 376 over SR 376, Beaver Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3568, Project ID 112491Project Allocation 360,000(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(16) SR 376 over SR 376, Beaver Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 44329, Project ID 112491Project Allocation 360,000(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(17) SR 376 over SR 18 (Frankfort Road), Beaver Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3520, Project ID 112491Project Allocation 360,000(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (18) SR 376 over Township Road 513, Brighton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3528, Project ID 112492Project Allocation 352,000(Design and Contingencies - $352,000)(19) SR 376 over SR 3013 and Raccoon Creek, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3512, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(20) SR 376 over SR 3013 and Raccoon Creek, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3513, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(21) SR 376 over SR 4008, Brighton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3536, Project ID 112492Project Allocation 242,000(Design and Contingencies - $242,000)(22) SR 376 over SR 4008, Brighton Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 3537, Project ID 112492Project Allocation 242,000(Design and Contingencies - $242,000)(23) SR 376 over Bunker Hill Road, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3517, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 205,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(24) SR 376 over SR 3016 (Green Garden Road), Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3509, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 205,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(25) SR 376 over SR 3016 (Green Garden Road), Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3511, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 205,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(26) SR 376 over Closed SR 3024, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3508, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 180,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(27) SR 376 over Bryson Road, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3507, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 155,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(28) SR 376 over Bunker Hill Road, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3515, Project ID 112490Project Allocation 155,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(29) SR 588 over Barris Creek, North Sewickley Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 3636, Project ID 113346Project Allocation 2,467,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,467,000)(30) SR 68 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and Access Road, Industry Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 3563, Project ID 122711Project Allocation 1,760,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(31) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 9. Bedford County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Cumberland Valley Township, SR 7205 over Growden Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4474, Project ID 123831Project Allocation 720,000(Base Project Allocation - $720,000)(2) South Woodbury Township, SR 7221 over Three Springs Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4537, Project ID 67043Project Allocation 238,500(Base Project Allocation - $204,000)(Land Allocation - $3,000)(Design and Contingencies - $31,500)(3) West Saint Clair Township, SR 7227 over Ryot Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4540, Project ID 123830Project Allocation 1,008,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,008,000)(4) West Saint Clair Township, SR 7227 over Georges Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4547, Project ID 123735Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(5) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1014 over Tributary of Dunnings Creek, Bedford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4179, Project ID 120469Project Allocation 830,000(Base Project Allocation - $680,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(2) SR 1020 over Sherman Valley Run, Broad Top Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4199, Project ID 120479Project Allocation 1,072,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $657,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $365,000)(3) SR 1020 over Tributary of Pipers Run, Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4194, Project ID 120488Project Allocation 920,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $270,000)(4) SR 1020 over Sherman Valley Run, Broad Top Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4203, Project ID 120455Project Allocation 130,000(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(5) SR 1036 over Six Mile Run, Broad Top Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4225, Project ID 120456Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $450,000)(6) SR 2015 over Black Valley Run, West Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 4260, Project ID 120472Project Allocation 1,032,000(Base Project Allocation - $632,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(7) SR 2020 over Greys Run, West Providence Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 4268, Project ID 120480Project Allocation 946,000(Base Project Allocation - $796,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(8) SR 2020 over Tributary of Shaffer Creek, West Providence Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4269, Project ID 120632Project Allocation 650,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(9) SR 26 over Piney Creek, Mann Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3928, Project ID 94346Project Allocation 1,538,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,388,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(10) SR 30 over US 220, Bedford 20260HB2644PN3625 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 3963, Project ID 120464Project Allocation 450,000(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(11) SR 3013 over Cole Trout Run, Colerain Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4316, Project ID 120401Project Allocation 1,465,000(Base Project Allocation - $875,000)(Land Allocation - $95,000)(Design and Contingencies - $495,000)(12) SR 4034 over Mud Run, King Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4391, Project ID 111996Project Allocation 863,000(Base Project Allocation - $713,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(13) SR 96 over Fleegles Run, West Saint Clair Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4058, Project ID 120476Project Allocation 852,000(Base Project Allocation - $702,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 10. Berks County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) City of Reading, Court Street Bridge over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5483Project Allocation 3,875,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $850,000)(2) City of Reading, Front Street over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5486, Project ID 10382Project Allocation 3,575,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,750,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(3) City of Reading, Museum Road over Wyomissing Creek, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 41578Project Allocation 665,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(4) Cumru Township, Poplar Neck Road over Schuylkill River, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5308Project Allocation 2,440,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,950,000)(Design and Contingencies - $490,000)(5) Robeson Township, SR 7233 over Allegheny Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5446, Project ID 10730Project Allocation 4,049,144(Base Project Allocation - $2,750,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,149,144)(6) City of Reading, Upland Avenue over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5485, Project ID 10474Project Allocation 4,425,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $900,000)(7) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1024 over Mill Creek, Maxatawny Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5008, Project ID 117724Project Allocation 450,028(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $14,000)(Design and Contingencies - $186,028)(2) SR 1026 over West Branch of Pine Creek, Pike Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5016, Project ID 94287Project Allocation 388,825(Land Allocation - $125,544)(Design and Contingencies - $263,281)(3) SR 1035 over Toad Creek, Longswamp Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5026, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 85650Project Allocation 943,253(Base Project Allocation - $777,853)(Land Allocation - $165,400)(4) SR 143 over Unnamed Tributary of Maiden Creek, Albany Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 4722, Project ID 114408Project Allocation 553,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,000)(Land Allocation - $3,000)(Design and Contingencies - $470,000)(5) SR 176 over SR 724, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4735, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,822(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,112)(6) SR 176 over Tributary of Allegheny Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4730, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,822(Base Project Allocation - $290,933)(Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)20260HB2644PN3625 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) SR 176 over SR 10, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4731, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,821(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(8) SR 176 over SR 724, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4737, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,821(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(9) SR 176 over US 422, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4740, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,821(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(10) SR 176 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48147, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,821(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)20260HB2644PN3625 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(11) SR 176 over SR 568 and Allegheny Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4729, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,821(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,778)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(12) SR 176 over SR 10, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4733, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,820(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,777)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(13) SR 176 over SR 568 and Allegheny Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4728, Project ID 112354Project Allocation 304,820(Base Project Allocation - $290,932)(Land Allocation - $7,777)(Design and Contingencies - $6,111)(14) SR 2005 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Reading, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5036, Project ID 10613Project Allocation 2,011,689(Base Project Allocation - $1,600,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $381,689)(15) SR 2032 over Swamp Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5092, Project ID 10859Project Allocation 165,650(Land Allocation - $165,650)(16) SR 2045 over Tributary of Ironstone Creek, Colebrookdale Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5112, Project ID 10751Project Allocation 462,572(Base Project Allocation - $330,000)(Land Allocation - $25,400)(Design and Contingencies - $107,172)(17) SR 4005 over Meck Creek, Bethel Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5227, Project ID 117725Project Allocation 397,517(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $20,282)20260HB2644PN3625 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $77,235)(18) SR 4021 over Irish Creek, Centerport Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 5260, Project ID 120990Project Allocation 3,277,628(Base Project Allocation - $3,074,750)(Design and Contingencies - $202,878)(19) SR 4021 over Sacony Creek, Centerport Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4954, Project ID 120990Project Allocation 3,277,627(Base Project Allocation - $3,074,750)(Design and Contingencies - $202,877)(20) SR 4028 over Tributary of Maiden Creek, Greenwich Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 41182, Project ID 117726Project Allocation 852,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $12,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(21) SR 422 over Thun Recreational Trail, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4776, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 114489Project Allocation 1,381,655(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $131,655)(22) SR 422 over Schuylkill River, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4857, Project ID 114489Project Allocation 1,381,655(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $131,655)(23) SR 422 over Brentwood Drive, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4851, Project ID 114489Project Allocation 1,381,655(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $131,655)(24) SR 422 over Schuylkill River, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4852, Project ID 114489Project Allocation 1,381,655(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $131,655)(25) SR 662 over Wyomissing 20260HB2644PN3625 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 5149, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 727,153(Base Project Allocation - $663,000)(Design and Contingencies - $64,153)(26) SR 662 over Branch of Allegheny Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4732, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 727,153(Base Project Allocation - $663,000)(Design and Contingencies - $64,153)(27) SR 662 over Tributary of Furnace Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4912, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 684,379(Base Project Allocation - $624,000)(Design and Contingencies - $60,379)(28) SR 662 over Furnace Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4911, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 598,832(Base Project Allocation - $546,000)(Design and Contingencies - $52,832)(29) SR 662 over Furnace Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 4910, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 556,058(Base Project Allocation - $507,000)(Design and Contingencies - $49,058)(30) SR 662 over Angelica Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 5165, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 427,737(Base Project Allocation - $390,000)(Design and Contingencies - $37,737)(31) SR 662 over Laurel Run, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 4792, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 256,642(Base Project Allocation - $234,000)(Design and Contingencies - $22,642)(32) SR 662 over Tributary of Laurel Creek, Cumru Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 5046, Project ID 114378Project Allocation 256,642(Base Project Allocation - $234,000)(Design and Contingencies - $22,642)(33) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 11. Blair County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Antis Township, SR 7202 over McFarland Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 46557, Project ID 123826Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(2) Antis Township, SR 7202 over Tributary of Little Juniata River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 52473, Project ID 123827Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(3) Catharine Township, SR 7204 over Roaring Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5907, Project ID 21883Project Allocation 656,000(Base Project Allocation - $640,000)(Land Allocation - $4,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,000)(4) Frankstown Township, SR 7205 over Oldtown Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5909, Project ID 10916020260HB2644PN3625 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 369,795(Base Project Allocation - $229,500)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $132,795)(5) Greenfield Township, SR 7207 over Smoky Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5930, Project ID 21825Project Allocation 661,000(Base Project Allocation - $640,000)(Land Allocation - $4,000)(Design and Contingencies - $17,000)(6) Huston Township, SR 7208 over Piney Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5937, Project ID 123734Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(7) Logan Township, SR 7210 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5941, Project ID 122377Project Allocation 12,760,000(Base Project Allocation - $12,280,000)(Design and Contingencies - $480,000)(8) Tyrone Borough, SR 7407 over Sink Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6001, Project ID 12382520260HB2644PN3625 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 680,000(Base Project Allocation - $680,000)(9) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 164 over South Dry Run, Freedom Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5615, Project ID 120406Project Allocation 672,750(Land Allocation - $82,500)(Design and Contingencies - $590,250)(2) SR 2002 over Cabbage Creek, Roaring Spring Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5722, Project ID 120420Project Allocation 1,262,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,002,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $210,000)(3) SR 2013 over Schmucker Run, Woodbury Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5736, Project ID 11199720260HB2644PN3625 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 893,000(Base Project Allocation - $633,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $210,000)(4) SR 22 over Township Road 416 (Carson Valley Road), Allegheny Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5519, Project ID 119219Project Allocation 125,000(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(5) SR 22 over Township Road 416 (Carson Valley Road), Allegheny Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5521, Project ID 119219Project Allocation 125,000(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(6) SR 3001 over Bobs Creek, Greenfield Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5755, Project ID 111991Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(7) SR 350 over Railroad and Bald Eagle Creek, Snyder Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Key 5629, Project ID 120405Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(8) SR 4008 over Glenwhite Run, Logan Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5809, Project ID 120407Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(9) SR 4013 over SR 4009, 8th Avenue and Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Altoona, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5845, Project ID 120408Project Allocation 8,581,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,431,000)(Land Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,600,000)(10) SR 4013 over Crab Run, City of Altoona, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 5848, Project ID 120419Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(11) SR 7210 over Kaercher Creek, Logan Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 5492, Project ID 123335Project Allocation 3,637,500(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $112,500)(Design and Contingencies - $525,000)(12) SR 7212 over Schell Run, Snyder Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5950, Project ID 123354Project Allocation 450,000(Base Project Allocation - $375,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $67,500)(13) SR 7215 over Clover Creek, Woodbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 5966, Project ID 123409Project Allocation 225,000(Base Project Allocation - $180,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $37,500)(14) SR 99 over SR 3013, Railroad and Juniata River, Freedom Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5569, Project ID 120397Project Allocation 2,219,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,219,000)(15) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 12. Bradford County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Sylvania Borough, Mill Street over Sugar Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 6697, Project ID 116504Project Allocation 142,500(Base Project Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $34,500)(2) Athens Township, Miller Road over Satterlee Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6570, Project ID 122372Project Allocation 103,500(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Land Allocation - $6,000)(Design and Contingencies - $22,500)(3) Athens Township, SR 7204 over Satterlee Creek, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 6569, Project ID 121548Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(4) Pike Township, Township Road 799 over Gaylord Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 6628, Project ID 116524Project Allocation 184,500(Base Project Allocation - $151,500)(Design and Contingencies - $33,000)(5) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1055 over Parks Creek, Rome Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6332, Project ID 117375Project Allocation 760,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $225,000)(2) SR 1056 over Tributary of Wappasening Creek, Windham Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 6340, Project ID 114168Project Allocation 1,119,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $69,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(3) SR 2032 over Laning Creek, Wysox Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 6390, Project ID 120936Project Allocation 850,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(4) SR 3008 over Tributary of Towanda Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6412, Project ID 117443Project Allocation 741,215(Base Project Allocation - $425,000)(Land Allocation - $61,215)(Design and Contingencies - $255,000)(5) SR 3019 over Tributary of Towanda Creek, Granville Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6427, Project ID 117446Project Allocation 450,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $325,000)(6) SR 3020 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, Towanda Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6431, Project ID 117447Project Allocation 243,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Land Allocation - $48,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(7) SR 3027 over Tributary of Alba Creek, Alba Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6442, Project ID 118051Project Allocation 1,238,785(Base Project Allocation - $723,785)(Land Allocation - $65,000)(Design and Contingencies - $450,000)(8) SR 3030 over Tributary of Alba Creek, Canton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6450, Project ID 117458Project Allocation 228,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Land Allocation - $43,000)(Design and Contingencies - $110,000)(9) SR 3034 over South Fork of Sugar Creek, Troy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6456, Project ID 11746220260HB2644PN3625 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 985,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(10) SR 4013 over West Branch of Tomjack Creek, Smithfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6473, Project ID 117477Project Allocation 320,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $210,000)(11) SR 4018 over Tributary of Wolcott Creek, Athens Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6509, Project ID 117491Project Allocation 220,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $110,000)(12) SR 4022 over SR 220, Athens Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 6520, Project ID 120686Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,832,000)(Design and Contingencies - $168,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) SR 4031 over Wolfe Creek, Columbia Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6542, Project ID 114169Project Allocation 1,330,000(Base Project Allocation - $810,000)(Land Allocation - $80,000)(Design and Contingencies - $440,000)(14) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 13. Bucks County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Doylestown Township, Burpee Road over Cooks Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 47934Project Allocation 1,660,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $260,000)(2) Doylestown Township, Iron Hill Road over Cooks Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 48010Project Allocation 2,020,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,600,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $320,000)(3) Doylestown Township, New Britain Road over Tributary of Neshaminy Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 49132Project Allocation 1,540,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $240,000)(4) Doylestown Township, Nicklaus Drive over Branch of Neshaminy Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 48015Project Allocation 3,700,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) Doylestown Township, Shady Retreat Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59042Project Allocation 2,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(6) Doylestown Township, Shady Retreat Road over Cooks Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 47935Project Allocation 2,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(7) Buckingham Township, SR 7204 over Tributary of Pidcock Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7594, Project ID 81901Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $640,000)(Land Allocation - $16,000)(Design and Contingencies - $144,000)(8) Falls Township, SR 7208 over Tributary of Queen Anne Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7607, Project ID 81906Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,280,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(9) Newtown Township, SR 7216 over Newtown Creek, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 69741, Project ID 81907Project Allocation 2,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,640,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $340,000)(10) Nockamixon Township, SR 7217 over Gallows Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7626, Project ID 81909Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $640,000)(Land Allocation - $16,000)(Design and Contingencies - $144,000)(11) Richland Township, SR 7220 over Morgan Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7638, Project ID 81913Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,280,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(12) Upper Makefield Township, SR 7224 over Houghs Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7647, Project ID 81914Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $640,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $16,000)(Design and Contingencies - $144,000)(13) Doylestown Township, Turk Road over Haileys Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7598Project Allocation 1,660,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $260,000)(14) Doylestown Township, Edison Road over Branch of Neshaminy Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7596Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(15) Northampton Township, Spencer Road over Branch of Little Neshaminy Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 69560Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(16) Northampton Township, Old Jacksonville Road over Little Neshaminy Creek, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 7522Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(17) Northampton Township, Cecelia Acres Drive over Stream, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 59108Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(18) Northampton Township, Cecelia Acres Drive over Stream, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 59109Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(19) Northampton Township, North Friesland Drive over Stream, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 59102Project Allocation 675,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(20) Northampton Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Deborah Road over Stream, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 59103Project Allocation 675,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(21) Northampton Township, Lynford Road over Stream, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 59104Project Allocation 675,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(22) Northampton Township, Willow Road over Iron Works Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 7629Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(23) Northampton Township, Elm Avenue over Iron Works Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 7509Project Allocation 1,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(24) Northampton Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Stoneyford Road over SEPTA, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 7628Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(25) Northampton Township, Wooden Bridge Road over Stream, Bridge Rehabilitation and Replacement, Bridge Key 59107Project Allocation 675,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(26) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1001 over Cooks Run, Doylestown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7096, Project ID 13257Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) SR 1003 over Branch of Gaddes Run, Plumstead Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7106, Project ID 104760Project Allocation 1,325,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(3) SR 1008 over Branch of Neshaminy Creek, Plumstead Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7120, Project ID 13214Project Allocation 1,290,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(4) SR 1009 over Branch of Tinicum Creek, Tinicum Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7125, Project ID 89900Project Allocation 1,310,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(5) SR 13 over Saint Francis Creek, Bensalem Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6762, Project ID 8166320260HB2644PN3625 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,290,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(6) SR 2025 over Branch of Mill Creek, Upper Southampton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7209, Project ID 84900Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(7) SR 2040 over Poquessing Creek, Lower Southampton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7275, Project ID 50608Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(8) SR 2079 over Pebble Creek, Doylestown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7329, Project ID 116893Project Allocation 250,000(Base Project Allocation - $240,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(9) SR 2089 over Branch of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Neshaminy Creek, Doylestown Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7337, Project ID 13478Project Allocation 1,290,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(10) SR 2103 over Branch of Aquetong Creek, Solebury Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 7351, Project ID 13215Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(11) SR 212 over Branch of Cooks Creek, Springfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6939, Project ID 96068Project Allocation 1,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(12) SR 309 over Branch of Tohickon Creek, Richland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6981, Project ID 8166020260HB2644PN3625 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,290,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(13) SR 313 over Buck Creek, Richland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6995, Project ID 81300Project Allocation 398,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $8,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(14) SR 32 over Wildcat Hollow Creek, Nockamixon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6818, Project ID 84264Project Allocation 1,485,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(15) SR 32 over Ridge Creek, Tinicum Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6809, Project ID 104695Project Allocation 1,485,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(16) SR 32 over Lodi Creek, Tinicum Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 6814, Project ID 104696Project Allocation 1,485,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(17) SR 32 over Lehigh North Coal Canal, Morrisville Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6781, Project ID 80086Project Allocation 1,335,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) SR 332 over Brock Run Creek, Haycock Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7011, Project ID 118011Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(19) SR 4011 over Branch of Neshaminy Creek, New Britain Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7376, Project ID 104777Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(20) SR 4051 over Unami Creek, Milford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7421, Project ID 120912Project Allocation 2,160,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $290,000)(21) SR 4051 over Branch of Tohickon Creek, Richland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7424, Project ID 81299Project Allocation 1,390,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(22) SR 4051 over Hazelbach Creek, Milford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7420, Project ID 81302Project Allocation 1,290,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(23) SR 4051 over Branch of Tohickon Creek, Richland Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 7426, Project ID 81303Project Allocation 1,290,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(24) SR 4053 over Beaver Creek, Quakertown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7428, Project ID 81301Project Allocation 398,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $8,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(25) SR 4059 over Branch of Tohickon Creek, Richland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7439, Project ID 81730Project Allocation 1,515,000(Base Project Allocation - $875,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(26) SR 4059 over Tohickon Creek, Richland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7437, Project ID 81730Project Allocation 1,515,000(Base Project Allocation - $875,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(27) SR 4069 over Branch of Cooks Creek, Springfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7446, Project ID 118013Project Allocation 410,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(28) SR 4085 over Mill Creek, Hilltown Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7457, Project ID 104697Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(29) SR 4089 over Branch of Pleasant Springs Creek, Hilltown Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7458, Project ID 96070Project Allocation 1,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(30) SR 413 over Lahaska Creek, Buckingham Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7035, Project ID 11629720260HB2644PN3625 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(31) SR 4202 over Cooks Run, New Britain Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 6916, Project ID 104726Project Allocation 775,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(32) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 14. Butler County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 19 over Railroad and 20260HB2644PN3625 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Connoquenessing Creek, Zelienople Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 7804, Project ID 117244Project Allocation 2,310,037(Base Project Allocation - $2,310,037)(2) SR 28 over SR 2017, Buffalo Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 7808, Project ID 117377Project Allocation 230,000(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $225,000)(3) SR 28 over SR 2017, Buffalo Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 7809, Project ID 117377Project Allocation 230,000(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $225,000)(4) SR 356 over Railroads and Connoquenessing Creek, City of Butler, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 45465, Project ID 117246Project Allocation 460,415(Base Project Allocation - $410,415)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(5) SR 7226 over Thorn Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Penn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8276, Project ID 120525Project Allocation 329,000(Base Project Allocation - $170,000)(Land Allocation - $9,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(6) SR 8 over Connoquenessing Creek, Quarry Street and Railroads, City of Butler, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 44034, Project ID 113652Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(7) SR 8 over Breakneck Creek, Adams Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48810, Project ID 117378Project Allocation 158,409(Base Project Allocation - $158,409)(8) SR 8 over Buffalo and Pittsburgh Railroad, Adams Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48069, Project ID 117378Project Allocation 158,409(Base Project Allocation - $158,409)(9) SR 8 over Bonnie Brook, Adams Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 52662, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 117378Project Allocation 158,408(Base Project Allocation - $158,408)(10) SR 8 over Railroad and Thorn Creek, Adams Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 7777, Project ID 117378Project Allocation 158,408(Base Project Allocation - $158,408)(11) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 15. Cambria County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Barr Township, SR 7203 over Moss Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8734, Project ID 22470Project Allocation 517,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(Land Allocation - $8,000)(Design and Contingencies - $29,000)(2) Elder Township, SR 7214 over Brubaker Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8749, Project ID 2245920260HB2644PN3625 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(3) Middle Taylor Township, SR 7218 over Hinckston Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8754, Project ID 69114Project Allocation 760,000(Base Project Allocation - $760,000)(4) City of Johnstown, SR 7301 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8771, Project ID 123733Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(5) Dale Borough, SR 7409 over Solomon Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8789, Project ID 123828Project Allocation 960,000(Base Project Allocation - $960,000)(6) Lilly Borough, SR 7418 over Bear Rock Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8794, Project ID 123766Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(7) Lilly Borough, SR 7418 over 20260HB2644PN3625 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Little Conemaugh River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 47628, Project ID 123767Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(8) Northern Cambria Borough, SR 7434 over Fox Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8811, Project ID 120394Project Allocation 315,277(Base Project Allocation - $206,413)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $101,364)(9) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1001 over R. J. Corman Railroad, Allegheny Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8546, Project ID 123074Project Allocation 1,340,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $490,000)(2) SR 1001 over R. J. Corman 20260HB2644PN3625 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Railroad, Cambria Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8545, Project ID 120440Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(3) SR 1025 over Burgoon Run, Clearfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8578, Project ID 120430Project Allocation 665,090(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $615,090)(4) SR 2015 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and Boro Street, Lilly Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8611, Project ID 120448Project Allocation 1,072,000(Base Project Allocation - $872,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(5) SR 219 over SR 869 and SR 3048, Adams Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8457, Project ID 123397Project Allocation 705,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $655,000)(6) SR 219 over SR 3034, Cambria 20260HB2644PN3625 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8473, Project ID 117761Project Allocation 200,000(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(7) SR 219 over SR 3034, Cambria Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8474, Project ID 117761Project Allocation 200,000(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(8) SR 219 over Rails to Trails, Cambria Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8475, Project ID 117761Project Allocation 200,000(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(9) SR 219 over Rails to Trails, Cambria Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8477, Project ID 117761Project Allocation 200,000(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(10) SR 22 over SR 8004, Cambria Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8343, Project ID 120436Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) SR 22 over SR 160, Cambria Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8344, Project ID 120437Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(12) SR 271 over US 22, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8509, Project ID 123396Project Allocation 4,185,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,135,000)(13) SR 271 over Little Conemaugh River, City of Johnstown, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8504, Project ID 120432Project Allocation 3,630,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,760,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,820,000)(14) SR 271 over Little Conemaugh River, City of Johnstown, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Key 41164, Project ID 120435Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(15) SR 3006 over Washed Run, Richland Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8622, Project ID 123400Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(16) SR 3016 over Solomon Run, City of Johnstown, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8633, Project ID 120444Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(17) SR 3027 over SR 56, Dale Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8642, Project ID 120552Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(18) SR 3041 over Laurel Run, West Taylor Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8664, Project ID 120441Project Allocation 944,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $294,000)(19) SR 3041 over Laurel Run, West Taylor Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8665, Project ID 120431Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(20) SR 4002 over Branch of Elk Creek, Blacklick Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8683, Project ID 120428Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(21) SR 4019 over Little Chest Creek, East Carroll Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8704, Project ID 120425Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(22) SR 403 over Laurel Run, West Taylor Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8525, Project ID 120434Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(23) SR 53 over Little Conemaugh River, Croyle Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8365, Project ID 120447Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(24) SR 53 over Little Conemaugh River, Summerhill Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8367, Project ID 120450Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(25) SR 53 over Little Conemaugh River, Croyle Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8369, Project ID 120457Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(26) SR 53 over Little Conemaugh River, Summerhill Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Key 8370, Project ID 120452Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(27) SR 56 over Paint Creek, Scalp Level Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8420, Project ID 120433Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(28) SR 7301 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and Plum Avenue, City of Johnstown, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8782, Project ID 123045Project Allocation 403,500(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $96,000)(29) SR 7418 over Bear Rock Run, Lilly Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8795, Project ID 123089Project Allocation 409,650(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $102,150)(30) SR 7423 over Trout Run, Portage Borough, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8802, Project ID 109199Project Allocation 960,000(Base Project Allocation - $960,000)(31) SR 865 over Abandoned Railroad, Reade Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8535, Project ID 120438Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(32) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 16. Cameron County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Lumber Township, SR 7203 over McKinnon Branch, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8955, Project ID 118629Project Allocation 528,000(Base Project Allocation - $253,000)(Design and Contingencies - $275,000)(2) Grove Township, SR 7935 over Brooks Run, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 8964, Project ID 2690Project Allocation 660,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Design and Contingencies - $10,000)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 120 over Square Timber Run, Lumber Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8852, Project ID 119849Project Allocation 1,920,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(2) SR 120 over Towner Run, Shippen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8840, Project ID 119846Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) SR 120 over Portage Creek, Emporium Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8844, Project ID 119848Project Allocation 1,540,000(Base Project Allocation - $720,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(4) SR 3001 over Driftwood Branch of Sinnemahoning Creek, Shippen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8924, Project ID 119852Project Allocation 7,320,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(5) SR 4004 over Driftwood Branch of Sinnemahoning Creek, Shippen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8944, Project ID 119853Project Allocation 4,320,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(6) SR 4004 over Clear Creek, Shippen Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 8947, Project ID 119855Project Allocation 4,220,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,400,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(7) SR 4004 over Driftwood Branch of Sinnemahoning Creek, Shippen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8946, Project ID 119854Project Allocation 3,520,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,700,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(8) SR 4004 over Driftwood Branch of Sinnemahoning Creek, Shippen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8944, Project ID 123153Project Allocation 2,520,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,700,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(9) SR 555 over Hicks Run, Gibson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 46256, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 119850Project Allocation 2,620,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(10) SR 7205 over Stream, Shippen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 59682, Project ID 122188Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(11) SR 7205 over Tributary, Shippen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 59685, Project ID 122189Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(12) SR 7205 over Waldy Run, Shippen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 59684, Project ID 122190Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) SR 872 over Lick Island Run, Grove Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8897, Project ID 119851Project Allocation 811,000(Base Project Allocation - $336,000)(Design and Contingencies - $475,000)(14) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 17. Carbon County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1003 over Lake Creek, Kidder Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9049, Project ID 123822Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $180,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(2) SR 2002 over Borger Creek, Lower Towamensing Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9061, Project ID 94314Project Allocation 320,000(Base Project Allocation - $170,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(3) SR 902 over Hummler Run, Chestnuthill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26843, Project ID 120981Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(4) SR 902 over Tributary of Mahoning Creek, Chestnuthill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9034, Project ID 120981Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(5) SR 902 over Stewart Creek, Chestnuthill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9093, Project ID 120981Project Allocation 1,200,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(6) SR 902 over Tributary of Appenzell Creek, Chestnuthill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26893, Project ID 120981Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(7) SR 902 over Poplar Creek, Chestnuthill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26755, Project ID 120981Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(8) SR 93 over Beisel Run, Packer Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 8986, Project ID 117253Project Allocation 6,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(9) SR 93 over Quakake Creek, Packer Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 8987, Project ID 9423520260HB2644PN3625 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 450,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(10) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 18. Centre County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Haines Township, SR 7935 over Pine Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9868, Project ID 3122Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2005 over Allegheny River, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 30401, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,924)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,384)(2) SR 2005 over Sinking Creek, Spring Mills Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 70582, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,924)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,384)(3) SR 2005 over Brizzie Hollow Run, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 70178, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(4) SR 2005 over Oswayo Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30216, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,693)(Design and Contingencies - $55,384)20260HB2644PN3625 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) SR 2005 over Jacks Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 70148, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,693)(Design and Contingencies - $55,384)(6) SR 2005 over Township Road 466, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19948, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,693)(Design and Contingencies - $55,384)(7) SR 2005 over Township Road 466, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19949, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(8) SR 2005 over Bald Eagle Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12165, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)20260HB2644PN3625 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(9) SR 2005 over McElhattan Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12221, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(10) SR 2005 over Kettle Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12372, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(11) SR 2005 over McElhattan Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12222, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(12) SR 2005 over Delaware Creek, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20138, Project ID 12350720260HB2644PN3625 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,922)(Land Allocation - $7,693)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(13) SR 2005 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12140, Project ID 123507Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,923)(Land Allocation - $7,692)(Design and Contingencies - $55,385)(14) SR 2011 over Penns Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9646, Project ID 120550Project Allocation 1,900,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(15) SR 26 over US 322, College Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9205, Project ID 120548Project Allocation 3,360,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,540,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(16) SR 3011 over US 322, College Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9715, Project ID 120549Project Allocation 2,210,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,390,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(17) SR 3021 over Williams Run, Huston Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9739, Project ID 119885Project Allocation 1,443,620(Base Project Allocation - $676,431)(Land Allocation - $119,406)(Design and Contingencies - $647,783)(18) SR 3028 over Buffalo Run, Patton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9757, Project ID 2757Project Allocation 875,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $18,000)(Design and Contingencies - $7,000)(19) SR 3040 over Reese Hollow, Worth Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9428, Project ID 12054720260HB2644PN3625 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,320,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(20) SR 445 over Branch of Roaring Run, Miles Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9538, Project ID 120544Project Allocation 1,520,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(21) SR 445 over Branch of Roaring Run, Miles Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9358, Project ID 115653Project Allocation 640,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(22) SR 45 over Branch of Spring Creek, Harris Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9240, Project ID 123110Project Allocation 2,120,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (23) SR 45 over US 322, College Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9205, Project ID 119880Project Allocation 333,334(Base Project Allocation - $333,334)(24) SR 45 over Branch of Penns Creek, College Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9256, Project ID 119880Project Allocation 333,333(Base Project Allocation - $333,333)(25) SR 45 over US 322, College Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9715, Project ID 119880Project Allocation 333,333(Base Project Allocation - $333,333)(26) SR 7218 over Sinking Creek, Potter Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 69312, Project ID 121493Project Allocation 489,480(Base Project Allocation - $289,480)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(27) SR 99 over SR 220 and North Bald Eagle Creek, Worth Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 43108, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 119881Project Allocation 30,320,000(Base Project Allocation - $29,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(28) SR 99 over Township Road 361 and Tributary of Spring Creek, Benner Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 41658, Project ID 119884Project Allocation 10,720,000(Base Project Allocation - $9,900,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(29) SR 99 over Nittany and Bald Eagle Railroad, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43384, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,668(Base Project Allocation - $233,334)(Design and Contingencies - $23,334)(30) SR 99 over SR 550, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 42466, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,668(Base Project Allocation - $233,334)20260HB2644PN3625 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $23,334)(31) SR 99 over Nittany and Bald Eagle Railroad, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43362, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,668(Base Project Allocation - $233,334)(Design and Contingencies - $23,334)(32) SR 99 over Sellers Lane and Waddle Creek, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43370, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,668(Base Project Allocation - $233,334)(Design and Contingencies - $23,334)(33) SR 99 over Township Road 376 and Spring Creek, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41659, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,668(Base Project Allocation - $233,334)(Design and Contingencies - $23,334)(34) SR 99 over Access Road, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43984, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)20260HB2644PN3625 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(35) SR 99 over SR 8015 Ramp E, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41655, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(36) SR 99 over Access Road, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43987, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(37) SR 99 over Nittany and Bald Eagle Railroad, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 42130, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(38) SR 99 over SR 322 Westbound, SR 3007 and Ramps, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41675, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)20260HB2644PN3625 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(39) SR 99 over Access Road, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43985, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(40) SR 99 over SR 3005, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41380, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(41) SR 99 over SR 3005, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41381, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(42) SR 99 over Rockview Road and Tributary of Spring Creek, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41162, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)20260HB2644PN3625 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (43) SR 99 over SR 3043, Benner Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41654, Project ID 122719Project Allocation 256,666(Base Project Allocation - $233,333)(Design and Contingencies - $23,333)(44) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 19. Chester County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Schuylkill Township, Anderson Farm Road over Anderson Brook, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 70143Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(2) East Coventry Township, Anderson Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 54209Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(3) East Coventry Township, Anderson Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59930Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(4) Schuylkill Township, Ashenfelter Road over Tributary of Pickering Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 60027Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(5) Tredyffrin Township, Chesterbrook Boulevard over SR 202, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 10820Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $515,000)(Design and Contingencies - $85,000)(6) Tredyffrin Township, Contention Lane over Chester Valley Trail, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10823, Project ID 14303Project Allocation 2,200,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(7) Tredyffrin Township, Contention Lane over Tributary of Trout Creek near Fish Hatchery, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 54186Project Allocation 1,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $175,000)(8) Willistown Township, Davis Road over East Branch of Crum Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10857Project Allocation 1,325,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(9) Uwchlan Township, Dowlin Forge Road over Shamona Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 10830, Project ID 103575Project Allocation 1,900,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) East Coventry Township, Ellis Woods Road over Pigeon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10775Project Allocation 937,500(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $187,500)(11) East Coventry Township, Fulmer Road over Pigeon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10773Project Allocation 937,500(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $187,500)(12) East Coventry Township, Fulmer Road South of Schoolhouse Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59928Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(13) Birmingham Township, Township Road 465 (General Lafayette Boulevard) over Wheeling and Lake Erie Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10769Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(14) Tredyffrin Township, Glenhardie Road South over Tributary of Trout Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 70880Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $520,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $70,000)(15) Willistown Township, Jaffrey Road over East Branch of Crum Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10859Project Allocation 1,325,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(16) East Coventry Township, Kulp Road over Pigeon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 54606Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(17) East Coventry Township, Linwood Circle over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59933Project Allocation 625,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(18) East Coventry Township, Linwood Circle over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59934Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(19) Tredyffrin Township, Richard Road over Main Branch of Trout Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 45772Project Allocation 2,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,725,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(20) East Coventry Township, Sanatoga Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59929Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(21) East Coventry Township, Saylor's Mill Road over Pigeon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10776Project Allocation 937,50020260HB2644PN3625 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $187,500)(22) East Coventry Township, Saylor's Mill Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59932Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(23) Schuylkill Township, Schofield Road over Anderson Brook, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 60026Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(24) East Coventry Township, South Keim Street South of Harvey Road over Pigeon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 60028Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(25) East Pikeland Township, SR 7015 over Stony Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10724, Project ID 98224Project Allocation 585,44020260HB2644PN3625 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $26,240)(Design and Contingencies - $559,200)(26) Newlin Township, SR 7015 over West Branch of Brandywine Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10670, Project ID 118552Project Allocation 563,400(Base Project Allocation - $563,400)(27) Schuylkill Township, Township Line Road over Pickering Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 59954Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(28) Willistown Township, West Central Road over Amtrak (Tracks Removed), Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10860, Project ID 14256Project Allocation 1,325,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(29) Tredyffrin Township, West Valley Road over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 10822, Project ID 14539Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $445,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,000)(30) East Coventry Township, Young Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 60031Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(31) East Coventry Township, Zieber Road over Pigeon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 54208Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(32) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1 over US 1 Bypass, East Nottingham Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10170, Project ID 113307Project Allocation 32,797,60020260HB2644PN3625 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $27,473,600)(Land Allocation - $1,804,000)(Design and Contingencies - $3,520,000)(2) SR 1 over US 1 Bypass, East Nottingham Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 10414, Project ID 113307Project Allocation 3,354,300(Base Project Allocation - $2,809,800)(Land Allocation - $184,500)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(3) SR 1 over Branch of Tweed Creek, East Nottingham Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9888, Project ID 113307Project Allocation 745,400(Base Project Allocation - $624,400)(Land Allocation - $41,000)(Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(4) SR 1 over Tweed Creek, East Nottingham Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9889, Project ID 113307Project Allocation 745,400(Base Project Allocation - $624,400)(Land Allocation - $41,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $80,000)(5) SR 10 over Branch of Pequea Creek, West Caln Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9937, Project ID 104803Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(6) SR 10 over Branch of Buck Run Creek, Highland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 9931, Project ID 104779Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(7) SR 1002 over Branch of Valley Creek, East Whiteland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10291, Project ID 104795Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(8) SR 162 over West Branch of Brandywine Creek, Newlin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10084, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 104806Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(9) SR 23 over French Creek, Schuylkill Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9945, Project ID 104809Project Allocation 1,430,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(10) SR 282 over Branch of Brandywine Creek, West Nantmeal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10181, Project ID 84286Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(11) SR 3011 over Branch of White Clay Creek, City of Coatesville, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10434, Project ID 104775Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(12) SR 3026 over East Branch of White Clay Creek, London Grove Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10466, Project ID 14168Project Allocation 345,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(13) SR 3034 over Tributary of White Clay Creek, London Britain Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10474, Project ID 104781Project Allocation 1,510,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $260,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(14) SR 3034 over Broad Run Creek, New Garden Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10477, Project ID 82006Project Allocation 370,000(Base Project Allocation - $220,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(15) SR 3038 over Tributary of Burrows Run, Kennett Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39644, Project ID 104817Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(16) SR 3040 over East Branch of Red Clay Creek, Kennett Square Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10481, Project ID 50570Project Allocation 505,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(17) SR 3051 over Branch of Brandywine Creek, West Bradford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10517, Project ID 104791Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(18) SR 3062 over West Branch of Brandywine Creek, East Fallowfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10535, Project ID 104782Project Allocation 1,285,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(19) SR 3070 over Buck Run, Sadsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10549, Project ID 81885Project Allocation 344,000(Base Project Allocation - $196,000)(Land Allocation - $8,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(20) SR 340 over West Branch of Brandywine Creek, West Brandywine Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10209, Project ID 108999Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(21) SR 4003 over Rock Run, West Caln Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10586, Project ID 98035Project Allocation 523,800(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(Land Allocation - $43,800)(22) SR 4007 over Branch of Brandywine Creek, West Caln Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10597, Project ID 10479220260HB2644PN3625 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(23) SR 4041 over Branch of Pigeon Creek, North Coventry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10633, Project ID 104789Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(24) SR 82 over Branch of Doe Run, West Marlborough Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10048, Project ID 84281Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(25) SR 82 over Branch of Doe Run, West Marlborough Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10049, Project ID 104793Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(26) SR 82 over West Branch of Brandywine Creek, City of Coatesville, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 10041, Project ID 104786Project Allocation 960,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(27) SR 841 over West Branch of White Clay Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10256, Project ID 104804Project Allocation 1,535,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(28) SR 842 over Branch of Blackhorse Run, East Bradford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10267, Project ID 14677Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(29) SR 896 over Branch of Big 20260HB2644PN3625 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Elk Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10268, Project ID 104780Project Allocation 1,275,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(30) SR 926 over West Branch of Clay Creek, East Marlborough Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10278, Project ID 104784Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(31) SR 926 over Branch of Big Elk Creek, Londonderry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10272, Project ID 104783Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(32) SR 926 over Branch of White Clay Creek, London Grove Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 10274, Project ID 10477620260HB2644PN3625 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(33) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 20. Clarion County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1006 over Engle Run, Farmington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11002, Project ID 120921Project Allocation 1,485,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(2) SR 4008 over Mahles Run, Knox 20260HB2644PN3625 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11085, Project ID 117751Project Allocation 1,475,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(3) SR 4029 over Little Paint Creek, Knox Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11093, Project ID 117749Project Allocation 1,129,822(Base Project Allocation - $724,184)(Land Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,638)(4) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 21. Clearfield County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Karthaus Township, SR 7221 over Mosquito Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11928, Project ID 118542Project Allocation 596,100(Base Project Allocation - $530,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $6,100)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1001 over West Branch of Susquehanna River, Lawrence Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 11632, Project ID 123151Project Allocation 5,820,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(2) SR 1004 over West Branch of Susquehanna River, Clearfield Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11644, Project ID 119869Project Allocation 678,380(Base Project Allocation - $678,380)(3) SR 1008 over Trout Run, Goshen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11654, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119870Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(4) SR 1011 over Mosquito Creek, Karthaus Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11669, Project ID 84093Project Allocation 755,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(5) SR 119 over Branch of Soldier Run, Sandy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11338, Project ID 3427Project Allocation 620,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $4,000)(Design and Contingencies - $16,000)(6) SR 153 over Branch of Whiteside Run, Woodward Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11343, Project ID 119857Project Allocation 1,670,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) SR 2009 over Upper Morgan Run, Bigler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11703, Project ID 119871Project Allocation 700,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(8) SR 2024 over Rails to Trails, Pike Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 11726, Project ID 121830Project Allocation 178,538(Base Project Allocation - $178,538)(9) SR 2027 over Roaring Run, Bradford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11738, Project ID 119872Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(10) SR 219 over Tributary of Wolf Run, Sandy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11430, Project ID 119866Project Allocation 1,820,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(11) SR 219 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Wolf Run, Sandy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11430, Project ID 119860Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(12) SR 3004 over West Branch of Susquehanna River, Burnside Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11781, Project ID 119876Project Allocation 2,070,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(13) SR 3009 over Whiskey Run, Bell Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 11804, Project ID 123118Project Allocation 1,190,000(Base Project Allocation - $370,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(14) SR 3017 over Branch of Beaver Run, Burnside Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11831, Project ID 119878Project Allocation 1,545,000(Base Project Allocation - $725,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(15) SR 322 over West Branch of Susquehanna River, Clearfield Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 11476, Project ID 123132Project Allocation 6,820,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(16) SR 322 over Clearfield Creek, Lawrence Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 11479, Project ID 123137Project Allocation 5,320,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(17) SR 322 over Abandoned Railroad, Sandy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 56657, Project ID 119867Project Allocation 1,670,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(18) SR 4013 over Dressler Run, Union Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 11863, Project ID 119879Project Allocation 1,670,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(19) SR 4014 over Sandy Creek, Brady Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11868, Project ID 123449Project Allocation 663,600(Base Project Allocation - $663,600)(20) SR 53 over Jopling Run, Bigler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11227, Project ID 119856Project Allocation 1,820,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(21) SR 969 over Bell Run, Greenwood Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 11603, Project ID 119868Project Allocation 4,620,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,800,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (22) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 22. Clinton County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1016 over SR 220, Avis Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12296, Project ID 119958Project Allocation 13,895,000(Base Project Allocation - $13,075,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(2) SR 120 over Tributary of West Branch of Susquehanna River, Allison Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 12100, Project ID 119926Project Allocation 350,751(Base Project Allocation - $250,751)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(3) SR 120 over Grimes Run, Allison Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12131, Project ID 119926Project Allocation 350,751(Base Project Allocation - $250,751)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(4) SR 120 over Sugar Run, Allison Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12136, Project ID 119926Project Allocation 350,751(Base Project Allocation - $250,751)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(5) SR 150 over Water Street and West Branch of Susquehanna River, City of Lock Haven, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 40565, Project ID 119929Project Allocation 38,820,000(Base Project Allocation - $38,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(6) SR 150 over Plum Run, Beech Creek Borough, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12177, Project ID 119928Project Allocation 2,342,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,862,500)(Land Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(7) SR 150 over Beech Creek, Beech Creek Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12159, Project ID 119928Project Allocation 2,342,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,862,500)(Land Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(8) SR 150 over Plum Run, Dunnstable Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12177, Project ID 119934Project Allocation 2,170,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,350,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(9) SR 150 over Pennsylvania Canal, Flemington Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12168, Project ID 123147Project Allocation 1,840,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,020,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(10) SR 2024 over Beech Creek, Beech Creek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12366, Project ID 3714Project Allocation 668,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $8,000)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(11) SR 220 over Bald Eagle Creek, Castanea Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12201, Project ID 119939Project Allocation 32,222,500(Base Project Allocation - $31,812,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(12) SR 220 over Bald Eagle Creek, Castanea Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12203, Project ID 119939Project Allocation 32,222,500(Base Project Allocation - $31,812,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) SR 220 over Private Drive, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12192, Project ID 119935Project Allocation 3,989,622(Base Project Allocation - $3,689,622)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(14) SR 220 over SR 150, Pine Creek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12233, Project ID 119955Project Allocation 3,985,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(15) SR 220 over SR 150, Pine Creek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12232, Project ID 119955Project Allocation 3,985,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(16) SR 220 over Township Road 373, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12198, Project ID 12313620260HB2644PN3625 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,170,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,760,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(17) SR 220 over Township Road 373, Bald Eagle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12196, Project ID 123136Project Allocation 2,170,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,760,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(18) SR 220 over McElhattan Creek, Wayne Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12222, Project ID 119411Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(19) SR 220 over McElhattan Creek, Wayne Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12221, Project ID 119411Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (20) SR 220 over Township Road 375, Castanea Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12214, Project ID 119953Project Allocation 995,000(Base Project Allocation - $175,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(21) SR 477 over Long Run, Lamar Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12239, Project ID 69040Project Allocation 1,803,534(Base Project Allocation - $1,013,534)(Land Allocation - $140,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(22) SR 477 over Bull Run, Greene Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12254, Project ID 3855Project Allocation 604,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(23) SR 664 over West Branch of Susquehanna River, City of Lock Haven, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 12257, Project ID 119956Project Allocation 22,820,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $22,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(24) SR 7203 over Sugar Run No. 2, Beech Creek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60437, Project ID 120553Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(25) SR 7203 over Tributary of Bald Eagle Creek, Beech Creek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60435, Project ID 120556Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(26) SR 7203 over Sugar Run No. 2, Beech Creek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60439, Project ID 120562Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(27) SR 7203 over Masden Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Beech Creek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60430, Project ID 122183Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(28) SR 7203 over Masden Run, Beech Creek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60438, Project ID 122184Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(29) SR 7204 over Harveys Run, Castanea Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60442, Project ID 120557Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(30) SR 7204 over Harveys Run, Castanea Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60441, Project ID 120559Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(31) SR 7205 over Unnamed Tributary, Chapman Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60443, Project ID 120551Project Allocation 929,145(Base Project Allocation - $109,145)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(32) SR 7205 over Skunk Run, Chapman Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 60448, Project ID 120555Project Allocation 1,570,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(33) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 23. Columbia County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2001 over Roaring Creek, Roaring Creek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12657, Project ID 117577Project Allocation 278,630(Land Allocation - $38,630)(Design and Contingencies - $240,000)(2) SR 2021 over I-80, Mifflin Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12525, Project ID 123059Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(3) SR 239 over Tributary of West Branch of West Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12548, Project ID 94321Project Allocation 2,900,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $950,000)(4) SR 254 over Fishing Creek, Benton Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 41159, Project ID 120888Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $705,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(5) SR 254 over Little Fishing Creek, Benton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12479, Project ID 120888Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $705,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(6) SR 254 over Fishing Creek, Benton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12754, Project ID 120888Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $705,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(7) SR 254 over Fishing Creek, Benton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12713, Project ID 120888Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $705,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(8) SR 254 over Fishing Creek, Benton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12639, Project ID 12088820260HB2644PN3625 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $705,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(9) SR 487 over Penns Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 31154, Project ID 120889Project Allocation 1,230,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,080,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(10) SR 487 over Fishing Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12600, Project ID 120889Project Allocation 1,230,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,080,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(11) SR 487 over Shamokin Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29007, Project ID 120889Project Allocation 820,000(Base Project Allocation - $720,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(12) SR 487 over Shamokin Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29277, Project ID 12088920260HB2644PN3625 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 512,500(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(13) SR 487 over Little Fishing Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12728, Project ID 120889Project Allocation 512,500(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(14) SR 487 over Little Shamokin Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29299, Project ID 120889Project Allocation 410,000(Base Project Allocation - $360,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(15) SR 487 over Plum Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29293, Project ID 120889Project Allocation 410,000(Base Project Allocation - $360,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(16) SR 487 over Fishing Creek, Orange Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12595, Project ID 106226Project Allocation 345,000(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $30,000)(17) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 24. Crawford County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1032 over Shirley Run, Rome Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13211, Project ID 114138Project Allocation 245,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $220,000)(2) SR 408 over Tributary of Muddy Creek, Townville Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 189 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 13124, Project ID 120842Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $180,000)(3) SR 6 over Tributary of French Creek, Venango Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12896, Project ID 117798Project Allocation 1,510,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(4) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 25. Cumberland County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Cooke Township, SR 7213 over Mountain Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 56934, Project ID 120270Project Allocation 132,923(Base Project Allocation - $91,157)(Land Allocation - $3,150)20260HB2644PN3625 - 190 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $38,616)(2) Cooke Township, SR 7213 over Mountain Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14101, Project ID 120270Project Allocation 132,923(Base Project Allocation - $91,157)(Land Allocation - $3,150)(Design and Contingencies - $38,616)(3) Cooke Township, SR 7213 over Locust Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 40691, Project ID 120270Project Allocation 132,923(Base Project Allocation - $91,157)(Land Allocation - $3,150)(Design and Contingencies - $38,616)(4) Cooke Township, SR 7213 over Brenizer Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14093, Project ID 120270Project Allocation 132,923(Base Project Allocation - $91,157)(Land Allocation - $3,150)(Design and Contingencies - $38,616)(5) Cooke Township, SR 7213 over Hogestown Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14091, Project ID 120270Project Allocation 132,92320260HB2644PN3625 - 191 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $91,157)(Land Allocation - $3,150)(Design and Contingencies - $38,616)(6) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1004 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, East Pennsboro Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13831, Project ID 100021Project Allocation 2,475,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 1005 over Conodoguinet Creek, Middlesex Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13832, Project ID 99799Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 1011 over Conodoguinet 20260HB2644PN3625 - 192 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13849, Project ID 99669Project Allocation 15,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $15,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) SR 1013 over Conodoguinet Creek, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13852, Project ID 99688Project Allocation 20,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $20,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) SR 1013 over Sears Run, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13855, Project ID 99800Project Allocation 700,000(Base Project Allocation - $50,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 1014 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, Wormleysburg Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13858, Project ID 9980120260HB2644PN3625 - 193 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 828,962(Base Project Allocation - $178,962)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(7) SR 11 over SR 1014 and SR 9104, East Pennsboro Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13584, Project ID 99674Project Allocation 6,042,500(Base Project Allocation - $5,392,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(8) SR 11 over Letort Spring Creek, Middlesex Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13564, Project ID 117479Project Allocation 200,000(Land Allocation - $200,000)(9) SR 114 over Conodoguinet Creek, Silver Spring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13721, Project ID 99685Project Allocation 50,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $50,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(10) SR 2003 over Storm Water Channel, South Middleton 20260HB2644PN3625 - 194 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13871, Project ID 99803Project Allocation 1,274,000(Base Project Allocation - $624,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(11) SR 2004 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches Creek, Upper Allen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13872, Project ID 100037Project Allocation 1,974,730(Base Project Allocation - $1,324,730)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(12) SR 2009 over I-81, Middlesex Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13685, Project ID 122515Project Allocation 128,552(Base Project Allocation - $128,552)(13) SR 2010 over US 15, Upper Allen Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13877, Project ID 99689Project Allocation 12,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $12,000,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 195 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 2014 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Lower Allen Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13882, Project ID 99690Project Allocation 6,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,700,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(15) SR 2019 over Yellow Breeches Creek, Lower Allen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 13887, Project ID 117214Project Allocation 7,986,500(Base Project Allocation - $7,336,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(16) SR 2021 over Cedar Run, Lower Allen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13888, Project ID 100025Project Allocation 1,210,000(Base Project Allocation - $560,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(17) SR 2031 over Cedar Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 196 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Lower Allen Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13898, Project ID 79535Project Allocation 2,595,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,945,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) SR 2031 over Cedar Creek, Lower Allen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 13898, Project ID 117646Project Allocation 672,100(Land Allocation - $82,100)(Design and Contingencies - $590,000)(19) SR 2035 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Lemoyne Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13901, Project ID 99691Project Allocation 6,017,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,367,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 2035 over SR 83, Lemoyne Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13900, Project ID 106403Project Allocation 850,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 197 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $725,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(21) SR 233 over Mountain Creek, Southampton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13733, Project ID 100084Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(22) SR 233 over Tributary of Doubling Gap Creek, Lower Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13742, Project ID 100073Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(23) SR 233 over Tributary of Doubling Gap Creek, Lower Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13744, Project ID 100076Project Allocation 1,380,000(Base Project Allocation - $730,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 233 over Tributary of Doubling Gap Creek, Lower 20260HB2644PN3625 - 198 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13746, Project ID 100015Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(25) SR 3001 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Shippensburg Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13906, Project ID 99692Project Allocation 1,065,716(Base Project Allocation - $415,716)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(26) SR 3006 over Spruce Run, Dickinson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 13927, Project ID 99841Project Allocation 2,660,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(27) SR 3006 over Beetem Hollow Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13921, Project ID 90633Project Allocation 750,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 199 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(28) SR 3013 over Yellow Breeches Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13941, Project ID 106395Project Allocation 825,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $225,000)(29) SR 4006 over Conodoguinet Creek, North Newton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 13955, Project ID 99695Project Allocation 5,205,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,480,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(30) SR 4006 over Brandy Run, Upper Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13954, Project ID 101270Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(31) SR 4008 over Rock Run, Upper Frankford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13964, Project ID 101274Project Allocation 1,400,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 200 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(32) SR 4011 over Brandy Run, Upper Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13965, Project ID 100013Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(33) SR 4021 over Conodoguinet Creek, West Pennsboro Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 42259, Project ID 99699Project Allocation 1,738,515(Base Project Allocation - $1,088,515)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(34) SR 4025 over Conodoguinet Creek, Lower Frankford Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13970, Project ID 99702Project Allocation 1,110,000(Base Project Allocation - $460,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 201 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (35) SR 533 over Culvert, North Newton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13747, Project ID 99667Project Allocation 15,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $15,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(36) SR 581 over SR 1010 (Carlisle Pike), Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13756, Project ID 99769Project Allocation 23,022,500(Base Project Allocation - $22,372,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 581 over SR 641 (Trindle Road), Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13760, Project ID 80968Project Allocation 15,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $15,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(38) SR 581 over Locust Lane, Hampden Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 202 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 13749, Project ID 99725Project Allocation 10,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $10,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 581 over Locust Lane, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13751, Project ID 99748Project Allocation 8,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 581 over Township Road 2029 (Saint Johns Church Road), Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13759, Project ID 99780Project Allocation 8,586,500(Base Project Allocation - $7,936,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(41) SR 581 over SR 1013 (Sporting Hill Road), Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13757, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 203 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 99772Project Allocation 8,484,500(Base Project Allocation - $7,834,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(42) SR 581 over Conodoguinet Creek, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13753, Project ID 99760Project Allocation 3,700,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,050,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(43) SR 581 over SR 8048 Ramp, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13755, Project ID 99764Project Allocation 3,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(44) SR 641 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13771, Project ID 100034Project Allocation 2,475,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 204 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(45) SR 641 over Peebles Run, Hopewell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13769, Project ID 99787Project Allocation 2,075,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,400,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(46) SR 641 over Mill Race, North Newton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 67828, Project ID 87425Project Allocation 1,189,761(Base Project Allocation - $835,261)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $334,500)(47) SR 641 over Mill Race, North Newton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13774, Project ID 87425Project Allocation 1,189,761(Base Project Allocation - $835,261)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $334,500)(48) SR 696 over Newburg Run, Dickinson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13789, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 205 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 100041Project Allocation 5,282,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,632,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(49) SR 696 over Conodoguinet Creek, Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13788, Project ID 99791Project Allocation 3,900,404(Base Project Allocation - $3,250,404)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(50) SR 696 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13787, Project ID 100071Project Allocation 1,484,000(Base Project Allocation - $834,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(51) SR 74 over Conodoguinet Creek, North Middleton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13630, Project ID 99663Project Allocation 15,650,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 206 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $15,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(52) SR 74 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, North Middleton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13631, Project ID 99723Project Allocation 3,294,500(Base Project Allocation - $2,644,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(53) SR 74 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches Creek, Monroe Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13628, Project ID 100097Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(54) SR 81 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13648, Project ID 116479Project Allocation 2,068,396(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 207 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,394,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $654,396)(55) SR 81 over SR 3015 (Mount Rock Road), Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13654, Project ID 120139Project Allocation 1,412,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(56) SR 81 over SR 233, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13649, Project ID 120139Project Allocation 1,412,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(57) SR 81 over SR 233, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13650, Project ID 120139Project Allocation 1,412,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 208 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (58) SR 81 over SR 3015 (Mount Rock Road), Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13653, Project ID 120139Project Allocation 1,412,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(59) SR 81 over Township Road 545 (Stone House Road), Dickinson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 13656, Project ID 116481Project Allocation 508,658(Design and Contingencies - $508,658)(60) SR 81 over Township Road 545 (Stone House Road), Dickinson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 13655, Project ID 116481Project Allocation 508,657(Design and Contingencies - $508,657)(61) SR 81 over Walnut Bottom Road, Carlisle Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13669, Project ID 112293Project Allocation 325,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 209 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (62) SR 81 over Walnut Bottom Road, Carlisle Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13668, Project ID 112293Project Allocation 325,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(63) SR 944 over Bloser Creek, Upper Frankford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13792, Project ID 87419Project Allocation 1,787,909(Base Project Allocation - $1,137,909)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(64) SR 944 over Branch of Simmons Run, Silver Spring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13806, Project ID 100035Project Allocation 1,770,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(65) SR 944 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, East Pennsboro Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13813, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 210 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 100106Project Allocation 1,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(66) SR 944 over Pine Run, Hampden Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13811, Project ID 100103Project Allocation 1,670,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,020,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(67) SR 944 over Tributary of Opossum Creek, Lower Frankford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13798, Project ID 100087Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(68) SR 944 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, Middlesex Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13800, Project ID 100018Project Allocation 1,175,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 211 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $525,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(69) SR 944 over Holtz Run, East Pennsboro Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13812, Project ID 100048Project Allocation 1,154,000(Base Project Allocation - $504,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(70) SR 944 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, Hampden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13808, Project ID 100044Project Allocation 850,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(71) SR 997 over Whiskey Run, Upper Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13821, Project ID 90346Project Allocation 2,336,791(Base Project Allocation - $1,299,591)(Land Allocation - $86,200)(Design and Contingencies - $951,000)(72) SR 997 over Three Square 20260HB2644PN3625 - 212 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Hollow Run, Upper Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13817, Project ID 100093Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(73) SR 997 over Three Square Hollow Run, Upper Mifflin Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 13816, Project ID 90734Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(74) SR 997 over Branch of Brandy Run, Upper Mifflin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 13820, Project ID 100049Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(75) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 213 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 26. Dauphin County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Susquehanna Township, SR 7101 over Paxton Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14631, Project ID 120307Project Allocation 355,914(Base Project Allocation - $251,664)(Land Allocation - $3,750)(Design and Contingencies - $100,500)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1002 over Bear Creek, Wiconisco Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14419, Project ID 100060Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 1003 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 214 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Armstrong Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14421, Project ID 100063Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 1005 over Wiconisco Creek, Williams Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14424, Project ID 100068Project Allocation 1,046,287(Base Project Allocation - $396,287)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) SR 1013 over Pine Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14431, Project ID 99913Project Allocation 1,946,393(Base Project Allocation - $1,296,393)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) SR 1016 over Tributary of Deep Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14437, Project ID 10024120260HB2644PN3625 - 215 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 732,741(Base Project Allocation - $82,741)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 1017 over Tributary of Pine Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14438, Project ID 100074Project Allocation 1,464,061(Base Project Allocation - $927,493)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $486,568)(7) SR 1020 over Tributary of Deep Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14443, Project ID 99876Project Allocation 1,790,740(Base Project Allocation - $1,140,740)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(8) SR 1021 over Tributary of Wiconisco Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14445, Project ID 100253Project Allocation 738,436(Base Project Allocation - $88,436)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 216 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) SR 1023 over Tributary of Armstrong Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14447, Project ID 100258Project Allocation 740,278(Base Project Allocation - $90,278)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(10) SR 11 over Juniata River and Norfolk Southern Railroad, Reed Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14142, Project ID 99848Project Allocation 5,225,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $725,000)(11) SR 147 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Reed Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14293, Project ID 99865Project Allocation 14,352,500(Base Project Allocation - $13,702,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(12) SR 147 over Powells Creek, Reed Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 217 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 14291, Project ID 90771Project Allocation 5,850,472(Base Project Allocation - $5,225,472)(Land Allocation - $175,000)(Design and Contingencies - $450,000)(13) SR 147 over Abandoned Mill Race, Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14298, Project ID 99887Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 2001 over Tributary of Conewago Creek, Londonderry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14449, Project ID 117216Project Allocation 1,988,690(Base Project Allocation - $1,195,690)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $668,000)(15) SR 2003 over SR 322, Derry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14457, Project ID 99915Project Allocation 14,150,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 218 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $13,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(16) SR 2003 over Swatara Creek, South Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14459, Project ID 103008Project Allocation 10,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $10,000,000)(17) SR 2003 over SR 283 and SR 300, Londonderry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14456, Project ID 80973Project Allocation 850,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) SR 2005 over Iron Mine Run, Londonderry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14462, Project ID 90781Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(19) SR 2007 over SR 300, Londonderry Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 219 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 14471, Project ID 99925Project Allocation 2,565,592(Base Project Allocation - $1,915,592)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 2007 over Brills Run, Conewago Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14472, Project ID 117705Project Allocation 700,000(Base Project Allocation - $50,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(21) SR 2010 over Kellock Run, South Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14474, Project ID 100090Project Allocation 832,290(Base Project Allocation - $182,290)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(22) SR 2011 over Spring Creek, Derry Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14480, Project ID 100095Project Allocation 2,175,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 220 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(23) SR 2011 over Tributary of Spring Creek, Derry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14476, Project ID 100208Project Allocation 1,260,095(Base Project Allocation - $610,095)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 2013 over Hoffers Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14482, Project ID 100098Project Allocation 2,238,445(Base Project Allocation - $1,588,445)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(25) SR 2015 over Swatara Creek, South Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14483, Project ID 80971Project Allocation 3,276,063(Base Project Allocation - $2,626,063)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(26) SR 2015 over Tributary of Manada Creek, East Hanover 20260HB2644PN3625 - 221 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14486, Project ID 90783Project Allocation 3,015,356(Base Project Allocation - $1,715,356)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,200,000)(27) SR 2019 over Beaver Creek, South Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14494, Project ID 117189Project Allocation 2,529,166(Base Project Allocation - $2,499,166)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(28) SR 2019 over Tributary of Beaver Creek, Lower Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14497, Project ID 100105Project Allocation 1,821,877(Base Project Allocation - $1,171,877)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(29) SR 2019 over Beaver Creek, South Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14493, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 222 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 99934Project Allocation 1,785,765(Base Project Allocation - $1,135,765)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(30) SR 2023 over SR 283 and SR 300, Londonderry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14500, Project ID 99939Project Allocation 2,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(31) SR 2026 over Tributary of Beaver Creek, West Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14501, Project ID 19075Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(32) SR 2033 over I-81, West Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14244, Project ID 99917Project Allocation 2,039,210(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 223 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,389,210)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(33) SR 2040 over SR 3032, Lower Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14563, Project ID 99920Project Allocation 2,318,418(Base Project Allocation - $1,668,418)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(34) SR 2042 over SR 3032, Lower Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14566, Project ID 99945Project Allocation 2,499,733(Base Project Allocation - $1,849,733)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(35) SR 2043 over SR 283 and SR 300, Londonderry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14359, Project ID 99844Project Allocation 17,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $17,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 224 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (36) SR 209 over Wiconisco Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14309, Project ID 99868Project Allocation 7,211,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,561,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 209 over Tributary of Wiconisco Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14307, Project ID 90341Project Allocation 2,721,810(Base Project Allocation - $1,948,800)(Land Allocation - $98,800)(Design and Contingencies - $674,210)(38) SR 209 over Tributary of Wiconisco Creek, Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14305, Project ID 100234Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 209 over Keefers Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 225 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14304, Project ID 99882Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 22 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Susquehanna Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14164, Project ID 99861Project Allocation 36,698,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,048,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(41) SR 22 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Susquehanna Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14165, Project ID 99863Project Allocation 36,698,000(Base Project Allocation - $36,048,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(42) SR 22 over Township Road 509, Susquehanna Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 226 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14167, Project ID 99858Project Allocation 6,105,500(Base Project Allocation - $5,455,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(43) SR 22 over Clarks Run, Middle Paxton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14157, Project ID 99852Project Allocation 5,100,500(Base Project Allocation - $4,450,500)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(44) SR 22 over Tributary of Manada Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14186, Project ID 99988Project Allocation 4,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(45) SR 22 over Bow Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14187, Project ID 9999720260HB2644PN3625 - 227 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 4,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(46) SR 225 over Wiconisco Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14320, Project ID 99875Project Allocation 6,509,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,859,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(47) SR 225 over Tributary of Armstrong Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14318, Project ID 100268Project Allocation 1,925,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(48) SR 225 over Armstrong Creek, Halifax Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14317, Project ID 100036Project Allocation 1,024,662(Base Project Allocation - $374,662)20260HB2644PN3625 - 228 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(49) SR 225 over Tributary of Armstrong Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14319, Project ID 93583Project Allocation 701,000(Base Project Allocation - $51,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(50) SR 230 over Bird Run, Highspire Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14329, Project ID 100053Project Allocation 4,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(51) SR 230 over Buser Run, Highspire Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14328, Project ID 100050Project Allocation 4,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(52) SR 230 over Mill Race, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 229 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Middletown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14332, Project ID 99891Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(53) SR 230 over Storm Channel, Lower Swatara Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14331, Project ID 100247Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(54) SR 230 over Lynch Run, Londonderry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14336, Project ID 99888Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(55) SR 25 over Tributary of Pine Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14193, Project ID 10000820260HB2644PN3625 - 230 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(56) SR 25 over Tributary of Pine Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14194, Project ID 100024Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(57) SR 25 over Little Wiconisco Creek, Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14191, Project ID 100001Project Allocation 2,475,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(58) SR 300 over Conewago Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14364, Project ID 99880Project Allocation 12,430,000(Base Project Allocation - $11,780,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 231 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(59) SR 300 over Conewago Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14366, Project ID 99884Project Allocation 12,398,000(Base Project Allocation - $11,748,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(60) SR 300 over SR 341, Londonderry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14357, Project ID 99886Project Allocation 9,560,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,910,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(61) SR 300 over Township Road 564, Conewago Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14362, Project ID 90778Project Allocation 6,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(62) SR 300 over Township Road 20260HB2644PN3625 - 232 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 602, Conewago Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14365, Project ID 100056Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(63) SR 300 over SR 341 (Colebrook Road), Londonderry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14358, Project ID 99889Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(64) SR 3007 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14514, Project ID 90837Project Allocation 4,658,074(Base Project Allocation - $3,358,074)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,200,000)(65) SR 3009 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 233 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Harrisburg, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14516, Project ID 74520Project Allocation 9,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,800,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(66) SR 3009 over Fishing Creek, Middle Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14525, Project ID 100108Project Allocation 4,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(67) SR 3009 over Overflow Wildwood Lake, Susquehanna Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14523, Project ID 100263Project Allocation 3,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(68) SR 3009 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, Susquehanna Township, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 234 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 14522, Project ID 99879Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(69) SR 3009 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14516, Project ID 117698Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(70) SR 3010 over Spring Creek, Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14526, Project ID 100109Project Allocation 848,714(Base Project Allocation - $198,714)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(71) SR 3011 over SR 83, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14262, Project ID 104642Project Allocation 3,254,229(Base Project Allocation - $2,843,008)(Design and Contingencies - $411,221)20260HB2644PN3625 - 235 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (72) SR 3013 over SR 83, Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14536, Project ID 99968Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(73) SR 3016 over US 11/15 and Susquehanna River, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14543, Project ID 117708Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(74) SR 3024 over Tributary of Beaver Creek, Lower Paxton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14560, Project ID 100117Project Allocation 2,675,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(75) SR 3026 over SR 83, Lower Paxton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14561, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 236 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 99975Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(76) SR 3034 over East Channel of Susquehanna River, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 40215, Project ID 117196Project Allocation 5,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(77) SR 322 over SR 3030 and Abandoned Railroad, Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14369, Project ID 99890Project Allocation 14,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $14,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(78) SR 322 over SR 3030 and Abandoned Railroad, Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14370, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 237 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 99892Project Allocation 14,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $14,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(79) SR 325 over Clarks Creek, Middle Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14377, Project ID 74523Project Allocation 2,660,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(80) SR 341 over Hoffer Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14382, Project ID 100272Project Allocation 1,449,000(Base Project Allocation - $799,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(81) SR 4002 over Pine Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14576, Project ID 19110Project Allocation 4,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,750,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 238 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(82) SR 4002 over Tributary of Deep Creek, Lykens Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14575, Project ID 100119Project Allocation 979,469(Base Project Allocation - $329,469)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(83) SR 4002 over Shippens Run, Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14572, Project ID 90844Project Allocation 711,468(Base Project Allocation - $61,468)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(84) SR 4004 over Tributary of Armstrong Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14581, Project ID 78741Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(85) SR 4004 over Conley's Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 239 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14582, Project ID 117469Project Allocation 1,316,961(Base Project Allocation - $781,558)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $485,403)(86) SR 4004 over Conley's Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14582, Project ID 100121Project Allocation 1,079,121(Base Project Allocation - $429,121)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(87) SR 4010 over Little Wiconisco Creek, Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14591, Project ID 100123Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(88) SR 4010 over Tributary of Wiconisco Creek, Upper Paxton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14592, Project ID 100233Project Allocation 743,98320260HB2644PN3625 - 240 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $93,983)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(89) SR 4013 over Rattling Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14601, Project ID 74522Project Allocation 3,660,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(90) SR 4013 over North Fork of Powells Creek, Jefferson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14597, Project ID 100115Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(91) SR 4013 over Tributary of Powells Creek, Wayne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14594, Project ID 100129Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 241 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(92) SR 4013 over Tributary of Powells Creek, Jefferson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14595, Project ID 100221Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(93) SR 422 over US 322, Derry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14384, Project ID 99895Project Allocation 18,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $18,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(94) SR 441 over SR 8020 Ramp A, Lower Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14391, Project ID 99900Project Allocation 16,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $16,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(95) SR 443 over Norfolk Southern 20260HB2644PN3625 - 242 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Railroad, Middle Paxton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14397, Project ID 80978Project Allocation 4,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(96) SR 7301 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14746, Project ID 117665Project Allocation 1,207,500(Base Project Allocation - $975,000)(Design and Contingencies - $232,500)(97) SR 7301 over Paxton Creek, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14734, Project ID 117667Project Allocation 712,500(Base Project Allocation - $577,500)(Design and Contingencies - $135,000)(98) SR 743 over Tributary of Spring Creek, Derry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14413, Project ID 100059Project Allocation 4,650,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 243 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(99) SR 743 over Tributary of Conewago Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14409, Project ID 90328Project Allocation 1,052,300(Base Project Allocation - $439,300)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $588,000)(100) SR 8037 over US 11/15, Reed Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 14782, Project ID 99984Project Allocation 1,946,393(Base Project Allocation - $1,296,393)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(101) SR 81 over SR 3009, Susquehanna River and Norfolk Southern Railroad, Susquehanna Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14214, Project ID 112294Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 244 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (102) SR 83 over SR 322 and SR 3001, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14273, Project ID 91043Project Allocation 287,500(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,500)(103) SR 83 over Susquehanna River and Lowther Street, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14257, Project ID 91043Project Allocation 287,500(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,500)(104) SR 83 over SR 230, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14258, Project ID 91043Project Allocation 287,500(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,500)(105) SR 83 over SR 83, City of Harrisburg, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14262, Project ID 91043Project Allocation 287,500(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,500)(106) SR 9410 over SR 83, Swatara 20260HB2644PN3625 - 245 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 14528, Project ID 99962Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(107) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 27. Delaware County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Yeadon Borough, Chester Avenue over Blunston Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 54894Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(2) Swarthmore Borough, College Avenue over Little Crum Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 61061Project Allocation 408,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 246 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $340,000)(Design and Contingencies - $68,000)(3) Springfield, Paper Mill Road over Whiskey Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 15434, Project ID 104194Project Allocation 760,000(Base Project Allocation - $620,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(4) Haverford Township, SR 7103 over Naylors Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 15421, Project ID 81919Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(5) Haverford Township, SR 7103 over Cobbs Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 15419, Project ID 81921Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(6) City of Chester, SR 7301 over Chester Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 54893, Project ID 82050Project Allocation 500,000(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(7) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 247 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) Kerlin Street over Chester Creek, Upland Borough and Chester City, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15293Project Allocation 16,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $14,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,750,000)(2) SR 1019 over Ithan Creek, Radnor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15173, Project ID 104865Project Allocation 200,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(3) SR 2006 over Stony Creek, Ridley Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15229, Project ID 84270Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(4) SR 2006 over Muckinipattis Creek, Glenolden Borough, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 248 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15232, Project ID 84276Project Allocation 1,270,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $70,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(5) SR 2010 over Darby Creek, Yeadon Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 15241, Project ID 114878Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(6) SR 2012, Plush Mill Road/Wallingford Road over Crum Creek, Nether Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15246, Project ID 57779Project Allocation 5,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,600,000)(7) SR 202 over South Branch of Beaver Creek, Concord Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 249 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 14944, Project ID 89903Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(8) SR 2027 over Whiskey Run, Concord Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15285, Project ID 81289Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(9) SR 2041 over SEPTA Route 100, Upper Darby Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15271, Project ID 84269Project Allocation 2,240,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,240,000)(10) SR 252 (Providence Road) over SEPTA Railroad, Nether Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 14948, Project ID 15303Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(11) SR 3009 over CSX Railroad, Upper Chichester Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 250 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15304, Project ID 82019Project Allocation 1,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(12) SR 3019 (Manchester Avenue) over SEPTA Railroad, Nether Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15320, Project ID 15226Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(13) SR 3030 over Clarks Run, Middletown Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15333, Project ID 104827Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(14) SR 4003 over Branch of Ridley Creek, Upper Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15345, Project ID 118006Project Allocation 392,000(Base Project Allocation - $320,000)(Land Allocation - $72,000)(15) SR 420 over Branch of Stony Creek, Ridley Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 251 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 15003, Project ID 120910Project Allocation 2,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,850,000)(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(16) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 28. Elk County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Jones Township, Horner Road over Clarion River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15752, Project ID 86056Project Allocation 1,316,139(Base Project Allocation - $1,184,539)(Design and Contingencies - $131,600)(2) Jay Township, SR 7206 over Bennett Branch of Sinnemahoning Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15748, Project ID 118543Project Allocation 1,104,20020260HB2644PN3625 - 252 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,104,200)(3) Horton Township, Township Road 331 (Boggy Run Road) over Little Toby Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15740, Project ID 3982Project Allocation 1,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(4) Horton Township, Township Road 521 (Parolari Road) over Little Toby Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15744, Project ID 3983Project Allocation 1,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(5) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1003 over Elk Creek, City of Saint Marys, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15652, Project ID 11990520260HB2644PN3625 - 253 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,270,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,450,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(2) SR 1004 over Crooked Creek, Jones Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15660, Project ID 3998Project Allocation 624,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $4,000)(Design and Contingencies - $20,000)(3) SR 120 over Elk Creek, Ridgway Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15521, Project ID 119887Project Allocation 2,015,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,195,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(4) SR 120 over Elk Creek, City of Saint Marys, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15530, Project ID 119888Project Allocation 1,795,000(Base Project Allocation - $975,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 254 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) SR 2001 over Toby Creek, Horton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15674, Project ID 119907Project Allocation 3,945,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,125,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(6) SR 2003 over Brandy Camp Creek, Horton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15675, Project ID 119909Project Allocation 1,920,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(7) SR 2011 over Fork of Little Elk Creek, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 8941, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(8) SR 2011 over Phoenix Run, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30299, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 255 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) SR 2011 over Open Brook, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25473, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(10) SR 2011 over Brandy Creek, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 15697, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(11) SR 2011 over Fishing Creek, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 12327, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(12) SR 2011 over Woods Run, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 11780, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(13) SR 2011 over Branch of Little Marsh Creek, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 9578, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 256 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(14) SR 2011 over Tributary of Juniata River, Annin Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26409, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(15) SR 2011 over West Branch of Pine Creek, Annin Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30345, Project ID 106755Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(16) SR 219 over Karnes Run, Horton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15543, Project ID 119898Project Allocation 1,770,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(17) SR 219 over Meffert Creek, Jones Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15568, Project ID 119899Project Allocation 1,670,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(18) SR 219 over Johnson Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 257 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Horton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15538, Project ID 119897Project Allocation 1,645,000(Base Project Allocation - $825,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(19) SR 219 over Oil Creek, Jones Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15569, Project ID 119900Project Allocation 1,520,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(20) SR 2219 over Buffalo and Pittsburgh Railroad, Ridgway Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15731, Project ID 119910Project Allocation 4,620,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,800,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(21) SR 321 over High Pressure Gas Lines, Jones Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15592, Project ID 119901Project Allocation 2,720,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 258 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,900,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(22) SR 66 over South Branch of Tionesta Creek, Highland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15517, Project ID 119886Project Allocation 1,545,000(Base Project Allocation - $725,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(23) SR 948 over Clarion River, Ridgway Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 15620, Project ID 123124Project Allocation 5,320,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(24) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 29. Erie County.20260HB2644PN3625 - 259 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1006 over Twelvemile Creek, North East Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16209, Project ID 123437Project Allocation 270,000(Base Project Allocation - $270,000)(2) SR 1101 over SR 90, Harborcreek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 16082, Project ID 1279Project Allocation 250,000(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(3) SR 20 over Twentymile Creek, North East Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15936, Project ID 613Project Allocation 3,084,083(Base Project Allocation - $2,134,083)(Design and Contingencies - $950,000)(4) SR 20 over Fourmile Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 260 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Harborcreek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 16166, Project ID 88473Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(5) SR 20 over Walnut Creek, Harborcreek Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 16129, Project ID 88473Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(6) SR 20 over Sixteen Mile Creek, Harborcreek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 15930, Project ID 88473Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(7) SR 20 over Tributary of French Creek, Harborcreek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 15885, Project ID 88473Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(8) SR 2003 over Branch of French Creek, Mill Village Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16228, Project ID 1133Project Allocation 305,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 261 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $280,000)(9) SR 3006 over Darrows Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16303, Project ID 120694Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(10) SR 4011 over Branch of Elk Creek, McKean Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16368, Project ID 1003Project Allocation 225,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(11) SR 5 over Cascade Creek, City of Erie, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15806, Project ID 120696Project Allocation 2,095,975(Base Project Allocation - $1,295,975)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(12) SR 6 over Baskins Run, Wayne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 15839, Project ID 72424Project Allocation 2,615,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 262 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(13) SR 6 over South Branch of French Creek, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 15833, Project ID 123175Project Allocation 1,135,000(Base Project Allocation - $875,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $225,000)(14) SR 832 over SR 90, McKean Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16186, Project ID 116740Project Allocation 1,885,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,560,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(15) SR 90 over Tributary of Turkey Creek, Springfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16013, Project ID 74577Project Allocation 3,069,600(Base Project Allocation - $2,469,600)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 263 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) SR 90 over Rohl Road, Greenfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16089, Project ID 58205Project Allocation 375,000(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(17) SR 90 over Rohl Road, Greenfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16092, Project ID 58205Project Allocation 375,000(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(18) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 30. Fayette County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Luzerne Township, SR 7216 over Redstone Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17120, Project ID 120992Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(2) Redstone Township, SR 7216 over Dunlap Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17116, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 264 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 120994Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1009 over Little Champion Creek, Saltlick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16732, Project ID 119703Project Allocation 350,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(2) SR 1058 over Champion Creek, Saltlick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16838, Project ID 79322Project Allocation 650,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $450,000)(3) SR 1058 over Unnamed Tributary of Indian Creek, Saltlick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 70943, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 265 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 122624Project Allocation 400,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(4) SR 21 over Youghiogheny River Dam, Henry Clay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 43180, Project ID 116772Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(5) SR 21 over Cheat River, Henry Clay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40339, Project ID 116772Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(6) SR 21 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Monongahela River and Local Road, Henry Clay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48298, Project ID 116772Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(7) SR 3009 over SR 40, South Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16903, Project ID 120969Project Allocation 4,000,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 266 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $4,000,000)(8) SR 3009 over North Branch of Browns Run, Georges Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16901, Project ID 121014Project Allocation 3,295,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $995,000)(9) SR 3013 over Branch of Wallace Run, Luzerne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16933, Project ID 120619Project Allocation 200,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(10) SR 381 over Branch of Meadow Run, Wharton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16675, Project ID 122502Project Allocation 2,095,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $945,000)(11) SR 4003 over SR 3014, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 47910, Project ID 11889220260HB2644PN3625 - 267 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(12) SR 4003 over Branch of Hendricks Creek, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36371, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(13) SR 4003 over Monastery Run, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36311, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(14) SR 4003 over Sewickley Creek, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36555, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(15) SR 4003 over Little Pucketa Creek, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36769, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(16) SR 4003 over Branch of Sewickley Creek, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 268 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 36657, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(17) SR 4003 over Hendricks Creek, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36378, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(18) SR 4003 over Redstone Creek, Brownsville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16965, Project ID 118892Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(19) SR 4038 over Youghiogheny River, Perry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17042, Project ID 119724Project Allocation 4,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(20) SR 857 over Mountain Creek, Georges Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 16701, Project ID 118886Project Allocation 1,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,350,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 269 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (21) SR 982 over Spruce Run, Bullskin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 16708, Project ID 90801Project Allocation 1,400,000(Land Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $900,000)(22) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 31. Forest County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 270 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $5,000,000)Section 32. Franklin County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Montgomery Township, Cool Hollow Road over West Branch of Conococheague Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17696Project Allocation 5,909,568(Base Project Allocation - $5,318,244)(Land Allocation - $53,757)(Design and Contingencies - $537,567)(2) Peters Township, Dickeys Road over Buck Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17700Project Allocation 2,956,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,537,252)(Land Allocation - $47,762)(Design and Contingencies - $370,986)(3) Antrim Township, Kuhn Road over Conococheague Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17631Project Allocation 5,115,264(Base Project Allocation - $4,631,454)(Land Allocation - $53,757)(Design and Contingencies - $430,053)(4) Washington Township, Lyons 20260HB2644PN3625 - 271 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Road over East Branch of Little Antietam Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17732Project Allocation 4,372,032(Base Project Allocation - $3,888,222)(Land Allocation - $53,757)(Design and Contingencies - $430,053)(5) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1001 over Cold Spring Run, Greene Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17480, Project ID 100249Project Allocation 992,531(Base Project Allocation - $342,531)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 11 over Muddy Run, Antrim Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17285, Project ID 100054Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 272 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 11 over Wet Weather Stream, Southampton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17292, Project ID 100132Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) SR 11 over Reagan Run, Antrim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17218, Project ID 87461Project Allocation 475,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(5) SR 11 over Tributary of Conococheague Creek, Antrim Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17281, Project ID 87461Project Allocation 475,000(Base Project Allocation - $125,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(6) SR 16 over East Branch of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 273 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17307, Project ID 100016Project Allocation 5,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(7) SR 16 over Buck Run, Peters Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17295, Project ID 90812Project Allocation 2,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(8) SR 16 over Red Run, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17312, Project ID 100028Project Allocation 2,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(9) SR 16 over East Branch of Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 274 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 17306, Project ID 100012Project Allocation 1,113,895(Base Project Allocation - $463,895)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(10) SR 16 over Red Run, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17310, Project ID 100027Project Allocation 830,359(Base Project Allocation - $180,359)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(11) SR 16 over Red Run, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17309, Project ID 100023Project Allocation 811,262(Base Project Allocation - $161,262)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(12) SR 2002 over Marsh Run, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17497, Project ID 100042Project Allocation 2,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 275 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(13) SR 2006 over West Branch of Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17501, Project ID 100225Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 2007 over Branch of Little Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17504, Project ID 78714Project Allocation 883,334(Base Project Allocation - $666,667)(Land Allocation - $16,667)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(15) SR 2007 over Branch of Little Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17505, Project ID 78714Project Allocation 883,333(Base Project Allocation - $666,666)(Land Allocation - $16,667)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(16) SR 2007 over Branch of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 276 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Little Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17503, Project ID 78714Project Allocation 883,333(Base Project Allocation - $666,667)(Land Allocation - $16,666)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(17) SR 2016 over I-81, Antrim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17512, Project ID 63179Project Allocation 2,655,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $55,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) SR 233 over West Branch of Antietam Creek, Guilford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17402, Project ID 90847Project Allocation 850,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(19) SR 233 over Little Antietam Creek, Quincy Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17401, Project ID 90845Project Allocation 780,49520260HB2644PN3625 - 277 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $130,495)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 30 over Tributary of Campbell Run, Saint Thomas Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17318, Project ID 100174Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(21) SR 30 over West Branch of Conococheague Creek, Peters Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17315, Project ID 117144Project Allocation 220,000(Design and Contingencies - $220,000)(22) SR 3001 over Tributary of Conococheague Creek, Antrim Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17533, Project ID 91340Project Allocation 1,356,281(Base Project Allocation - $706,281)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(23) SR 3004 over Conococheague 20260HB2644PN3625 - 278 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Antrim Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17539, Project ID 99967Project Allocation 2,749,670(Base Project Allocation - $2,099,670)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 3007 over West Branch of Conococheague Creek, Peters Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17545, Project ID 78699Project Allocation 7,506,685(Base Project Allocation - $6,728,685)(Land Allocation - $78,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(25) SR 3009 over West Branch of Conococheague Creek, Peters Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17548, Project ID 78703Project Allocation 1,878,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $78,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(26) SR 3009 over Steigers Run, Montgomery Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 279 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 17547, Project ID 100261Project Allocation 936,688(Base Project Allocation - $286,688)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(27) SR 3011 over Buck Run, Peters Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17550, Project ID 87447Project Allocation 3,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(28) SR 3011 over Buck Run, Peters Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17551, Project ID 101403Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(29) SR 3014 over I-81, Antrim Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17359, Project ID 117143Project Allocation 3,565,302(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 280 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $3,565,302)(30) SR 3017 over Tributary of Back Creek, Peters Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17560, Project ID 116962Project Allocation 1,682,130(Base Project Allocation - $947,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $705,130)(31) SR 3026 over Carters Creek, Warren Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17563, Project ID 100245Project Allocation 1,099,941(Base Project Allocation - $449,941)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(32) SR 3028 over Tributary of Back Creek, Saint Thomas Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17564, Project ID 117141Project Allocation 2,427,564(Base Project Allocation - $1,618,000)(Land Allocation - $70,000)(Design and Contingencies - $739,564)(33) SR 3028 over Tributary of Back Creek, Saint Thomas Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 281 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 17564, Project ID 89275Project Allocation 395,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $195,000)(34) SR 316 over Little Antietam Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17411, Project ID 100165Project Allocation 3,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(35) SR 316 over Tributary of West Branch of Little Antietam Creek, Quincy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17413, Project ID 100169Project Allocation 3,700,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,050,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(36) SR 4001 over Broad Run, Peters Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17565, Project ID 99964Project Allocation 731,632(Base Project Allocation - $81,632)20260HB2644PN3625 - 282 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 4004 over Conodoguinet Creek, Letterkenny Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17571, Project ID 74887Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(38) SR 4005 over Branch of Conococheague Creek, Fannett Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17573, Project ID 99929Project Allocation 1,046,611(Base Project Allocation - $396,611)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 4005 over Tributary of Conococheague Creek, Fannett Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17574, Project ID 99938Project Allocation 695,695(Base Project Allocation - $45,695)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 4007 over Dry Run, Fannett Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 283 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 17581, Project ID 99942Project Allocation 4,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(41) SR 4007 over Dry Run, Fannett Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17582, Project ID 122729Project Allocation 2,225,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(42) SR 4018 over Tributary of Conodoguinet Creek, Lurgan Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17608, Project ID 100143Project Allocation 863,089(Base Project Allocation - $213,089)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(43) SR 4018 over Clippingers Run, Lurgan Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17606, Project ID 100138Project Allocation 836,03020260HB2644PN3625 - 284 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $186,030)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(44) SR 433 over Rowe Run, Southampton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17422, Project ID 100267Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(45) SR 641 over Paxtons Run, Lurgan Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17440, Project ID 117157Project Allocation 1,645,059(Base Project Allocation - $1,645,059)(46) SR 641 over Dry Run, Fannett Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17436, Project ID 101402Project Allocation 1,315,072(Base Project Allocation - $482,536)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $782,536)(47) SR 641 over Trout Run, Lurgan Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17438, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 285 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 78692Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(48) SR 641 over Laughlin Run, Lurgan Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17442, Project ID 100256Project Allocation 819,087(Base Project Allocation - $169,087)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(49) SR 696 over Shirley Run, Southampton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 17445, Project ID 101401Project Allocation 996,079(Base Project Allocation - $346,079)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(50) SR 7203 over Conococheague Creek, Greene Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17651, Project ID 118004Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(51) SR 75 over Branch of Tuscarora Creek, Fannett 20260HB2644PN3625 - 286 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17358, Project ID 92588Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(52) SR 75 over Wet Weather Stream, Metal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17349, Project ID 87684Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(53) SR 75 over Wet Weather Stream, Metal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17348, Project ID 90841Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(54) SR 75 over Bucks Run, Peters Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17340, Project ID 78689Project Allocation 900,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 287 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(55) SR 81 over CSX and Western Maryland Scenic Railroad, Guilford Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17380, Project ID 112295Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(56) SR 81 over SR 30, Guilford Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17385, Project ID 112296Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(57) SR 81 over SR 16, Antrim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17365, Project ID 116473Project Allocation 162,500(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(58) SR 81 over SR 2002, Leitersburg Road, Antrim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17363, Project ID 11647320260HB2644PN3625 - 288 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 162,500(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(59) SR 81 over SR 16, Antrim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17364, Project ID 116473Project Allocation 162,500(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(60) SR 81 over SR 2002, Leitersburg Road, Antrim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17362, Project ID 116473Project Allocation 162,500(Land Allocation - $12,500)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(61) SR 914 over I-81, Guilford Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17446, Project ID 117156Project Allocation 594,196(Base Project Allocation - $594,196)(62) SR 997 over Conodoguinet Creek, Letterkenny Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17472, Project ID 100039Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 289 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(63) SR 997 over Phillaman Run, Greene Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17462, Project ID 117142Project Allocation 2,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(64) SR 997 over Mountain Run, Greene Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17463, Project ID 117142Project Allocation 2,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(65) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 33. Fulton County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State20260HB2644PN3625 - 290 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Belfast Township, SR 7202 over Tonoloway Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17981, Project ID 22763Project Allocation 272,500(Base Project Allocation - $232,500)(Land Allocation - $12,000)(Design and Contingencies - $28,000)(2) Brush Creek Township, SR 7204 over Brush Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17984, Project ID 123834Project Allocation 240,000(Base Project Allocation - $240,000)(3) Todd Township, SR 7209 over Licking Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17996, Project ID 69120Project Allocation 300,000(Base Project Allocation - $249,000)(Land Allocation - $5,250)(Design and Contingencies - $45,750)(4) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges20260HB2644PN3625 - 291 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) SR 1005 over South Branch of Aughwick Creek, Dublin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17884, Project ID 22860Project Allocation 1,165,000(Land Allocation - $65,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,100,000)(2) SR 4015 over Roaring Run, Wells Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17950, Project ID 102781Project Allocation 175,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(3) SR 484 over Piney Run, Bethel Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17817, Project ID 120499Project Allocation 1,023,000(Base Project Allocation - $623,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(4) SR 522 over Tributary of Ten Mile Run, Dublin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17839, Project ID 120494Project Allocation 1,090,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 292 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $340,000)(5) SR 522 over Tributary of Big Cove Creek, Ayr Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17831, Project ID 120496Project Allocation 955,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $305,000)(6) SR 522 over Ten Mile Run, Dublin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17840, Project ID 22855Project Allocation 520,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $470,000)(7) SR 655 over Mellott Run, Licking Creek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 17851, Project ID 111992Project Allocation 650,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $20,000)(8) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 293 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 34. Greene County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Gilmore Township, SR 7207 over Fork of Dunkard Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18506, Project ID 120997Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(2) Morris Township, SR 7214 over Browns Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 182524, Project ID 120996Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2001 over Rudolph Run, Wayne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18242, Project ID 119065Project Allocation 445,000(Base Project Allocation - $390,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 294 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $55,000)(2) SR 3001 over Cook Run, Springhill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18330, Project ID 120620Project Allocation 250,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(3) SR 3001 over Coon Creek, Aleppo Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18333, Project ID 119296Project Allocation 201,000(Base Project Allocation - $146,000)(Land Allocation - $55,000)(4) SR 4012 over Browns Creek, Morris Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18444, Project ID 113598Project Allocation 1,119,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,119,000)(5) SR 4017 over Branch of Scott Run, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18452, Project ID 120621Project Allocation 250,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $25,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 295 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) SR 4019 over Branch of Browns Creek, Morris Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18454, Project ID 120623Project Allocation 250,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(7) SR 88 over Branch of Coal Run, Cumberland Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18146, Project ID 122506Project Allocation 2,095,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $945,000)(8) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 35. Huntingdon County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Carbon Township, SR 7203 over Shoups Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18901, Project ID 120383Project Allocation 306,46820260HB2644PN3625 - 296 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $194,313)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $104,655)(2) Todd Township, SR 7225 over Great Trough Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18942, Project ID 123833Project Allocation 264,000(Base Project Allocation - $264,000)(3) Union Township, SR 7226 over Hares Valley Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18949, Project ID 23020Project Allocation 277,500(Base Project Allocation - $180,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $82,500)(4) West Township, SR 7229 over Shaver Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 18952, Project ID 122527Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(5) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 297 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) State Bridges(1) SR 1005 over Saddlers Run, Brady Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 18765, Project ID 23144Project Allocation 120,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)(2) SR 22 over SR 3035, Norfolk Southern Railroad and Township Road 565, Smithfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18578, Project ID 120513Project Allocation 975,000(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $775,000)(3) SR 3011 over Tributary of Crooked Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 18846, Project ID 120517Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(4) SR 4019 over Arch Spring Run, Morris Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 18890, Project ID 120459Project Allocation 465,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $415,000)(5) SR 994 over Great Trough Creek, Todd Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 298 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 18752, Project ID 120520Project Allocation 728,000(Base Project Allocation - $728,000)(6) SR 994 over Tributary of Great Trough Creek, Todd Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 18751, Project ID 120518Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(7) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 36. Indiana County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 210 over Ross Run, South Mahoning Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 299 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 19054, Project ID 105870Project Allocation 2,280,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $80,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(2) SR 4018 over Tributary of Little Mahoning Creek, West Mahoning Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19401, Project ID 79617Project Allocation 740,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Land Allocation - $90,000)(3) SR 7208 over Muddy Run, Center Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19459, Project ID 120541Project Allocation 208,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $18,000)(Design and Contingencies - $90,000)(4) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 300 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $5,000,000)Section 37. Jefferson County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Ringgold Township, SR 7216 over Big Run, Bridge Removal, Bridge Key 19852, Project ID 98132Project Allocation 525,000(Base Project Allocation - $229,252)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $260,748)(2) Rose Township, SR 7217 over Coder Run, Bridge Removal, Bridge Key 19854, Project ID 25944Project Allocation 559,235(Base Project Allocation - $291,740)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $237,495)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 119 over Clear Creek, Heath Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48534, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 301 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 117335Project Allocation 208,250(Base Project Allocation - $208,250)(2) SR 119 over Big Run, Big Run Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 46520, Project ID 117335Project Allocation 208,250(Base Project Allocation - $208,250)(3) SR 119 over Mill Creek, Big Run Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48083, Project ID 117335Project Allocation 208,250(Base Project Allocation - $208,250)(4) SR 119 over Mahoning Creek, Big Run Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19703, Project ID 117335Project Allocation 208,250(Base Project Allocation - $208,250)(5) SR 119 over Little Sandy Creek, Big Run Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 48084, Project ID 117335Project Allocation 208,250(Base Project Allocation - $208,250)(6) SR 119 over Mahoning Creek and Water Street, Punxsutawney Borough, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 302 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 56011, Project ID 117335Project Allocation 208,250(Base Project Allocation - $208,250)(7) SR 1830 over Mill Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19817, Project ID 117357Project Allocation 2,834,815(Base Project Allocation - $1,875,000)(Land Allocation - $110,000)(Design and Contingencies - $849,815)(8) SR 28 over Runaway Run, Summerville Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 19539, Project ID 122143Project Allocation 2,052,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,052,000)(9) SR 3014 over Tributary of Big Run, Oliver Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 71143, Project ID 122179Project Allocation 664,500(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $149,500)(Design and Contingencies - $15,000)(10) SR 950 over Tributary of Sandy Lick Creek, Winslow 20260HB2644PN3625 - 303 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19674, Project ID 117356Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(11) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 38. Juniata County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) Main Street over Fishing Creek, Mill Hall Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12348, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 304 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) SR 1002 over Tributary of Honey Creek, Armagh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26480, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(3) SR 1005 over Tributary of Buck Run, Derry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26489, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(4) SR 120 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Renovo Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12095, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(5) SR 144 over Halls Run, Noyes Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12147, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(6) SR 2016 over Mahantango Creek, Monroe Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20169, Project ID 119981Project Allocation 2,820,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 305 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(7) SR 2017 over Dutchman Run, Greenwood Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20170, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(8) SR 2019 over Cranes Run, Greenwood Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20186, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(9) SR 2023 over Dobson Run, Susquehanna Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20197, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(10) SR 22 over SR 2005, Walker Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 19937, Project ID 119965Project Allocation 4,020,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,200,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 306 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) SR 22 over SR 2009, Delaware Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19944, Project ID 123157Project Allocation 2,070,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,660,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(12) SR 22 over SR 2009, Delaware Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19943, Project ID 123157Project Allocation 2,070,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,660,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $360,000)(13) SR 22 over Township Road 466, Delaware Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19949, Project ID 117584Project Allocation 780,000(Base Project Allocation - $720,000)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(14) SR 22 over SR 2005, Walker Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19936, Project ID 119962Project Allocation 747,02620260HB2644PN3625 - 307 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $597,026)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(15) SR 22 over SR 2005, Walker Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19937, Project ID 119962Project Allocation 747,026(Base Project Allocation - $597,026)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(16) SR 22 over Township Road 554, Delaware Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19950, Project ID 119967Project Allocation 584,400(Base Project Allocation - $434,400)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(17) SR 22 over Township Road 554, Delaware Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19953, Project ID 119967Project Allocation 584,400(Base Project Allocation - $434,400)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(18) SR 3008 over Robinson Run, Beale Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20240, Project ID 123161Project Allocation 1,770,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 308 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(19) SR 3018 over Union Run, Tuscarora Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20270, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(20) SR 3030 over Tuscarora Creek, Spruce Hill Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20272, Project ID 119983Project Allocation 497,782(Base Project Allocation - $347,782)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(21) SR 3030 over Tuscarora Creek, Spruce Hill Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20253, Project ID 119983Project Allocation 497,782(Base Project Allocation - $347,782)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(22) SR 35 over McCahan Run, Milford Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19975, Project ID 123166Project Allocation 1,940,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 309 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (23) SR 35 over Tributary of Cocolamus Creek, Fayette Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 19993, Project ID 123168Project Allocation 1,915,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,095,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(24) SR 35 over Juniata River, Mifflintown Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19980, Project ID 4120Project Allocation 632,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $2,000)(Design and Contingencies - $30,000)(25) SR 35 over Juniata River, Mifflintown Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 19980, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(26) SR 4001 over Walters Run, Leidy Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12377, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 310 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (27) SR 4005 over Black Log Creek, Lack Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20307, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(28) SR 477 over Fishing Creek, Loganton Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12253, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(29) SR 477 over Long Run, Lamar Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12239, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(30) SR 477 over Spruce Run, Lamar Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12249, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(31) SR 75 over First Street and Juniata River, Port Royal Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20038, Project ID 123445Project Allocation 868,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 311 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $148,000)(32) SR 75 over First Street and Juniata River, Port Royal Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20038, Project ID 119721Project Allocation 648,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $148,000)(33) SR 850 over Woodward Run, Tuscarora Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20093, Project ID 119978Project Allocation 1,106,886(Base Project Allocation - $1,106,886)(34) SR 850 over Tributary of Laurel Run, Tuscarora Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20099, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(35) Township Road 323 over Big Fishing Creek, Porter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 12313, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 312 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(36) Township Road 328 over Tributary of Juniata River, Wayne Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26568, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 198,000(Base Project Allocation - $198,000)(37) Weaver Road over Lost Creek, Fermanagh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20104, Project ID 84972Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(38) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 39. Lackawanna County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) City of Scranton, Albright Avenue over Lackawanna River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20887, Project ID 7793Project Allocation 3,850,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 313 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $3,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(2) City of Scranton, Ash Street over Roaring Brook, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20900, Project ID 8197Project Allocation 3,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) City of Scranton, Broadway Street over Lackawanna River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20907Project Allocation 6,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(4) City of Scranton, East Elm Street over Roaring Brook, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 70999Project Allocation 2,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(5) City of Scranton, Mary Street over Leggets Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 2089820260HB2644PN3625 - 314 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(6) City of Scranton, Poplar Street over Lackawanna River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20906Project Allocation 3,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(7) City of Scranton, South Washington Avenue over Roaring Brook, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20911Project Allocation 4,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(8) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1029 over Hulls Creek, Scott Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 315 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20699, Project ID 122520Project Allocation 890,000(Base Project Allocation - $445,000)(Design and Contingencies - $445,000)(2) SR 11 over SR 3013, North Main Avenue, City of Scranton, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20417, Project ID 117890Project Allocation 1,776,791(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,126,791)(3) SR 11 over Court Street, City of Scranton, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20418, Project ID 117891Project Allocation 700,001(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1)(4) SR 11 over Theodore Street, City of Scranton, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20419, Project ID 117892Project Allocation 700,001(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1)(5) SR 11 over Leach Creek, City of Scranton, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20420, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 316 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 117893Project Allocation 600,001(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1)(6) SR 2004 over White Oak Run, Madison Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20712, Project ID 115704Project Allocation 337,753(Base Project Allocation - $229,753)(Design and Contingencies - $108,000)(7) SR 4008 over Ackerly Creek, Glenburn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20799, Project ID 120467Project Allocation 970,000(Base Project Allocation - $840,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(8) SR 435 over Van Brunt Creek, Moscow Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20607, Project ID 116762Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(9) SR 590 over SR 84, Jefferson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20650, Project ID 118777Project Allocation 5,273,72220260HB2644PN3625 - 317 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $4,920,000)(Design and Contingencies - $353,722)(10) SR 8025 over Roaring Brook and Service Road, City of Scranton, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20968, Project ID 106664Project Allocation 11,809,004(Base Project Allocation - $11,440,000)(Land Allocation - $158,737)(Design and Contingencies - $210,267)(11) SR 81 over Willow Creek, South Abington Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20470, Project ID 120386Project Allocation 367,000(Base Project Allocation - $237,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(12) SR 81 over Branch of Catawissa Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23681, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(13) SR 81 over Branch of Tunkhannock Creek, Butler 20260HB2644PN3625 - 318 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20480, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(14) SR 81 over Willow Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20470, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(15) SR 81 over Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23691, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(16) SR 81 over Mill Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23764, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(17) SR 81 over Reading Blue Mountain and Northern Railroad, Butler Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 319 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23755, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(18) SR 81 over Laurel Run, Butler Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23745, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(19) SR 81 over Reading Blue Mountain and Northern Railroad, Butler Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23753, Project ID 112306Project Allocation 152,500(Base Project Allocation - $52,500)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(20) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 40. Lancaster County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Caernarvon Township, Maxwell 20260HB2644PN3625 - 320 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Hill Road over Conestoga River, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21856Project Allocation 1,301,250(Base Project Allocation - $951,250)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(2) Mount Joy Township, Prospect Road over Conewago Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21987Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(3) Salisbury Township, School Lane Road over Pequea Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22089Project Allocation 901,360(Base Project Allocation - $817,600)(Land Allocation - $2,000)(Design and Contingencies - $81,760)(4) Salisbury Township, Smyrna Road over Houston Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 57591Project Allocation 947,402(Base Project Allocation - $797,402)(Land Allocation - $2,000)(Design and Contingencies - $148,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 321 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Manheim Borough and Penn Township, South Oak Street over Tributary of Chiques Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22015, Project ID 110483Project Allocation 1,480,000(Base Project Allocation - $975,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $465,000)(6) Salisbury Township, Spring Garden Road over Pequea Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22087Project Allocation 2,712,500(Base Project Allocation - $2,362,500)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(7) Penn and Rapho Townships, Township Road 385 (Hamaker Road) over Chiques Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22048, Project ID 118939Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(8) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over 20260HB2644PN3625 - 322 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 10 over Conestoga River, Caernarvon Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20974, Project ID 78833Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 1001 over SR 30, East Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41728, Project ID 101272Project Allocation 1,811,734(Base Project Allocation - $1,161,734)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 1003 over Conestoga River, Manheim Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21370, Project ID 100595Project Allocation 2,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 323 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) SR 1003 over Conestoga River, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21370, Project ID 120649Project Allocation 1,131,323(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $556,323)(5) SR 1010 over Storm Channel, West Earl Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21384, Project ID 87541Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 1013 over Mill Creek, Earl Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21392, Project ID 101145Project Allocation 4,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,350,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(7) SR 1013 over Conestoga River, West Earl Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21396, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 324 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 101148Project Allocation 933,991(Base Project Allocation - $283,991)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(8) SR 1019 over Unnamed Tributary of Conestoga River, Caernarvon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 67991, Project ID 79025Project Allocation 668,832(Base Project Allocation - $328,832)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $320,000)(9) SR 1019 over Tributary of Conestoga River, Caernarvon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21405, Project ID 79025Project Allocation 668,831(Base Project Allocation - $328,831)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $320,000)(10) SR 1020 over Middle Creek, Ephrata Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21406, Project ID 78890Project Allocation 908,555(Base Project Allocation - $258,555)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 325 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(11) SR 1021 over Mill Race, East Earl Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21410, Project ID 117453Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(12) SR 1021 over Mill Race, East Earl Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21411, Project ID 117454Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(13) SR 1035 over Middle Creek, Clay Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21448, Project ID 101151Project Allocation 1,585,030(Base Project Allocation - $935,030)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 1035 over Middle Creek, Clay Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21443, Project ID 121427Project Allocation 650,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 326 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(15) SR 1037 over Hammer Creek, Elizabeth Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21456, Project ID 101153Project Allocation 957,340(Base Project Allocation - $307,340)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(16) SR 1037 over Tributary of Hammer Creek, Elizabeth Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21455, Project ID 91269Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(17) SR 1044 over Little Muddy Creek, Brecknock Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21462, Project ID 78906Project Allocation 376,129(Base Project Allocation - $168,919)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $192,210)(18) SR 1046 over Tributary of Muddy Creek, Brecknock Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 327 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21470, Project ID 101033Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(19) SR 1047 over Cocalico Creek, Ephrata Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21471, Project ID 101155Project Allocation 1,321,758(Base Project Allocation - $671,758)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 1051 over Stony Run Creek, East Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21480, Project ID 94765Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(21) SR 1061 over Little Muddy Creek, Adamstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21492, Project ID 87524Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(22) SR 1084 over SR 222, East 20260HB2644PN3625 - 328 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21111, Project ID 69125Project Allocation 237,010(Base Project Allocation - $147,010)(Design and Contingencies - $90,000)(23) SR 1090 over Local Road 1124, East Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21496, Project ID 101158Project Allocation 2,380,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,730,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 1092 over Local Road 1124, East Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21497, Project ID 101159Project Allocation 3,308,103(Base Project Allocation - $2,658,103)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(25) SR 2011 over Tributary of Westbound Octoraro Creek, Little Britain Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21535, Project ID 78978Project Allocation 725,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 329 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(26) SR 2011 over Tributary of Westbound Octoraro Creek, Little Britain Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21534, Project ID 78978Project Allocation 725,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(27) SR 2015 over Unnamed Tributary of Little Beaver Creek, Strasburg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21548, Project ID 117414Project Allocation 1,564,933(Base Project Allocation - $747,500)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $777,433)(28) SR 2015 over Little Beaver Creek, Strasburg Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21549, Project ID 101161Project Allocation 901,063(Base Project Allocation - $251,063)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(29) SR 2019 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 330 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Beaver Creek, Quarryville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21554, Project ID 101055Project Allocation 920,398(Base Project Allocation - $270,398)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(30) SR 2019 over Goff Run, Providence Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21556, Project ID 101263Project Allocation 888,880(Base Project Allocation - $238,880)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(31) SR 2029 over Tributary of Little Beaver Creek, Strasburg Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21569, Project ID 87555Project Allocation 665,546(Base Project Allocation - $15,546)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(32) SR 2031 over Little Beaver Creek, Strasburg Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21575, Project ID 101267Project Allocation 845,77120260HB2644PN3625 - 331 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $195,771)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(33) SR 2035 over Pequea Creek, Paradise Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21583, Project ID 101271Project Allocation 713,187(Base Project Allocation - $213,187)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $450,000)(34) SR 2039 over Tributary of Big Spring Run, West Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21587, Project ID 101063Project Allocation 705,191(Base Project Allocation - $55,191)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(35) SR 222 over Conowingo Creek, Fulton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21055, Project ID 100439Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(36) SR 222 over Branch of Beaver 20260HB2644PN3625 - 332 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Providence Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21061, Project ID 100458Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 222 over SR 1059 (Muddy Creek Road), East Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21115, Project ID 100598Project Allocation 1,325,590(Base Project Allocation - $675,590)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(38) SR 222 over SR 1059 (Muddy Creek Road), East Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21117, Project ID 101020Project Allocation 1,325,590(Base Project Allocation - $675,590)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 222 over SR 30, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21080, Project ID 10053620260HB2644PN3625 - 333 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,275,600(Base Project Allocation - $625,600)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 222 over Little Muddy Creek, East Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21118, Project ID 101034Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(41) SR 222 over Little Muddy Creek, East Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21119, Project ID 101328Project Allocation 850,001(Base Project Allocation - $200,001)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(42) SR 222 over SR 30, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21688, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 494,459(Base Project Allocation - $381,959)(Design and Contingencies - $112,500)(43) SR 222 over SR 1040 and Spur Road, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21113, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 334 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119211Project Allocation 461,495(Base Project Allocation - $356,495)(Design and Contingencies - $105,000)(44) SR 222 over SR 322, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21103, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 428,531(Base Project Allocation - $331,031)(Design and Contingencies - $97,500)(45) SR 222 over SR 1040 and Spur Road, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21112, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 428,531(Base Project Allocation - $331,031)(Design and Contingencies - $97,500)(46) SR 222 over SR 322 Eastbound and Westbound, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21102, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 428,531(Base Project Allocation - $331,031)(Design and Contingencies - $97,500)(47) SR 222 over Abandoned Railroad, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21245, Project ID 11921120260HB2644PN3625 - 335 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 291,880(Base Project Allocation - $225,600)(Design and Contingencies - $66,280)(48) SR 222 over Little Conestoga Creek, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20982, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 291,880(Base Project Allocation - $225,600)(Design and Contingencies - $66,280)(49) SR 222 over School Drive and North 9th Street, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20999, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 263,711(Base Project Allocation - $203,711)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(50) SR 222 over US 30, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20980, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 230,747(Base Project Allocation - $178,247)(Design and Contingencies - $52,500)(51) SR 222 over Little Conestoga Creek, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21306, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 197,78320260HB2644PN3625 - 336 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $152,783)(Design and Contingencies - $45,000)(52) SR 222 over SR 4001 (Ironville Pike), Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21003, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 197,783(Base Project Allocation - $152,783)(Design and Contingencies - $45,000)(53) SR 222 over Tributary of Beaver Creek, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21063, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 164,820(Base Project Allocation - $127,320)(Design and Contingencies - $37,500)(54) SR 222 over SR 283 and SR 300, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21322, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 145,940(Base Project Allocation - $112,800)(Design and Contingencies - $33,140)(55) SR 222 over SR 4001 (Ironville Pike), Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21001, Project ID 11921120260HB2644PN3625 - 337 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 145,940(Base Project Allocation - $112,800)(Design and Contingencies - $33,140)(56) SR 222 over Little Conestoga Creek, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21050, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $83,430)(Design and Contingencies - $16,570)(57) SR 222 over Mill Creek, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21229, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $83,430)(Design and Contingencies - $16,570)(58) SR 222 over Tributary of Conestoga River, Columbia Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21630, Project ID 119211Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $83,430)(Design and Contingencies - $16,570)(59) SR 23 over US 30, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41724, Project ID 101318Project Allocation 5,150,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 338 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(60) SR 23 over Conestoga River, Caernarvon Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20996, Project ID 101295Project Allocation 2,228,447(Base Project Allocation - $1,578,447)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(61) SR 23 over Little Conestoga Creek, Lancaster Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20982, Project ID 101282Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(62) SR 272 over Little Muddy Creek, Adamstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21160, Project ID 97263Project Allocation 325,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(63) SR 272 over Little Muddy 20260HB2644PN3625 - 339 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Adamstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21161, Project ID 97263Project Allocation 325,000(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(64) SR 30 over SR 501 (Lititz Pike) Loop C, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40962, Project ID 101307Project Allocation 5,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(65) SR 30 over Little Conestoga Creek, East Hempfield Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41570, Project ID 101316Project Allocation 4,225,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(66) SR 30 over Houston Run, Salisbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 68298, Project ID 8750020260HB2644PN3625 - 340 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,504,482(Base Project Allocation - $1,130,304)(Land Allocation - $141,000)(Design and Contingencies - $233,178)(67) SR 30 over Houston Run, Salisbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21044, Project ID 87500Project Allocation 1,504,482(Base Project Allocation - $1,130,304)(Land Allocation - $141,000)(Design and Contingencies - $233,178)(68) SR 30 over SR 4011 (Fruitville Pike), Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40960, Project ID 94924Project Allocation 675,000(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(69) SR 3006 over Fishing Creek, Drumore Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21609, Project ID 117650Project Allocation 900,000(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(70) SR 3008 over East Branch of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 341 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Conowingo Creek, East Drumore Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21612, Project ID 101069Project Allocation 858,445(Base Project Allocation - $208,445)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(71) SR 3015 over Enola Low Grade Rail Trail, Providence Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21621, Project ID 101273Project Allocation 1,891,381(Base Project Allocation - $1,241,381)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(72) SR 3016 over Little Beaver Creek, Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21623, Project ID 100436Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(73) SR 3017 over Amtrak, East Hempfield Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21922, Project ID 11893120260HB2644PN3625 - 342 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 6,905,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,555,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(74) SR 3017 over Branch of Pequea Creek, Martic Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21628, Project ID 87540Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(75) SR 3017 over Tributary of Indian Creek, Manor Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21635, Project ID 101280Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(76) SR 3017 over Witmer Run, Manor Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21633, Project ID 101275Project Allocation 718,571(Base Project Allocation - $68,571)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 343 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (77) SR 3018 over Enola Low Grade Rail Trail, Providence Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21642, Project ID 101284Project Allocation 2,048,740(Base Project Allocation - $1,398,740)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(78) SR 3027 over Tributary of Conestoga River, Manor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21647, Project ID 87542Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(79) SR 3027 over Little Conestoga Creek, Manor Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21649, Project ID 101127Project Allocation 1,189,878(Base Project Allocation - $539,878)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(80) SR 3028 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 344 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Mill Creek, West Lampeter Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21652, Project ID 117455Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(81) SR 3028 over Mill Creek, West Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21651, Project ID 101287Project Allocation 1,361,924(Base Project Allocation - $711,924)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(82) SR 3030 over Stehman Run, Conestoga Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21659, Project ID 101130Project Allocation 903,678(Base Project Allocation - $253,678)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(83) SR 3040 over Beaver Creek, Strasburg Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21669, Project ID 101136Project Allocation 350,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 345 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(84) SR 322 over Cocalico Creek, Ephrata Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21200, Project ID 101103Project Allocation 2,053,559(Base Project Allocation - $1,403,559)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(85) SR 322 over Tributary of Conestoga River, Earl Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21205, Project ID 101105Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(86) SR 324 over Abandoned Mill Race, Pequea Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21219, Project ID 117452Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(87) SR 340 over SR 3013 (North Main Avenue), East Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41732, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 346 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 101279Project Allocation 2,070,115(Base Project Allocation - $1,420,115)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(88) SR 340 over Mill Creek, East Lampeter Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21229, Project ID 101106Project Allocation 850,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(89) SR 372 over Abandoned Railroad, Quarryville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21245, Project ID 101120Project Allocation 2,622,222(Base Project Allocation - $1,972,222)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(90) SR 372 over Susquehanna River and Norfolk Southern Railroad, Martic Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21239, Project ID 117415Project Allocation 1,000,000(Design and Contingencies - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 347 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,000,000)(91) SR 4001 over SR 4020 and Amtrak, West Hempfield Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21674, Project ID 101144Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(92) SR 4002 over Tributary of Donegal Creek, East Donegal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21679, Project ID 87537Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(93) SR 4002 over Tributary of Donegal Creek, East Donegal Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21678, Project ID 101294Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(94) SR 4004 over Conoy Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 348 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Conoy Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21684, Project ID 101150Project Allocation 3,363,739(Base Project Allocation - $2,713,739)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(95) SR 4004 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, East Donegal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21686, Project ID 117451Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(96) SR 4004 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, East Donegal Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21685, Project ID 87559Project Allocation 1,302,264(Base Project Allocation - $652,264)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(97) SR 4004 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, East Donegal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21686, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 349 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 109331Project Allocation 177,000(Base Project Allocation - $177,000)(98) SR 4008 over SR 283 and SR 300, Mount Joy Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21691, Project ID 101296Project Allocation 1,967,660(Base Project Allocation - $1,317,660)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(99) SR 4008 over Chickies Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21697, Project ID 101157Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(100) SR 4017 over Barnyard Runoff, East Donegal Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21710, Project ID 117450Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(101) SR 4018 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 350 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Donegal Creek, West Donegal Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21715, Project ID 87508Project Allocation 765,000(Base Project Allocation - $115,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(102) SR 4019 over Conoy Creek, West Donegal Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21717, Project ID 101162Project Allocation 925,000(Base Project Allocation - $275,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(103) SR 4020 over Chickies Creek, Rapho Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21720, Project ID 91107Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(104) SR 4020 over Little Conestoga Creek, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21726, Project ID 101264Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 351 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(105) SR 4025 over Amtrak, Mount Joy Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21733, Project ID 101298Project Allocation 5,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(106) SR 4026 over Rife Run, Rapho Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21736, Project ID 101301Project Allocation 940,934(Base Project Allocation - $290,934)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(107) SR 4041 over SR 283 and SR 300, Mount Joy Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21169, Project ID 101039Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(108) SR 441 over Schumans Run, Manor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21255, Project ID 9085220260HB2644PN3625 - 352 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,786,096(Base Project Allocation - $1,993,396)(Land Allocation - $90,700)(Design and Contingencies - $702,000)(109) SR 441 over Stamen's Run, Manor Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21254, Project ID 101122Project Allocation 696,000(Base Project Allocation - $46,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(110) SR 462 over Little Conestoga Creek, Manor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21276, Project ID 93581Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(111) SR 501 over Hammer Creek, Elizabeth Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21287, Project ID 102605Project Allocation 5,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 353 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(112) SR 7214 over Tributary of Little Conestoga Creek, East Hempfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21914, Project ID 118492Project Allocation 300,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(113) SR 741 over Amtrak, Manheim Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 21301, Project ID 87539Project Allocation 8,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $7,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(114) SR 741 over Amtrak, Salisbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21312, Project ID 101125Project Allocation 2,190,594(Base Project Allocation - $1,540,594)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(115) SR 741 over Eshleman Run, Paradise Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 68027, Project ID 8755320260HB2644PN3625 - 354 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 874,491(Base Project Allocation - $604,309)(Land Allocation - $16,750)(Design and Contingencies - $253,432)(116) SR 741 over Eshleman Run, Paradise Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21309, Project ID 87553Project Allocation 874,490(Base Project Allocation - $604,308)(Land Allocation - $16,750)(Design and Contingencies - $253,432)(117) SR 743 over Amtrak, Elizabethtown Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21315, Project ID 101128Project Allocation 1,369,882(Base Project Allocation - $719,882)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(118) SR 772 over Rife Run, Manheim Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21323, Project ID 19862Project Allocation 5,159,825(Base Project Allocation - $3,956,015)(Land Allocation - $283,400)(Design and Contingencies - $920,410)(119) SR 772 over Local Road 20260HB2644PN3625 - 355 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1124, Upper Leacock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21332, Project ID 100570Project Allocation 2,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(120) SR 772 over Wet Weather Run, Rapho Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21321, Project ID 100567Project Allocation 2,076,632(Base Project Allocation - $1,426,632)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(121) SR 772 over Cocalico Creek, Warwick Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21327, Project ID 101135Project Allocation 1,599,681(Base Project Allocation - $949,681)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(122) SR 772 over Little Chiques Creek, Rapho Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21320, Project ID 101129Project Allocation 1,250,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 356 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(123) SR 772 over Groffs Run, West Earl Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40239, Project ID 101305Project Allocation 913,968(Base Project Allocation - $263,968)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(124) SR 772 over SR 283 and SR 300, Rapho Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21322, Project ID 101132Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(125) SR 896 over Eliminated Railroad Tracks, Bart Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21342, Project ID 101140Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(126) SR 897 over Cocalico Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 357 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 West Cocalico Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 21361, Project ID 101141Project Allocation 954,166(Base Project Allocation - $304,166)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(127) SR 999 over Tributary of West Branch of Little Conestoga Creek, Manor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 21365, Project ID 117416Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(128) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 41. Lawrence County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Bessemer Borough, SR 7401 over Hickory Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 63264, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 358 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119589Project Allocation 1,408,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,000)(Land Allocation - $32,000)(Design and Contingencies - $256,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1006 over Branch of Potter Run, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22370, Project ID 29378Project Allocation 1,857,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $352,000)(2) SR 168 over SR 422, Taylor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22251, Project ID 109392Project Allocation 840,000(Base Project Allocation - $840,000)(3) SR 18 over Shenango River and 20260HB2644PN3625 - 359 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Northern Central Railway Railroad, City of New Castle, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22183, Project ID 119017Project Allocation 37,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $35,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $2,000,000)(4) SR 376 over SR 376, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22481, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 470,000(Design and Contingencies - $470,000)(5) SR 376 over Township Road 605, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22210, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 282,000(Design and Contingencies - $282,000)(6) SR 376 over Township Road 605, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22212, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 282,000(Design and Contingencies - $282,000)(7) SR 376 over Mercer Road, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22214, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 360 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 112485Project Allocation 282,000(Design and Contingencies - $282,000)(8) SR 376 over Mercer Road, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22215, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 282,000(Design and Contingencies - $282,000)(9) SR 376 over Township Road 593 (Nashua Road), Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22207, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 258,500(Design and Contingencies - $258,500)(10) SR 376 over Township Road 593 (Nashua Road), Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22206, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 258,500(Design and Contingencies - $258,500)(11) SR 376 over SR 4004 (Pulaski Road), Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22198, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(12) SR 376 over SR 376 Eastbound 20260HB2644PN3625 - 361 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Westbound, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22200, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(13) SR 376 over Tributary of Shenango River, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22201, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(14) SR 376 over Tributary of Shenango River, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22202, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(15) SR 376 over Old Pulaski Road, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22203, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(16) SR 376 over Old Pulaski Road, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22204, Project ID 11248620260HB2644PN3625 - 362 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(17) SR 376 over SR 376, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22481, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(18) SR 376 over SR 8008 and Shenango River, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22195, Project ID 112486Project Allocation 256,250(Design and Contingencies - $256,250)(19) SR 376 over SR 4002, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22592, Project ID 112487Project Allocation 137,500(Design and Contingencies - $137,500)(20) SR 376 over US 422 Eastbound and Westbound, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22310, Project ID 112487Project Allocation 137,500(Design and Contingencies - $137,500)(21) SR 376 over US 422 Eastbound and Westbound, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 363 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 22309, Project ID 112487Project Allocation 137,500(Design and Contingencies - $137,500)(22) SR 376 over SR 376 Ramp K, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22283, Project ID 112487Project Allocation 137,500(Design and Contingencies - $137,500)(23) SR 376 over Tributary of Shenango River, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22205, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $53,000)(Design and Contingencies - $47,000)(24) SR 376 over Tributary of Shenango River, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22208, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $53,000)(Design and Contingencies - $47,000)(25) SR 376 over Faulkman Run, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22209, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 364 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $53,000)(Design and Contingencies - $47,000)(26) SR 376 over McClanannan Run, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22211, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $53,000)(Design and Contingencies - $47,000)(27) SR 376 over Buchanan Run, Neshannock Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22213, Project ID 112485Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $53,000)(Design and Contingencies - $47,000)(28) SR 4005 over Tributary of Shenango River, Pulaski Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22472, Project ID 117475Project Allocation 1,270,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $70,000)(29) SR 422 over Shenango River, City of New Castle, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22324, Project ID 118853Project Allocation 5,047,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 365 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,047,000)(30) SR 422 over Shenango River, City of New Castle, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22323, Project ID 118853Project Allocation 5,047,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,047,000)(31) SR 422 over SR 18 (Cedar Street), City of New Castle, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22322, Project ID 118853Project Allocation 2,163,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,163,000)(32) SR 422 over SR 18 (Cedar Street), City of New Castle, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22321, Project ID 118853Project Allocation 2,163,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,163,000)(33) SR 79 over I-79, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22393, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 245,000(Design and Contingencies - $245,000)(34) SR 79 over I-79, Plain Grove 20260HB2644PN3625 - 366 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22387, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 245,000(Design and Contingencies - $245,000)(35) SR 79 over I-79, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22383, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 105,000(Design and Contingencies - $105,000)(36) SR 79 over Jamison Run, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22229, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $79,000)(Design and Contingencies - $21,000)(37) SR 79 over Jamison Run, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22228, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $79,000)(Design and Contingencies - $21,000)(38) SR 79 over Jamison Run, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22227, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 367 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $79,000)(Design and Contingencies - $21,000)(39) SR 79 over Jamison Run, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22226, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $79,000)(Design and Contingencies - $21,000)(40) SR 79 over Branch of Jamison Run, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22224, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $79,000)(Design and Contingencies - $21,000)(41) SR 79 over Branch of Jamison Run, Plain Grove Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22225, Project ID 112464Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $79,000)(Design and Contingencies - $21,000)(42) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 368 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 42. Lebanon County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Bethel Township, SR 7201 over Little Swatara Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22831, Project ID 100328Project Allocation 830,918(Base Project Allocation - $688,418)(Design and Contingencies - $142,500)(2) North Annville Township, SR 7207 over Swatara Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22862, Project ID 20364Project Allocation 968,550(Base Project Allocation - $806,400)(Land Allocation - $1,650)(Design and Contingencies - $160,500)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1007 over Beach Run, Bethel Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22730, Project ID 100352Project Allocation 2,330,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 369 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,680,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 1014 over Tributary of Lower Swatara Creek, Swatara Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22740, Project ID 100353Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 1020 over Beech Run, Bethel Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22749, Project ID 87477Project Allocation 4,760,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,360,000)(Land Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,200,000)(4) SR 1022 over I-81, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22750, Project ID 100262Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 370 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) SR 117 over Conewago Creek, South Londonderry Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22660, Project ID 78751Project Allocation 2,330,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,680,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 2001 over Snitz Creek, Cornwall Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22753, Project ID 100347Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(7) SR 2011 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22760, Project ID 100279Project Allocation 2,286,699(Base Project Allocation - $1,636,699)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(8) SR 2017 over Mill Creek, Millcreek Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 371 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22770, Project ID 100283Project Allocation 1,770,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(9) SR 22 over SR 934, East Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22595, Project ID 100333Project Allocation 3,209,600(Base Project Allocation - $2,559,600)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(10) SR 22 over Earlakill Run, Bethel Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22607, Project ID 100332Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(11) SR 22 over Reeds Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22599, Project ID 100349Project Allocation 1,650,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 372 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(12) SR 22 over I-81, Annville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22808, Project ID 119212Project Allocation 850,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(13) SR 22 over Deep Run, Bethel Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22604, Project ID 100337Project Allocation 730,000(Base Project Allocation - $380,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(14) SR 22 over Quittapahilla Creek, Annville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22723, Project ID 119212Project Allocation 350,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(15) SR 22 over Tributary of Owl Creek, Annville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 69096, Project ID 119212Project Allocation 250,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 373 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) SR 22 over Reeds Creek, Annville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22599, Project ID 119212Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(17) SR 2501 over East Branch of Hammer Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22717, Project ID 117466Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) SR 3007 over Conewago Creek, South Londonderry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22775, Project ID 100311Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(19) SR 322 over SR 72 Southbound, West Cornwall Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22676, Project ID 100282Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 374 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 322 over SR 72, Cornwall Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22678, Project ID 100330Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(21) SR 322 over Killinger Creek, South Annville Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22671, Project ID 117411Project Allocation 856,660(Base Project Allocation - $378,000)(Design and Contingencies - $478,660)(22) SR 322 over Beck Creek, West Cornwall Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22675, Project ID 100291Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(23) SR 4005 over Tributary of Swatara Creek, North Annville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22786, Project ID 100294Project Allocation 900,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 375 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 4008 over Spring Creek, North Annville Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22793, Project ID 100302Project Allocation 743,015(Base Project Allocation - $93,015)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(25) SR 4011 over Tributary of Swatara Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22800, Project ID 117410Project Allocation 2,168,150(Base Project Allocation - $1,306,000)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $802,150)(26) SR 4013 over Raccoon Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22804, Project ID 100309Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(27) SR 4017 over I-81, East 20260HB2644PN3625 - 376 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22808, Project ID 100264Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(28) SR 4019 over Indiantown Run, East Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22810, Project ID 88973Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(29) SR 4020 over Forge Creek, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22814, Project ID 100327Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(30) SR 4025 over Evening Branch of Spring Creek, Cold Spring Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 41310, Project ID 88847Project Allocation 650,000(Base Project Allocation - $225,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 377 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(31) SR 4025 over Evening Branch of Spring Creek, Cold Spring Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 41310, Project ID 109327Project Allocation 117,600(Base Project Allocation - $117,600)(32) SR 4027 over Tributary of Swatara Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22823, Project ID 100306Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(33) SR 422 over Tributary of Tulpehocken Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22703, Project ID 100305Project Allocation 2,330,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,680,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(34) SR 422 over Tributary of Owl 20260HB2644PN3625 - 378 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22704, Project ID 100317Project Allocation 2,330,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,680,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(35) SR 422 over Tulpehocken Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22701, Project ID 100293Project Allocation 1,256,380(Base Project Allocation - $868,340)(Land Allocation - $19,464)(Design and Contingencies - $368,576)(36) SR 443 over Tributary of Indiantown Run, East Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22708, Project ID 100354Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 501 over Tributary of Owl Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22720, Project ID 10580220260HB2644PN3625 - 379 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,447,899(Base Project Allocation - $1,364,858)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $983,041)(38) SR 501 over East Branch of Hammer Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22717, Project ID 91347Project Allocation 1,675,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 72 over Snitz Creek, Swatara Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22610, Project ID 100338Project Allocation 2,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 72 over Swatara Creek, Union Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22612, Project ID 100331Project Allocation 1,681,943(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 380 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,271,628)(Land Allocation - $81,400)(Design and Contingencies - $328,915)(41) SR 72 over Forge Creek, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22619, Project ID 100351Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(42) SR 72 over Kevins Run, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22614, Project ID 90340Project Allocation 767,245(Base Project Allocation - $117,245)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(43) SR 72 over Tributary of Swatara Creek, Union Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 22613, Project ID 117412Project Allocation 296,144(Design and Contingencies - $296,144)(44) SR 78 over SR 8016 Ramp E, Union Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22621, Project ID 117413Project Allocation 5,650,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 381 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(45) SR 78 over SR 8016 Ramp E, Union Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 22621, Project ID 116474Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(46) SR 934 over Swatara Creek, East Hanover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 22726, Project ID 100326Project Allocation 1,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(47) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 43. Lehigh County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Washington Township, Center 20260HB2644PN3625 - 382 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Street (Emerald Bridge No. 2) over Trout Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23484, Project ID 118865Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(2) Lynn Township, Gun Club Road (Oswald's Bridge) over Ontelaunee Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23465, Project ID 117392Project Allocation 10,233,900(Base Project Allocation - $10,233,900)(3) Lowhill Township, Hollenbach Road (Kocher's Bridge) over Jordan Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23457, Project ID 117394Project Allocation 3,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,250,000)(4) Lowhill Township, Jordan Road over Jordan Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23453, Project ID 117386Project Allocation 8,187,120(Base Project Allocation - $8,187,120)20260HB2644PN3625 - 383 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) North Whitehall Township, Jordan Road (Rex's Covered Bridge) over Jordan Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23469, Project ID 117382Project Allocation 10,233,900(Base Project Allocation - $10,233,900)(6) Catasauqua Borough, SR 7301 over Catasauqua Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 54416, Project ID 123493Project Allocation 913,750(Base Project Allocation - $561,000)(Land Allocation - $63,750)(Design and Contingencies - $289,000)(7) Catasauqua Borough, SR 7301 over Tributary of Bushkill Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28940, Project ID 123493Project Allocation 913,750(Base Project Allocation - $561,000)(Land Allocation - $63,750)(Design and Contingencies - $289,000)(8) Catasauqua Borough, SR 7301 over Hassen Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23473, Project ID 123493Project Allocation 913,75020260HB2644PN3625 - 384 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $561,000)(Land Allocation - $63,750)(Design and Contingencies - $289,000)(9) Catasauqua Borough, SR 7301 over Catasauqua Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23525, Project ID 123493Project Allocation 913,750(Base Project Allocation - $561,000)(Land Allocation - $63,750)(Design and Contingencies - $289,000)(10) Catasauqua Borough, SR 7301 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23236, Project ID 123493Project Allocation 913,750(Base Project Allocation - $561,000)(Land Allocation - $63,750)(Design and Contingencies - $289,000)(11) Catasauqua Borough, SR 7301 over Little Lehigh Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23492, Project ID 123493Project Allocation 913,750(Base Project Allocation - $561,000)(Land Allocation - $63,750)(Design and Contingencies - $289,000)(12) Lynn Township, Ulrich Mill Road (Ulrich's Mill Bridge) 20260HB2644PN3625 - 385 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 over Ontelaunee Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23464, Project ID 117390Project Allocation 10,233,900(Base Project Allocation - $10,233,900)(13) South Whitehall Township, Wehr Mill Road (Wehr's Dam Covered Bridge) over Jordan Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23435, Project ID 117381Project Allocation 10,233,900(Base Project Allocation - $10,233,900)(14) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 100 over Hassen Creek, Upper Macungie Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23088, Project ID 123478Project Allocation 3,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 386 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 100 over Hassen Creek, Upper Macungie Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23358, Project ID 123478Project Allocation 3,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 100 over Jordan Creek, Lowhill Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23093, Project ID 120953Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(4) SR 100 over Jacoby Creek, Lowhill Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28638, Project ID 120953Project Allocation 3,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(5) SR 1011 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23236, Project ID 123500Project Allocation 590,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 387 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(6) SR 1019 over US 22, South Whitehall Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23250, Project ID 123483Project Allocation 4,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(7) SR 143 over Tributary of Ontelaunee Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23100, Project ID 123484Project Allocation 333,334(Base Project Allocation - $333,334)(8) SR 143 over Breinig Run, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23343, Project ID 123484Project Allocation 333,333(Base Project Allocation - $333,333)(9) SR 143 over Branch of Hosensack Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23298, Project ID 123484Project Allocation 333,33320260HB2644PN3625 - 388 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $333,333)(10) SR 2010 over Little Lehigh Creek, City of Allentown, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23271, Project ID 119933Project Allocation 526,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $106,000)(11) SR 2017 over Little Lehigh Creek, Lower Macungie Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23279, Project ID 123499Project Allocation 1,175,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(12) SR 2021 over Tributary of Jordan Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23389, Project ID 123487Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(13) SR 2021 over Tributary of Swope Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 389 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 23285, Project ID 123487Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(14) SR 2021 over Unnamed Stream, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 57099, Project ID 123487Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(15) SR 2021 over Branch of Leiberts Run, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23287, Project ID 123487Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(16) SR 2021 over Tributary of Lyon Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23420, Project ID 123487Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 390 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(17) SR 2029 over Hosensack Creek, Lower Milford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23305, Project ID 119936Project Allocation 406,542(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $30,280)(Design and Contingencies - $76,262)(18) SR 222 over Breinig Run, Upper Macungie Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23134, Project ID 123502Project Allocation 590,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(19) SR 3001 over Little Lehigh Creek, Lower Macungie Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23335, Project ID 79135Project Allocation 590,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(20) SR 3004 over Little Lehigh Creek, Lower Macungie Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 391 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23338, Project ID 123497Project Allocation 530,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $170,000)(21) SR 4019 over Sweitzer Creek, Lowhill Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23385, Project ID 94329Project Allocation 460,000(Base Project Allocation - $360,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $90,000)(22) SR 4027 over Jordan Creek, Lowhill Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23406, Project ID 123481Project Allocation 4,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(23) SR 4037 over Kistler Creek, Lynn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23411, Project ID 11588Project Allocation 1,348,730(Base Project Allocation - $1,178,130)(Land Allocation - $40,600)20260HB2644PN3625 - 392 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(24) SR 4040 over Switzer Creek, Lynn Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23418, Project ID 123501Project Allocation 454,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $14,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(25) SR 873 over Tributary of Saucon Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23321, Project ID 120955Project Allocation 1,528,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $670,000)(26) SR 873 over Tributary of Lehigh River, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23206, Project ID 120955Project Allocation 1,451,600(Base Project Allocation - $712,500)(Land Allocation - $102,600)(Design and Contingencies - $636,500)(27) SR 873 over Tributary of Mill Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 393 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 23367, Project ID 120955Project Allocation 1,222,400(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $86,400)(Design and Contingencies - $536,000)(28) SR 873 over Fells Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23377, Project ID 120955Project Allocation 1,222,400(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $86,400)(Design and Contingencies - $536,000)(29) SR 873 over Tributary of Ontelaunee Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23104, Project ID 120955Project Allocation 1,069,600(Base Project Allocation - $525,000)(Land Allocation - $75,600)(Design and Contingencies - $469,000)(30) SR 873 over Tributary of Ontelaunee Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23103, Project ID 120955Project Allocation 1,069,600(Base Project Allocation - $525,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 394 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $75,600)(Design and Contingencies - $469,000)(31) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 44. Luzerne County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) City of Nanticoke, Bridge Replacement on Broadway Street (West Nanticoke Bridge) over Susquehanna River, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24451, Project ID 67254Project Allocation 300,000(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(2) Rice Township, Henry Drive over Little Wapwallopen Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 57022Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,350,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(3) Rice Township, Laurel Drive over Nuangola Outlet, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 5702020260HB2644PN3625 - 395 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,080,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(4) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1009 over Susquehanna River, City of Wilkes-Barre, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23967, Project ID 115819Project Allocation 12,296,878(Base Project Allocation - $9,044,310)(Design and Contingencies - $3,252,568)(2) SR 1013 over Tobys Creek, Luzerne Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23978, Project ID 120389Project Allocation 1,436,240(Base Project Allocation - $1,306,240)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(3) SR 1045 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 396 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Toby Creek, Dallas Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 42299, Project ID 120449Project Allocation 530,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(4) SR 1048 over Branch of Harvey Creek, Lehman Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24037, Project ID 120391Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(5) SR 1061 over East Fork of Harvey's Creek, Lehman Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24048, Project ID 120392Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(6) SR 11 over Susquehanna River, Railroad and SR 2037, West Pittston Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23614, Project ID 121029Project Allocation 5,544,866(Base Project Allocation - $5,279,850)20260HB2644PN3625 - 397 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $230,016)(7) SR 118 over Fades Creek, Lake Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23819, Project ID 115728Project Allocation 1,834,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,344,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $460,000)(8) SR 118 over Pikes Creek, Lake Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23820, Project ID 120387Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(9) SR 2005 over Susquehanna River, Larksville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41749, Project ID 114275Project Allocation 2,110,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $110,000)(10) SR 2007 over Railroad and Local Streets, City of Wilkes Barre, Bridge Removal, Bridge Key 24077, Project ID 11427620260HB2644PN3625 - 398 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,245,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(11) SR 2007 over Railroad and Local Streets, City of Wilkes Barre, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24077, Project ID 121030Project Allocation 8,180,195(Base Project Allocation - $7,940,500)(Design and Contingencies - $239,695)(12) SR 2010 over Pocono Northeast Railroad, Ashley Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24093, Project ID 114277Project Allocation 752,760(Base Project Allocation - $669,760)(Design and Contingencies - $83,000)(13) SR 2020 over Laurel Run, City of Wilkes Barre, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 24102, Project ID 120393Project Allocation 434,640(Base Project Allocation - $304,640)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(14) SR 2039 over Gardners Creek, Jenkins Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 399 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 24133, Project ID 120395Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(15) SR 239 over Wapwallopen Creek, Nescopeck Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23829, Project ID 118281Project Allocation 787,692(Base Project Allocation - $269,109)(Land Allocation - $30,050)(Design and Contingencies - $488,533)(16) SR 309 over SR 2004 and Railroads, Plains Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23880, Project ID 114271Project Allocation 29,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $26,400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $3,200,000)(17) SR 4018 over Pine Creek, Huntington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24326, Project ID 118778Project Allocation 950,878(Base Project Allocation - $602,050)(Land Allocation - $48,388)(Design and Contingencies - $300,440)20260HB2644PN3625 - 400 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (18) SR 424 over SR 81, Hazle Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 40750, Project ID 116177Project Allocation 9,462,500(Base Project Allocation - $5,280,000)(Land Allocation - $182,500)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000,000)(19) SR 424 over SR 82, Hazle Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 40749, Project ID 116177Project Allocation 9,462,500(Base Project Allocation - $5,280,000)(Land Allocation - $182,500)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000,000)(20) SR 80 over Tributary of Linesville Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23676, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(21) SR 80 over Linesville Creek, Butler Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 401 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 23678, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(22) SR 80 over Linesville Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23677, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(23) SR 80 over Tributary of Oley Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23674, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(24) SR 80 over Honey Hole Road and Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23670, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(25) SR 80 over Honey Hole Road and Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 402 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 23669, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(26) SR 80 over Tributary of Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23668, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(27) SR 80 over SR 309, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23667, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(28) SR 80 over SR 310, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23666, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(29) SR 80 over Tributary of Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 403 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23665, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(30) SR 80 over Oley Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23671, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(31) SR 80 over Tributary of Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 42009, Project ID 107495Project Allocation 821,846(Land Allocation - $52,134)(Design and Contingencies - $769,712)(32) SR 81 over I-80 Westbound, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23702, Project ID 81910Project Allocation 50,899,800(Base Project Allocation - $35,700,000)(Land Allocation - $110,000)(Design and Contingencies - $15,089,800)20260HB2644PN3625 - 404 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (33) SR 81 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23686, Project ID 117834Project Allocation 6,732,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $132,000)(34) SR 81 over Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23690, Project ID 117834Project Allocation 5,712,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $112,000)(35) SR 81 over Little Wapwallopen Creek, Dorrance Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23723, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 5,304,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $104,000)(36) SR 81 over Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23691, Project ID 11783420260HB2644PN3625 - 405 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 4,692,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $92,000)(37) SR 81 over Little Wapwallopen Creek, Dorrance Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23721, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 4,692,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $92,000)(38) SR 81 over SR 2020 (Jumper Road), Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 53467, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(39) SR 81 over Liddy Creek, Avoca Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23767, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(40) SR 81 over SR 315, Avoca 20260HB2644PN3625 - 406 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23770, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(41) SR 81 over SR 2020 (Jumper Road), Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 53466, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(42) SR 81 over Township Road 351 (Sunset Drive), Avoca Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23750, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(43) SR 81 over SR 2039 and Gardner Creek, Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 53652, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 407 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(44) SR 81 over SR 315, Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 54627, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(45) SR 81 over SR 2017 (Old Boston Road), Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 52526, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,445(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,445)(46) SR 81 over SR 2017 (Old Boston Road), Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 52528, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(47) SR 81 over Township Road 351 (Sunset Drive), Avoca Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23751, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,44420260HB2644PN3625 - 408 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(48) SR 81 over SR 315, Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 54626, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(49) SR 81 over SR 315, Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 54971, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(50) SR 81 over Mill Creek, Avoca Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23748, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(51) SR 81 over SR 2039 and Gardners Creek, Avoca Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 409 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 53704, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(52) SR 81 over Collins Creek, Avoca Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23765, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(53) SR 81 over Lidys Road, Avoca Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 46005, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(54) SR 81 over SR 315, Avoca Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23773, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(55) SR 81 over SR 315, Avoca 20260HB2644PN3625 - 410 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 54527, Project ID 116496Project Allocation 3,619,444(Base Project Allocation - $3,575,000)(Design and Contingencies - $44,444)(56) SR 81 over Blytheburn Road, Dorrance Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23722, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 3,468,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $68,000)(57) SR 81 over SR 3010, Dorrance Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23714, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 3,060,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(58) SR 81 over I-80 Westbound, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23699, Project ID 112307Project Allocation 2,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Design and Contingencies - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 411 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,000,000)(59) SR 81 over Blytheburn Road, Dorrance Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23720, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 2,652,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $52,000)(60) SR 81 over Little Nescopeck Creek, Butler Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23689, Project ID 117834Project Allocation 2,040,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $40,000)(61) SR 81 over West Foothills Drive, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23688, Project ID 117834Project Allocation 2,040,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $40,000)(62) SR 81 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Hazle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23683, Project ID 117838Project Allocation 1,417,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 412 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,342,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(63) SR 81 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Hazle Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23682, Project ID 117838Project Allocation 1,417,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,342,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(64) SR 81 over Turnback 3040 Township Road, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23694, Project ID 117834Project Allocation 612,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,000)(65) SR 81 over Turnback 3040 Township Road, Butler Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23692, Project ID 117834Project Allocation 612,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $12,000)(66) SR 81 over Nuangola Lake Outlet, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 413 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Key 23726, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(67) SR 81 over Nuangola Lake Outlet, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23727, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(68) SR 81 over Branch of Little Wapwallopen Creek, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23725, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(69) SR 81 over Branch of Little Wapwallopen Creek, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23724, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(70) SR 81 over Lake Blytheburn Outlet, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 414 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Key 23719, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(71) SR 81 over Lake Blytheburn Outlet, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23718, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(72) SR 81 over Big Wapwallopen Creek, Dorrance Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 23715, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(73) SR 81 over Tributary of Wapwallopen Creek, Dorrance Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23711, Project ID 117835Project Allocation 204,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000)(74) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 415 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 45. Lycoming County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1003 over Roaring Run, Gamble Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24810, Project ID 114313Project Allocation 2,211,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,690,000)(Land Allocation - $21,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(2) SR 1017 over Lycoming Creek, Lycoming Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24542, Project ID 118704Project Allocation 182,500(Base Project Allocation - $182,500)(3) SR 14 over Frozen Run, Mcintyre Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 416 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 24505, Project ID 117883Project Allocation 660,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(4) SR 14 over Tributary of Lycoming Creek, Lewis Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24504, Project ID 117882Project Allocation 370,000(Land Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $325,000)(5) SR 15 over Black Hole Creek, Clinton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24510, Project ID 117884Project Allocation 370,000(Land Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $325,000)(6) SR 180 over Township Road 655, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29066, Project ID 109362Project Allocation 560,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $10,000)(7) SR 180 over SR 2014, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 417 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 24675, Project ID 109362Project Allocation 560,000(Base Project Allocation - $550,000)(Design and Contingencies - $10,000)(8) SR 180 over Carpenters Run, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24658, Project ID 109364Project Allocation 173,572(Base Project Allocation - $171,429)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(9) SR 180 over Westbound SR 2044, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24671, Project ID 109364Project Allocation 173,572(Base Project Allocation - $171,429)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(10) SR 180 over Muncy Creek, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24665, Project ID 109364Project Allocation 173,572(Base Project Allocation - $171,429)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(11) SR 180 over SR 220, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24660, Project ID 10936420260HB2644PN3625 - 418 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 173,571(Base Project Allocation - $171,428)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(12) SR 180 over Westbound SR 2061, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24673, Project ID 109364Project Allocation 173,571(Base Project Allocation - $171,428)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(13) SR 180 over Westbound SR 405, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24670, Project ID 109364Project Allocation 173,571(Base Project Allocation - $171,428)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(14) SR 180 over Wolf Run, Muncy Creek Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24663, Project ID 109364Project Allocation 173,571(Base Project Allocation - $171,428)(Design and Contingencies - $2,143)(15) SR 2016 over Lycoming Creek and Ramps, Williamsport City, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24884, Project ID 118704Project Allocation 182,500(Base Project Allocation - $182,500)20260HB2644PN3625 - 419 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) SR 220 over Lick Run, Shrewsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24715, Project ID 117887Project Allocation 1,920,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $70,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(17) SR 220 over Quenshukeny Run, Woodward Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 70380, Project ID 122848Project Allocation 907,000(Base Project Allocation - $757,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(18) SR 44 over Upper Pine Bottom Run, Cummings Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 24584, Project ID 117886Project Allocation 775,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $175,000)(19) SR 44 over SR 220, Nippenose Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25194, Project ID 117885Project Allocation 525,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 420 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(20) SR 44 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Nippenose Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 24568, Project ID 117885Project Allocation 525,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(21) SR 44 over Cedar Run, Brown Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24762, Project ID 117278Project Allocation 302,500(Base Project Allocation - $242,500)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(22) SR 44 over Pine Creek, Brown Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 24580, Project ID 117278Project Allocation 302,500(Base Project Allocation - $242,500)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(23) SR 864 over Tributary of Mill Creek, Mill Creek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24781, Project ID 117283Project Allocation 660,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 421 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(24) SR 864 over Tributary of East Mill Creek, Upper Fairfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24780, Project ID 117284Project Allocation 660,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(25) SR 864 over Tributary of East Mill Creek, Upper Fairfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24779, Project ID 117282Project Allocation 560,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(26) SR 973 over Tributary of Tombs Run, Watson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 24784, Project ID 110180Project Allocation 2,010,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,000)(Land Allocation - $90,000)(Design and Contingencies - $620,000)(27) Various State Bridges over 20260HB2644PN3625 - 422 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 46. McKean County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Port Allegany Borough, SR 7405 over Lillibridge Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25621, Project ID 118630Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 3002 over Two Mile Run, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25503, Project ID 123120Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(2) SR 3003 over Lanigan Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 423 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sergeant Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25506, Project ID 123156Project Allocation 1,920,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(3) SR 3003 over Lanigan Run, Sergeant Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25506, Project ID 119914Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(4) SR 346 over Willow Creek, Corydon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25404, Project ID 119913Project Allocation 2,120,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(5) SR 446 over Branch of Cole Creek, Keating Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25436, Project ID 120511Project Allocation 1,891,66420260HB2644PN3625 - 424 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $955,242)(Land Allocation - $115,926)(Design and Contingencies - $820,496)(6) SR 46 over Branch of Kendall Creek, Foster Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25270, Project ID 123119Project Allocation 1,190,000(Base Project Allocation - $370,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(7) SR 59 over Kinzua Creek, Keating Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25279, Project ID 120002Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(8) SR 6 over Pig Tail Alley Creek, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25198, Project ID 119911Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(9) SR 646 over Pennbrook Run, Foster Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25460, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 425 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 113149Project Allocation 1,055,000(Base Project Allocation - $245,000)(Land Allocation - $110,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(10) SR 7206 over Bolivar Run, Foster Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 63929, Project ID 122187Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(11) SR 7209 over Tributary of Potato Creek, Keating Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 63972, Project ID 122185Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(12) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 47. Mercer County.20260HB2644PN3625 - 426 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1014 over Long Run, New Vernon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25928, Project ID 120600Project Allocation 964,400(Base Project Allocation - $764,400)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(2) SR 18 over Big Run, Coolspring Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25865, Project ID 84913Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(3) SR 18 over Tributary of Wolf Creek, Coolspring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 25825, Project ID 84913Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 427 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) SR 18 over Black Run, Coolspring Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25827, Project ID 84913Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(5) SR 18 over Yellow Creek, Coolspring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 25717, Project ID 84913Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(6) SR 18 over Tributary of Otter Creek, Coolspring Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25649, Project ID 84913Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(7) SR 18 over Tributary of Shenango River, Coolspring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 25708, Project ID 84913Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(8) SR 19 over Tributary of Otter 20260HB2644PN3625 - 428 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Fairview Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25653, Project ID 120598Project Allocation 1,325,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(9) SR 19 over Tributary of Shenango River, Perry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 25657, Project ID 1725Project Allocation 950,450(Base Project Allocation - $640,000)(Land Allocation - $7,450)(Design and Contingencies - $303,000)(10) SR 19 over Johnston Run, Springfield Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 25641, Project ID 84914Project Allocation 661,989(Land Allocation - $121,000)(Design and Contingencies - $540,989)(11) SR 2013 over Munnell Run, Mercer Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25957, Project ID 118216Project Allocation 435,000(Land Allocation - $115,000)(Design and Contingencies - $320,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 429 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) SR 2014 over Cool Spring, Findley Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25959, Project ID 1823Project Allocation 1,531,751(Base Project Allocation - $867,751)(Land Allocation - $154,000)(Design and Contingencies - $510,000)(13) SR 2017 over Cool Spring Creek, Fairview Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25968, Project ID 1861Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(14) SR 2024 over Branch of Wolf Creek, Worth Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25974, Project ID 120597Project Allocation 160,000(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(15) SR 208 over Johnston Run, Springfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25837, Project ID 120599Project Allocation 150,000(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(16) SR 376 over SR 81, Shenango Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25695, Project ID 12014220260HB2644PN3625 - 430 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 14,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $13,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(17) SR 376 over SR 82, Shenango Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25692, Project ID 120142Project Allocation 14,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $13,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(18) SR 376 over Township Road 369 (Hewitt Road), Shenango Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25688, Project ID 120143Project Allocation 4,423,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,048,000)(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(19) SR 376 over Township Road 369 (Hewitt Road), Shenango Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25689, Project ID 120143Project Allocation 4,423,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,048,000)(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 431 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (20) SR 551 over Branch of Big Run, Shenango Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25885, Project ID 123193Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(21) SR 58 over Wolf Creek, Grove City Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25680, Project ID 58003Project Allocation 2,838,813(Base Project Allocation - $2,604,313)(Land Allocation - $57,500)(Design and Contingencies - $177,000)(22) SR 62 over SR 79, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25716, Project ID 58052Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(23) SR 62 over Fox Run, Jackson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25719, Project ID 88488Project Allocation 150,000(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(24) SR 718 over Old Canal Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 432 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 City of Sharon, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 25888, Project ID 117537Project Allocation 935,000(Design and Contingencies - $935,000)(25) SR 79 over SR 80, Findley Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25737, Project ID 120145Project Allocation 4,530,900(Base Project Allocation - $4,155,900)(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(26) SR 79 over SR 80, Findley Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 25739, Project ID 120145Project Allocation 4,530,900(Base Project Allocation - $4,155,900)(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(27) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 48. Mifflin County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State20260HB2644PN3625 - 433 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2005 over Kishacoquillas Creek, Lewistown Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26535, Project ID 123139Project Allocation 2,030,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,210,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(2) SR 22 over Beaver Dam Run, Wayne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26362, Project ID 119987Project Allocation 1,923,838(Base Project Allocation - $1,923,838)(3) SR 22 over Carters Run, Wayne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26353, Project ID 119985Project Allocation 1,920,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 434 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,100,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(4) SR 322 over Branch of Laurel Creek, Armagh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26414, Project ID 119993Project Allocation 1,470,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(5) SR 655 over Kishacoquillas Creek, Menno Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26465, Project ID 119994Project Allocation 1,649,118(Base Project Allocation - $895,539)(Land Allocation - $115,926)(Design and Contingencies - $637,653)(6) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 49. Monroe County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over 20260HB2644PN3625 - 435 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2012 over Schuylkill River, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 31034, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 1,144,469(Base Project Allocation - $1,003,000)(Design and Contingencies - $141,469)(2) SR 2012 over Mountain Run Creek, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26762, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(3) SR 2012 over I-80, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9027, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(4) SR 2012 over Sandspring Run, Ashland Borough, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 436 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 9024, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(5) SR 2012 over Tributary of Pocono Creek, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26873, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(6) SR 2012 over Little Catawissa Creek, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30854, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(7) SR 2012 over Tributary of Schuylkill River, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30688, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(8) SR 2012 over Panther Creek, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30657, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 437 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(9) SR 2012 over Reading Blue Mountain and Northern Railroad, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30642, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(10) SR 2012 over Tributary of Lost Creek, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30504, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(11) SR 2012 over Mahanoy Creek, Ashland Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30501, Project ID 113494Project Allocation 576,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $76,000)(12) SR 3002 over Aquashicola Creek, Eldred Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26996, Project ID 9430120260HB2644PN3625 - 438 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 288,260(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $68,260)(13) SR 447 over Sambo Creek, Stroud Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26849, Project ID 92081Project Allocation 520,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(14) SR 611 over Swiftwater Creek, Pocono Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26881, Project ID 120985Project Allocation 6,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(15) SR 80 over SR 3023 and Pocono Creek, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26716, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 12,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $10,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)20260HB2644PN3625 - 439 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(16) SR 80 over SR 3023 and Pocono Creek, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26715, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 12,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $10,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(17) SR 80 over Township Road 481 (Stadden Road), Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26711, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 7,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(18) SR 80 over Township Road 481 (Stadden Road), Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26710, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 7,445,91520260HB2644PN3625 - 440 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(19) SR 80 over I-80, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26679, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 7,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(20) SR 80 over I-80, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26677, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 5,970,565(Base Project Allocation - $3,524,650)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(21) SR 80 over I-80, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27066, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 5,945,91520260HB2644PN3625 - 441 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $3,500,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(22) SR 80 over SR 8010 Ramp G, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26680, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 4,945,915(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(23) SR 80 over I-80, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27048, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 4,857,915(Base Project Allocation - $2,412,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(24) SR 80 over SR 2005, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26721, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 4,495,91520260HB2644PN3625 - 442 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $2,050,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(25) SR 80 over SR 2005, Hamilton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 26719, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 4,495,915(Base Project Allocation - $2,050,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(26) SR 80 over Wigwam Run, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26720, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 3,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(27) SR 80 over Tributary of Pocono Creek, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26718, Project ID 11235120260HB2644PN3625 - 443 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(28) SR 80 over Reeders Run, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26714, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 3,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(29) SR 80 over Rocky Run, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26713, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 3,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(30) SR 80 over Reeders Run, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26712, Project ID 11235120260HB2644PN3625 - 444 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(31) SR 80 over Tributary of Pocono Creek, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26706, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 3,445,915(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(32) SR 80 over Tributary of Pocono Creek, Hamilton Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 26709, Project ID 112351Project Allocation 2,945,915(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $716,667)(Design and Contingencies - $1,729,248)(33) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 445 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 50. Montgomery County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Norristown, Arch Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28222Project Allocation 105,150(Base Project Allocation - $93,583)(Land Allocation - $1,052)(Design and Contingencies - $10,515)(2) Norristown, Basin Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28214Project Allocation 2,420,038(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,038)(Land Allocation - $84,000)(Design and Contingencies - $336,000)(3) Lower Salford Township, Bob Bea Lane (Sturgis Road) over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64515Project Allocation 810,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(4) Lower Gwynedd Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 446 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Brights Lane over Tributary of Willow Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64486Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(5) Lower Gwynedd Township, Cambridge Drive over Trewellyn Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 57510Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(6) Lower Salford, Cressman Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64511Project Allocation 810,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(7) Souderton Borough, East Summit Street over SEPTA Tracks, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28234, Project ID 15994Project Allocation 2,430,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,430,000)(8) Lower Gwynedd Township, Fairland Drive over Tributary 20260HB2644PN3625 - 447 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Trewellyn Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64493Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(9) Norristown, Fornance Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28223Project Allocation 2,417,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,087,000)(Land Allocation - $66,000)(Design and Contingencies - $264,000)(10) Lower Gwynedd Township, Forrest Hill Drive over Willow Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 57511Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(11) Lower Salford Township, Freed Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64508Project Allocation 810,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(12) Lower Salford Township, Groff's Mill Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 448 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 64517Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(13) Lower Gwynedd Township, Hunt Seat Drive over Willow Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 57512Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(14) Montgomery Township and Lansdale Borough, Knapp Road over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64538Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(15) Montgomery Township and Lansdale Borough, Knapp Road over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64530Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 449 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) Lower Salford Township, Landis Road over Tributary of West Branch of Skippack Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64510Project Allocation 2,125,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $425,000)(17) Lower Salford Township, LCBC Drive (Main Street) over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64518Project Allocation 875,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Design and Contingencies - $175,000)(18) Norristown, Main Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28227Project Allocation 139,760(Base Project Allocation - $124,386)(Land Allocation - $1,398)(Design and Contingencies - $13,976)(19) Norristown, Marshall Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28218Project Allocation 180,650(Base Project Allocation - $160,779)20260HB2644PN3625 - 450 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $1,806)(Design and Contingencies - $18,065)(20) Norristown, Marshall Street over Stony Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28217Project Allocation 208,400(Base Project Allocation - $179,224)(Land Allocation - $4,168)(Design and Contingencies - $25,008)(21) Lower Salford Township, Masters Way over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64513Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(22) Lower Salford Township, Moyer Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64507Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(23) Norristown, Oak Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28215Project Allocation 102,925(Base Project Allocation - $91,604)(Land Allocation - $1,029)(Design and Contingencies - $10,292)20260HB2644PN3625 - 451 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (24) Lower Gwynedd Township, Peterman Lane over Unnamed Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64492Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(25) Lower Salford Township, Shadynook Road over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64509Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(26) Lower Salford Township, Shirley Drive over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64514Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(27) Whitemarsh Township, SR 7046 over Wissahickon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27948, Project ID 72355Project Allocation 7,875,700(Base Project Allocation - $7,137,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $713,700)20260HB2644PN3625 - 452 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (28) Whitemarsh Township, SR 7046 over Spring Mill Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 55684, Project ID 16577Project Allocation 3,122,600(Base Project Allocation - $2,816,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $281,600)(29) Marlborough Township, SR 7210 over Macoby Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28078, Project ID 81926Project Allocation 3,382,400(Base Project Allocation - $2,744,000)(Land Allocation - $80,000)(Design and Contingencies - $558,400)(30) Upper Hanover Township, SR 7219 over Macoby Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28109, Project ID 81895Project Allocation 1,977,846(Base Project Allocation - $1,977,846)(31) Upper Hanover Township, SR 7219 over Macoby Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28110, Project ID 81922Project Allocation 780,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 453 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(32) Worcester Township, SR 7226 over Stream, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64627, Project ID 81928Project Allocation 2,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(33) Lower Salford Township, Sumneytown Pike over Branch of Skippack Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27184, Project ID 59522Project Allocation 810,000(Base Project Allocation - $650,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(34) Upper Gwynedd Township, Sumneytown Pike over Wissahickon Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27892, Project ID 116254Project Allocation 4,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(35) Lower Salford Township, Turnberry Circle over Stream, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 454 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64512Project Allocation 625,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $125,000)(36) Norristown, Washington Street over Sawmill Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28221Project Allocation 2,360,004(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,004)(Land Allocation - $72,000)(Design and Contingencies - $288,000)(37) Lower Gwynedd Township, Woodbridge Road over Willow Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 64490Project Allocation 1,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $450,000)(38) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges20260HB2644PN3625 - 455 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) SR 1004 over West Branch of Neshaminy Creek, Hatfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27532, Project ID 82090Project Allocation 627,000(Base Project Allocation - $420,000)(Land Allocation - $7,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(2) SR 1023 over Ridge Valley Creek, Salford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27555, Project ID 74526Project Allocation 1,160,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(3) SR 1028 over Goshenhoppen Creek, Upper Frederick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27563, Project ID 72668Project Allocation 307,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $7,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(4) SR 1046 over West Branch of Perkiomen Creek, Douglass Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27580, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 456 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 15683Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(5) SR 1046 over Branch of West Branch of Perkiomen Creek, Upper Hanover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27581, Project ID 104880Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(6) SR 1050 over Swamp Creek, Douglass Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27583, Project ID 15795Project Allocation 552,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $52,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(7) SR 113 over Branch of Skippack Creek, Skippack Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27309, Project ID 82094Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 457 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(8) SR 113 over Tributary of Schuylkill River, Upper Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27306, Project ID 118005Project Allocation 450,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(9) SR 152 over Branch of Sandy Run, Upper Dublin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27317, Project ID 104883Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(10) SR 152 over Branch of Little Neshaminy Creek, Horsham Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27320, Project ID 88402Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(11) SR 152 over Park Creek, Horsham Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27319, Project ID 1643220260HB2644PN3625 - 458 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 447,000(Base Project Allocation - $240,000)(Land Allocation - $7,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(12) SR 2001 over Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27588Project Allocation 5,195,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,700,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $470,000)(13) SR 2013 over Poquessing Creek, Lower Moreland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27601, Project ID 104884Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(14) SR 2018 over SEPTA, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 42650Project Allocation 5,085,000(Base Project Allocation - $4,600,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $460,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 459 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) SR 2018 over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27618Project Allocation 5,058,600(Base Project Allocation - $4,576,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $457,600)(16) SR 2018 over Sandy Run, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27619, Project ID 104887Project Allocation 5,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $4,000,000)(17) SR 2018 over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Upper Dublin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27622, Project ID 50740Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(18) SR 2020 over Branch of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 460 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Wissahickon Creek, Lower Gwynedd Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27626, Project ID 68585Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(19) SR 2028 over Sandy Run, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27646Project Allocation 3,668,200(Base Project Allocation - $3,312,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $331,200)(20) SR 2030 over Sandy Run, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27650Project Allocation 9,135,640(Base Project Allocation - $8,282,400)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $828,240)(21) SR 263 over Branch of Pennypack Creek, Upper Moreland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27350, Project ID 10488520260HB2644PN3625 - 461 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(22) SR 3001 over Branch of Skippack Creek, Skippack Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27688, Project ID 104925Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(23) SR 3003 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27691Project Allocation 5,137,800(Base Project Allocation - $4,648,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $464,800)(24) SR 3003 over Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27690, Project ID 16728Project Allocation 3,420,260(Base Project Allocation - $3,086,600)(Land Allocation - $25,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 462 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $308,660)(25) SR 3005 over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27694Project Allocation 700,840(Base Project Allocation - $614,400)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $61,440)(26) SR 3011 over Spring Mill Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27704, Project ID 15891Project Allocation 1,275,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $750,000)(27) SR 3014 over Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27715Project Allocation 7,813,880(Base Project Allocation - $7,080,800)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $708,080)(28) SR 3014 over Loraine Run, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27714Project Allocation 1,349,40020260HB2644PN3625 - 463 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,204,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,400)(29) SR 3014 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27713Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(30) SR 3034 over Mill Creek, Lower Merion Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27745, Project ID 104929Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(31) SR 3045 over Tributary of Schuylkill River, Lower Merion Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27758, Project ID 89904Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(32) SR 3058 over Spring Mill Creek, Whitemarsh Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 464 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 27771Project Allocation 4,706,600(Base Project Allocation - $4,256,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $425,600)(33) SR 3058 over Mill Race to Schuylkill, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27772, Project ID 104882Project Allocation 1,275,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $750,000)(34) SR 309 over Pennsylvania Avenue and SEPTA, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 45251Project Allocation 70,295,000(Base Project Allocation - $69,575,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $695,000)(35) SR 309 over Camp Hill Road, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27372Project Allocation 30,632,400(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 465 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $30,304,400)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $303,000)(36) SR 309 over Sandy Run, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27371Project Allocation 6,994,600(Base Project Allocation - $6,336,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $633,600)(37) SR 4002 over Crossmans Run, Upper Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27774, Project ID 16730Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(38) SR 4008 over Pottstown Expressway, Skippack Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27780, Project ID 104901Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(39) SR 4009 over Tributary of Perkiomen Creek, Skippack Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 466 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 27794, Project ID 104886Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(40) SR 4014 over Lodal Creek, Limerick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27804, Project ID 82092Project Allocation 467,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $7,000)(Design and Contingencies - $160,000)(41) SR 4017 over Branch of Mingo Creek, Limerick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27809, Project ID 104956Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(42) SR 4031 over Branch of Schuylkill River, Pottstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27849, Project ID 109066Project Allocation 1,300,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 467 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(43) SR 4037 over Branch of Manatawny Creek, Pottstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27858, Project ID 104881Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(44) SR 4038 over Storm Sewer, Pottstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27861, Project ID 104903Project Allocation 2,875,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)(45) SR 4038 over Storm Sewer, Pottstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 45661, Project ID 104936Project Allocation 2,875,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,250,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 468 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (46) SR 4040 over Branch of Minister Creek, Douglass Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27864, Project ID 110761Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $240,000)(Land Allocation - $160,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(47) SR 4041 over Branch of Schuylkill River, Lower Providence Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27866, Project ID 104905Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(48) SR 463 over Branch of Neshaminy Creek, Hatfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27457, Project ID 104913Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(49) SR 611 over Pennsylvania Turnpike Ramp, Upper Moreland Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 469 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 27506, Project ID 57176Project Allocation 3,500,000(Design and Contingencies - $3,500,000)(50) SR 63 over Branch of Park Creek, Lower Gwynedd Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27178, Project ID 82117Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(51) SR 63 over Wissahickon Creek, Lansdale Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27181, Project ID 104942Project Allocation 1,285,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(52) SR 73 over Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27209Project Allocation 7,678,360(Base Project Allocation - $6,957,600)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $695,760)20260HB2644PN3625 - 470 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (53) SR 73 over East Branch of Perkiomen Creek, Perkiomen Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 27197, Project ID 82096Project Allocation 890,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $180,000)(54) SR 73 over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27210Project Allocation 638,800(Base Project Allocation - $558,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $55,800)(55) SR 73 over Branch of Wissahickon Creek, Whitemarsh Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 27208Project Allocation 553,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $48,000)(56) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 471 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 51. Montour County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Cooper Township, Township Road 412 over Sechler Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28437, Project ID 117506Project Allocation 242,250(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $11,250)(Design and Contingencies - $81,000)(2) Limestone Township, Township Road 422 over Limestone Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28451, Project ID 117510Project Allocation 404,250(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $12,750)(Design and Contingencies - $91,500)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 254 over Mud Creek, Derry Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 472 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28363, Project ID 88800Project Allocation 9,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,100,000)(Land Allocation - $400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,350,000)(2) SR 54 Underpass over Market Street, Danville Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 40987, Project ID 107128Project Allocation 914,350(Base Project Allocation - $332,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $532,350)(3) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 52. Northampton County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Glendon Borough, SR 7406 over Lehigh Canal and Norfolk Southern Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28923, Project ID 11740020260HB2644PN3625 - 473 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 469,000(Design and Contingencies - $469,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1015 over Martins Creek, Bangor Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28678, Project ID 85931Project Allocation 790,215(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $27,000)(Design and Contingencies - $263,215)(2) SR 1016 over Tributary of Bushkill Creek, Plainfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28680, Project ID 12106Project Allocation 621,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $31,000)(Design and Contingencies - $90,000)(3) SR 1016 over Waltz Creek, Plainfield Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 474 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 28682, Project ID 123495Project Allocation 320,000(Base Project Allocation - $180,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(4) SR 145 over Bertsch Creek, Lehigh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28556, Project ID 123480Project Allocation 3,900,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(5) SR 145 over Schaefer Run, Lehigh Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 23342, Project ID 123480Project Allocation 3,900,000(Base Project Allocation - $3,250,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(6) SR 191 over Tributary of Delaware River, City of Easton, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28622, Project ID 123489Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 475 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) SR 191 over Tributary of Delaware River, City of Easton, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28623, Project ID 123489Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(8) SR 191 over Tributary of Bushkill Creek, City of Easton, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28612, Project ID 123489Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(9) SR 191 over Schoeneck Creek, City of Easton, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28564, Project ID 123489Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(10) SR 191 over Tributary of Schoeneck Creek, City of Easton, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28562, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 476 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 123489Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(11) SR 2001 over East Branch of Saucon Creek, Lower Saucon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28706, Project ID 119940Project Allocation 420,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(12) SR 2017 over Schoeneck Creek, Palmer Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28733, Project ID 123498Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(13) SR 2025 over Little Bushkill Creek, Stockertown Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28739, Project ID 91931Project Allocation 530,000(Base Project Allocation - $350,000)(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $170,000)(14) SR 22 over Bushkill Drive, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 477 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 City of Easton, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28491, Project ID 123503Project Allocation 2,708,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(15) SR 33 over I-78, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23151, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 288,000(Base Project Allocation - $168,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(16) SR 33 over SR 1002, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23189, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 180,000(Base Project Allocation - $105,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(17) SR 33 over SR 1002, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 23186, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 180,000(Base Project Allocation - $105,000)(Design and Contingencies - $75,000)(18) SR 33 over SR 248, City of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 478 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28497, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 144,000(Base Project Allocation - $84,000)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(19) SR 33 over SR 248, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28498, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 120,000(Base Project Allocation - $70,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(20) SR 33 over Schoeneck Creek, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28500, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $25,000)(21) SR 33 over Schoeneck Creek, City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28499, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $25,000)(22) SR 33 over Township Road 516 (Van Buren Road), City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 479 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 28502, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $65,000)(Design and Contingencies - $35,000)(23) SR 33 over Township Road 516 (Van Buren Road), City of Bethlehem, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28501, Project ID 120966Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $65,000)(Design and Contingencies - $35,000)(24) SR 512 over Martins Creek, Bangor Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28613, Project ID 92007Project Allocation 804,565(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $27,000)(Design and Contingencies - $277,565)(25) SR 78 over SR 2014, Glendon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41043, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)(Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(26) SR 78 over SR 2012, Glendon 20260HB2644PN3625 - 480 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28547, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)(Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(27) SR 78 over Township Road 430 and Morgans Run, Glendon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28551, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)(Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(28) SR 78 over Ramps on SR 8018, Glendon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41283, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)(Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(29) SR 78 over Ramps on SR 8018, Glendon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 41127, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)20260HB2644PN3625 - 481 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(30) SR 78 over Township Road 430 and Morgans Run, Glendon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28552, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)(Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(31) SR 78 over SR 2012, Glendon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 28549, Project ID 116518Project Allocation 609,567(Base Project Allocation - $175,999)(Land Allocation - $108,392)(Design and Contingencies - $325,176)(32) SR 946 over West Branch of Monocacy Creek, Lehigh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28650, Project ID 123486Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(33) SR 946 over Tributary of Bertsch Creek, Lehigh 20260HB2644PN3625 - 482 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28573, Project ID 123486Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(34) SR 946 over Tributary of Freys Run, Lehigh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28715, Project ID 123486Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(35) SR 946 over Monocacy Creek, Lehigh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 56790, Project ID 123486Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)(Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(36) SR 946 over Indian Creek, Lehigh Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 28645, Project ID 123486Project Allocation 1,808,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $108,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 483 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $800,000)(37) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 53. Northumberland County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Lewis Township, Township Road 672 over Glade Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29339, Project ID 118343Project Allocation 371,245(Base Project Allocation - $371,245)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 11 over West Branch of Susquehanna River, Point Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 28954, Project ID 117615Project Allocation 550,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 484 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(2) SR 147 over Shamokin Creek, City of Sunbury, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29044, Project ID 115583Project Allocation 530,000(Base Project Allocation - $460,000)(Design and Contingencies - $70,000)(3) SR 2013 over SR 2013, Shamokin Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29199, Project ID 121022Project Allocation 258,000(Base Project Allocation - $258,000)(4) SR 225 over Mahanoy Creek, Little Mahanoy Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29089, Project ID 122336Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $175,000)(5) SR 3010 over Tributary of Mahantango Creek, Upper Mahanoy Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29243, Project ID 106751Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(6) Various State Bridges over 20260HB2644PN3625 - 485 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 54. Perry County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Tyrone Township, Barkley Road over McCabe Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29748, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(2) Oliver Township, Bloomfield Avenue over Little Buffalo Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7219Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(3) Jackson Township, Book Road over Bull Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 7219Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(4) Tyrone Township, Ernest Road over Montour Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29753, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 600,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 486 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(5) Tyrone Township, Kennedy Valley Road over McCabe Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29752, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(6) Jackson Township, SR 7219 over Mccabe Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29748, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 299,775(Base Project Allocation - $195,625)(Land Allocation - $11,750)(Design and Contingencies - $92,400)(7) Jackson Township, SR 7219 over Little Juniata Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29761, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 299,775(Base Project Allocation - $195,625)(Land Allocation - $11,750)(Design and Contingencies - $92,400)(8) Jackson Township, SR 7219 over Little Buffalo Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29724, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 299,775(Base Project Allocation - $195,625)(Land Allocation - $11,750)20260HB2644PN3625 - 487 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $92,400)(9) Jackson Township, SR 7219 over Bull Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29714, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 299,775(Base Project Allocation - $195,625)(Land Allocation - $11,750)(Design and Contingencies - $92,400)(10) Jackson Township, SR 7219 over McCabe Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29752, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 299,775(Base Project Allocation - $195,625)(Land Allocation - $11,750)(Design and Contingencies - $92,400)(11) Jackson Township, SR 7219 over Montour Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29753, Project ID 120273Project Allocation 299,775(Base Project Allocation - $195,625)(Land Allocation - $11,750)(Design and Contingencies - $92,400)(12) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 488 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1007 over Tributary of Big Buffalo Creek, Oliver Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29586, Project ID 100364Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(2) SR 1007 over Tributary of Big Buffalo Creek, Oliver Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29585, Project ID 87476Project Allocation 738,600(Base Project Allocation - $88,600)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 1010 over Tributary of Wildcat Creek, Liverpool Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29590, Project ID 101138Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 489 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) SR 1010 over Wild Cat Run, Greenwood Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29588, Project ID 101126Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) SR 1012 over Wildcat Run, Greenwood Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29595, Project ID 90718Project Allocation 719,342(Base Project Allocation - $69,342)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 1015 over Tributary of Juniata River, Howe Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29603, Project ID 90332Project Allocation 2,407,068(Base Project Allocation - $1,344,000)(Land Allocation - $240,000)(Design and Contingencies - $823,068)(7) SR 1015 over Howe Run, Howe Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29597, Project ID 11725120260HB2644PN3625 - 490 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,578,960(Base Project Allocation - $977,500)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $581,460)(8) SR 1015 over Tributary of Juniata River, Howe Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29599, Project ID 101111Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(9) SR 1015 over Tributary of Juniata River, Howe Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29601, Project ID 90720Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(10) SR 1015 over Tributary of Juniata River, Howe Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29602, Project ID 90907Project Allocation 1,007,325(Base Project Allocation - $437,318)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,007)(11) SR 1015 over Cocolamus Creek, Greenwood Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 491 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29607, Project ID 117691Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(12) SR 1016 over Hunters Run, Buffalo Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29609, Project ID 101116Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(13) SR 1018 over Howe Run, Howe Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29611, Project ID 101121Project Allocation 710,297(Base Project Allocation - $60,297)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 1019 over Tributary of Ackers Run, Buffalo Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29616, Project ID 100377Project Allocation 952,739(Base Project Allocation - $302,739)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(15) SR 104 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 492 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Susquehanna River, Liverpool Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29523, Project ID 87466Project Allocation 2,710,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(16) SR 11 over SR 274, Duncannon Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29432, Project ID 100266Project Allocation 4,354,742(Base Project Allocation - $3,704,742)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(17) SR 11 over Shermans Creek and Township Road 309, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29429, Project ID 100250Project Allocation 3,225,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(18) SR 11 over Fisher Street Ramp, Penn Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 493 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 29431, Project ID 100259Project Allocation 2,475,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(19) SR 11 over Township Road 510 (Butchershop Road), Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29435, Project ID 100277Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 11 over Cove Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29428, Project ID 99950Project Allocation 801,949(Base Project Allocation - $151,949)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(21) SR 17 over Tributary of Panther Creek, Saville Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29459, Project ID 90704Project Allocation 2,760,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 494 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(22) SR 17 over Branch of Bixler Run, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29452, Project ID 90703Project Allocation 2,710,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(23) SR 17 over Panther Creek, Saville Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29457, Project ID 100281Project Allocation 1,508,613(Base Project Allocation - $858,613)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 17 over Tributary of Panther Creek, Saville Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29458, Project ID 99969Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 495 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(25) SR 17 over Tributary of Cocolamus Creek, Greenwood Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29466, Project ID 87473Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(26) SR 17 over Tributary of Susquehanna River, Liverpool Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29467, Project ID 100285Project Allocation 1,100,000(Base Project Allocation - $450,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(27) SR 17 over Tributary of Cocolamus Creek, Greenwood Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29465, Project ID 99893Project Allocation 850,196(Base Project Allocation - $200,196)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(28) SR 2005 over Little Juniata Creek, Wheatfield Township, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 496 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29631, Project ID 79072Project Allocation 2,710,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(29) SR 22 over Cocolamus Creek, Greenwood Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29473, Project ID 117225Project Allocation 3,174,360(Base Project Allocation - $3,010,560)(Land Allocation - $37,800)(Design and Contingencies - $126,000)(30) SR 22 over SR 1020, Buffalo Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29488, Project ID 100231Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(31) SR 22 over Cocolamus Creek, Greenwood Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29475, Project ID 117225Project Allocation 604,64020260HB2644PN3625 - 497 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $573,440)(Land Allocation - $7,200)(Design and Contingencies - $24,000)(32) SR 233 over Branch of Montour Creek, Tyrone Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29527, Project ID 99976Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(33) SR 274 over Tributary of Cisna Run, Southwest Madison Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29543, Project ID 87478Project Allocation 2,710,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(34) SR 274 over Tributary of Shermans Creek, Toboyne Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29531, Project ID 90712Project Allocation 2,710,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,960,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 498 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(35) SR 274 over Tributary of Shermans Creek, Toboyne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29536, Project ID 87488Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(36) SR 274 over Branch of Shermans Creek, Toboyne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29529, Project ID 87489Project Allocation 1,550,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 274 over Spring Run, Blain Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29540, Project ID 99979Project Allocation 1,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(38) SR 274 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 499 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Shermans Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29539, Project ID 99963Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 274 over Tail Race, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29545, Project ID 101102Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 274 over Tributary of Shermans Creek, Toboyne Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29537, Project ID 90714Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(41) SR 274 over Montour Creek, Tyrone Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29548, Project ID 100359Project Allocation 1,150,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 500 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(42) SR 3001 over Shultz Creek, Toboyne Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29634, Project ID 20578Project Allocation 817,334(Base Project Allocation - $167,334)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(43) SR 3002 over Horse Valley Run, Toboyne Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29636, Project ID 100391Project Allocation 1,337,004(Base Project Allocation - $951,004)(Land Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $341,000)(44) SR 3006 over Shermans Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29655, Project ID 100421Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(45) SR 3008 over Tributary of Shermans Creek, Southwest Madison Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 501 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 29659, Project ID 100429Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(46) SR 3011 over Laurel Run, Tyrone Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29664, Project ID 81012Project Allocation 2,990,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,240,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(47) SR 3013 over Bixler's Run, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29667, Project ID 106888Project Allocation 400,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(48) SR 3016 over Tributary of Shermans Creek, Carroll Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29672, Project ID 91396Project Allocation 1,557,955(Base Project Allocation - $907,955)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 502 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (49) SR 34 over Juniata River, Howe Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29509, Project ID 117545Project Allocation 37,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $35,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $2,000,000)(50) SR 34 over Little Juniata Creek, Centre Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29503, Project ID 117467Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(51) SR 34 over Tributary of Little Juniata Creek, Centre Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29502, Project ID 90709Project Allocation 750,808(Base Project Allocation - $100,808)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(52) SR 4002 over Tributary of Buffalo Creek, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29678, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 503 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 91402Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(53) SR 4002 over Tributary of Buffalo Creek, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29678, Project ID 109333Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(54) SR 4004 over Tributary of Buffalo Creek, Saville Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29684, Project ID 100444Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(55) SR 4010 over Little Buffalo Creek, Oliver Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29701, Project ID 100476Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(56) SR 74 over Baken Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 504 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Spring Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29515, Project ID 100304Project Allocation 1,927,751(Base Project Allocation - $1,531,004)(Land Allocation - $55,000)(Design and Contingencies - $341,747)(57) SR 74 over Green Valley Run, Spring Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29511, Project ID 101094Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(58) SR 74 over Mill Race, Spring Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29513, Project ID 90711Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(59) SR 74 over Tributary of Panther Creek, Saville Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29522, Project ID 9995920260HB2644PN3625 - 505 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(60) SR 74 over Green Valley Run, Spring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29510, Project ID 99896Project Allocation 756,545(Base Project Allocation - $106,545)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(61) SR 74 over McCabe Run, Spring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29512, Project ID 100300Project Allocation 700,000(Base Project Allocation - $50,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(62) SR 849 over Horting Run, Miller Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29557, Project ID 99898Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(63) SR 849 over US 11, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 506 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 29558, Project ID 100360Project Allocation 1,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(64) SR 850 over Baker Creek, Spring Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29568, Project ID 101131Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(65) SR 850 over Tributary of Bixler Run, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29563, Project ID 101096Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(66) SR 850 over Tributary of Laurel Run, Northeast Madison Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29561, Project ID 99947Project Allocation 850,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 507 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(67) SR 850 over Tributary of Bakers Creek, Spring Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29569, Project ID 101104Project Allocation 697,483(Base Project Allocation - $47,483)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(68) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 55. Philadelphia County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) City of Philadelphia, 16th Street over Conrail, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39107Project Allocation 9,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,640,000)(Design and Contingencies - $960,000)(2) City of Philadelphia, 19th Street over Conrail, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 3911420260HB2644PN3625 - 508 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 9,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,640,000)(Design and Contingencies - $960,000)(3) City of Philadelphia, 20th Street over Conrail, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39125Project Allocation 8,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $7,560,000)(Design and Contingencies - $840,000)(4) City of Philadelphia, 21st Street over Conrail, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39129Project Allocation 11,223,291(Base Project Allocation - $10,100,962)(Design and Contingencies - $1,122,329)(5) City of Philadelphia, 62nd Street over Amtrak, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39168Project Allocation 13,570,968(Base Project Allocation - $12,213,871)(Design and Contingencies - $1,357,097)(6) City of Philadelphia, 68th Street over CSX Railroad, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 509 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39248Project Allocation 10,825,000(Base Project Allocation - $9,742,500)(Design and Contingencies - $1,082,500)(7) City of Philadelphia, 70th Street over SEPTA, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39246Project Allocation 1,504,912(Base Project Allocation - $1,354,421)(Design and Contingencies - $150,491)(8) City of Philadelphia, Gravers Lane over SEPTA, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39239Project Allocation 6,654,801(Base Project Allocation - $5,989,321)(Design and Contingencies - $665,480)(9) City of Philadelphia, Krewstown Road over Pennypack Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39210, Project ID 16785Project Allocation 15,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $12,500,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 510 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $2,500,000)(10) City of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania Avenue over CSX Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39173Project Allocation 28,982,085(Base Project Allocation - $26,083,877)(Design and Contingencies - $2,898,209)(11) City of Philadelphia, Poplar Street over CSX Railroad, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39211, Project ID 17195Project Allocation 12,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $10,800,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,200,000)(12) City of Philadelphia, Sherwood Avenue over Indian Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39194Project Allocation 1,906,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,715,400)(Design and Contingencies - $190,600)(13) City of Philadelphia, SR 3014 over Amtrak, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 511 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 38970, Project ID 17678Project Allocation 7,879,300(Base Project Allocation - $5,500,000)(Land Allocation - $2,400)(Design and Contingencies - $2,376,900)(14) City of Philadelphia, SR 3014 over Amtrak and SEPTA, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 38968, Project ID 17678Project Allocation 7,879,300(Base Project Allocation - $5,500,000)(Land Allocation - $2,400)(Design and Contingencies - $2,376,900)(15) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Valley Green Road, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39143, Project ID 111515Project Allocation 9,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $7,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $2,250,000)(16) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Fisher's Lane and Tacony Creek, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 512 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39221, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 2,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(17) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Cresheim Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39137, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 2,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Amtrak and Conrail, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39101, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 179,910(Design and Contingencies - $179,910)(19) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Frankford Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39161, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 2,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Amtrak, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 513 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 39260, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 179,910(Design and Contingencies - $179,910)(21) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over CSX Railroad, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39257, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 810,338(Base Project Allocation - $729,304)(Design and Contingencies - $81,034)(22) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over SEPTA, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39110, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 119,940(Design and Contingencies - $119,940)(23) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over SEPTA, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39200, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 119,940(Design and Contingencies - $119,940)(24) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Penn Center Underground System, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39111, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,010)20260HB2644PN3625 - 514 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $19,990)(25) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Abandoned Conrail, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39125, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $80,010)(Design and Contingencies - $19,990)(26) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Abandoned Conrail, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39109, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $60,020)(Design and Contingencies - $39,980)(27) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Abandoned Conrail, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 39112, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 9,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,640,000)(Design and Contingencies - $960,000)(28) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Roosevelt Boulevard Extension (US-1), Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39124, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 2,350,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 515 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(29) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over CSX Railroad, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39242, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 2,350,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(30) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Wissahickon Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39250, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $40,030)(Design and Contingencies - $59,970)(31) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over Conrail Richmond Branch, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39100, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $40,030)(Design and Contingencies - $59,970)(32) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over SEPTA, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39150, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 516 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $40,030)(Design and Contingencies - $59,970)(33) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 over SEPTA Norristown Branch, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 39117, Project ID 118014Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $60,020)(Design and Contingencies - $39,980)(34) City of Philadelphia, SR 7301 (Navy Yard Lift Bridge) over Reserve Basin, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 69671, Project ID 81729Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(35) City of Philadelphia, Whitby Avenue over Cobbs Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39214Project Allocation 9,258,000(Base Project Allocation - $8,332,200)(Design and Contingencies - $925,800)(36) City of Philadelphia, Wyoming Avenue over Frankford Creek East, Bridge Removal, Bridge Key 39165Project Allocation 6,537,59920260HB2644PN3625 - 517 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,883,839)(Design and Contingencies - $653,760)(37) City of Philadelphia, Wyoming Avenue over Conrail, Bridge Removal, Bridge Key 39104Project Allocation 4,594,681(Base Project Allocation - $4,135,213)(Design and Contingencies - $459,468)(38) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2003 over Conrail Richmond Branch, City of Philadelphia, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 38829, Project ID 69663Project Allocation 2,813,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,400,000)(Land Allocation - $13,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(2) SR 4015 over SEPTA Chestnuthill West Branch, City 20260HB2644PN3625 - 518 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Philadelphia, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 39076, Project ID 82130Project Allocation 2,425,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(3) SR 676 over Vine Street Expressway, City of Philadelphia, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 38695, Project ID 119896Project Allocation 300,000(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(4) SR 676 over Vine Street Expressway, City of Philadelphia, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 38696, Project ID 119896Project Allocation 300,000(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(5) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 56. Pike County.20260HB2644PN3625 - 519 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Greene Township, Mozette Road over Mozette Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30035Project Allocation 1,691,168(Base Project Allocation - $1,522,051)(Design and Contingencies - $169,117)(2) Greene Township, Sawmill Road over Bridge Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30031Project Allocation 2,828,599(Base Project Allocation - $2,573,754)(Design and Contingencies - $254,845)(3) Lehman Township, T-301 Winona Falls Road (County Bridge 13) over Saw Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30047Project Allocation 6,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $6,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(4) Lehman and Middle Smithfield Townships, T-301 Winona Falls Road (County Bridge 19) over Bushkill Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30049, Project ID 103463Project Allocation 16,500,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 520 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $15,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,500,000)(5) Lehman Township, T-305 East Sugar Mountain Road (County Bridge 18) over Little Bushkill Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30050Project Allocation 5,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $500,000)(6) Lackawaxen Township, T-438 Herzog Road (Lackawaxen Township Bridge 4) over Balliard Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30038, Project ID 85807Project Allocation 2,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(7) Dingman Township, Township Road 425 (Klares Mill (County Bridge 20)) over Sawkill Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30070, Project ID 103484Project Allocation 3,300,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 521 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $3,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(8) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2001 over Hornbeck Creek, Delaware Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29963, Project ID 114547Project Allocation 3,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(2) SR 2001 over Dingmans Creek, Delaware Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29964, Project ID 114547Project Allocation 3,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,400,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(3) SR 2001 over Adams Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 522 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Delaware Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29965, Project ID 120400Project Allocation 1,446,000(Base Project Allocation - $796,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(4) SR 590 over West Falls Creek, Lackawaxen Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29925, Project ID 120399Project Allocation 364,600(Base Project Allocation - $234,600)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(5) SR 6 over Delaware River, Matamoras Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 29810, Project ID 121500Project Allocation 1,153,900(Base Project Allocation - $1,153,900)(6) SR 739 over Dingmans Creek, Delaware Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 29991, Project ID 120402Project Allocation 486,400(Base Project Allocation - $356,400)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(7) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 523 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 57. Potter County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Homer Township, SR 7211 over Big Moores Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30456, Project ID 118631Project Allocation 397,216(Base Project Allocation - $397,216)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1003 over Genesee Fork, Hector Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30291, Project ID 84092Project Allocation 1,187,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $402,000)(2) SR 1011 over Genesee River, Genesee Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 524 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 30321, Project ID 119925Project Allocation 520,000(Base Project Allocation - $520,000)(3) SR 144 over Cross Fork Creek, Stewardson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30198, Project ID 119922Project Allocation 2,645,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,825,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(4) SR 144 over Tributary of South Branch of Pine Creek, West Branch Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30210, Project ID 123158Project Allocation 920,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(5) SR 4001 over Branch of Sartwell Creek, Pleasant Valley Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30397, Project ID 119997Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 525 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(6) SR 4002 over Allegheny River, Coudersport Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30400, Project ID 123126Project Allocation 1,820,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(7) SR 4021 over Honeoye Creek, Sharon Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30429, Project ID 123154Project Allocation 1,520,000(Base Project Allocation - $700,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(8) SR 49 over Tributary of Allegheny River, Allegany Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30177, Project ID 123121Project Allocation 1,035,000(Base Project Allocation - $215,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $720,000)(9) SR 6 over Allegheny River, Coudersport Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30092, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 526 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119915Project Allocation 2,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(10) SR 607 over Tributary of West Branch of Freeman Run, Austin Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30250, Project ID 4922Project Allocation 602,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Design and Contingencies - $2,000)(11) SR 7221 over Tributary, Sweden Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 65225, Project ID 122186Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(12) SR 872 over East Fork of Sinnemahoning Creek, Wharton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30260, Project ID 84091Project Allocation 1,185,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $35,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 527 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 58. Schuylkill County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 3002 over Upper Little Swatara Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30801, Project ID 117330Project Allocation 405,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $5,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(2) SR 4031 over Shenandoah Creek, West Mahanoy Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30853, Project ID 11747820260HB2644PN3625 - 528 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 200,559(Base Project Allocation - $197,081)(Land Allocation - $3,478)(3) SR 443 over Mill Creek, Schuylkill Haven Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30746, Project ID 123694Project Allocation 467,500(Base Project Allocation - $315,000)(Land Allocation - $87,500)(Design and Contingencies - $65,000)(4) SR 443 over Tributary of Schuylkill River, Schuylkill Haven Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 30688, Project ID 123694Project Allocation 467,500(Base Project Allocation - $315,000)(Land Allocation - $87,500)(Design and Contingencies - $65,000)(5) SR 443 over Mill Creek, Pine Grove Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 30681, Project ID 109995Project Allocation 272,918(Land Allocation - $27,100)(Design and Contingencies - $245,818)(6) SR 54 over Norfolk Southern Railroad and Canal, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 529 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 8996, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,923(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,572)(Design and Contingencies - $20,351)(7) SR 54 over Swatara Creek, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30706, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,923(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,572)(Design and Contingencies - $20,351)(8) SR 54 over I-80, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9027, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,922(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,572)(Design and Contingencies - $20,350)(9) SR 54 over Tributary of Lost Creek, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30504, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,921(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,571)(Design and Contingencies - $20,350)20260HB2644PN3625 - 530 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) SR 54 over Sandspring Run, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 9024, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,921(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,571)(Design and Contingencies - $20,350)(11) SR 54 over Tributary of Pocono Creek, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 26873, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,921(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,571)(Design and Contingencies - $20,350)(12) SR 54 over Tributary of Schuylkill River, East Side Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 30688, Project ID 114329Project Allocation 428,921(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $8,571)(Design and Contingencies - $20,350)(13) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 531 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 59. Snyder County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1007 over Middle Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 31149, Project ID 114320Project Allocation 350,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(2) SR 1007 over Mahanoy Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 29234, Project ID 114320Project Allocation 350,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(3) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 532 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 60. Somerset County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Elk Lick Township, SR 7206 over Meadow Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31852, Project ID 123829Project Allocation 800,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(2) Shade Township, SR 7220 over Miller Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 47938, Project ID 123832Project Allocation 720,000(Base Project Allocation - $720,000)(3) Shade Township, SR 7220 over Oven Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 31889, Project ID 120382Project Allocation 228,750(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $7,500)(Design and Contingencies - $71,250)(4) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 533 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1002 over Tributary of Wells Creek, Somerset Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 31511, Project ID 120523Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(2) SR 1003 over Glade Creek, Stonycreek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31516, Project ID 120398Project Allocation 1,937,740(Base Project Allocation - $1,792,740)(Land Allocation - $45,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(3) SR 1003 over Wells Creek, Somerset Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31519, Project ID 120504Project Allocation 955,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $305,000)(4) SR 1021 over Miller Run, Shade Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 534 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 31557, Project ID 120458Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(5) SR 160 over Seese Run, Windber Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 31371, Project ID 120514Project Allocation 618,000(Base Project Allocation - $618,000)(6) SR 2004 over Elk Lick Creek, Summit Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31582, Project ID 120473Project Allocation 830,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $180,000)(7) SR 2004 over Big Spring Run, Elk Lick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31579, Project ID 120522Project Allocation 790,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(8) SR 2021 over Savage Run, Allegheny Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 535 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 31643, Project ID 120489Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(9) SR 219 over Piney Creek, Elk Lick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31374, Project ID 122612Project Allocation 1,095,000(Design and Contingencies - $1,095,000)(10) SR 219 over SR 2047, Brothers Valley Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55692, Project ID 123170Project Allocation 112,500(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(11) SR 219 over Swamp Creek, Summit Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55691, Project ID 123170Project Allocation 112,500(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(12) SR 219 over Swamp Creek, Summit Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55690, Project ID 12317020260HB2644PN3625 - 536 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 112,500(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(13) SR 219 over SR 2047, Fogletown Road, Crossroad School Road and Buffalo Creek, Brothers Valley Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 55693, Project ID 123170Project Allocation 112,500(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $62,500)(14) SR 3003 over Drake Run, Lower Turkeyfoot Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31676, Project ID 123314Project Allocation 490,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $440,000)(15) SR 3014 over Laurel Hill Creek, Middlecreek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31697, Project ID 120461Project Allocation 150,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(16) SR 3015 over Rice Run, Milford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31701, Project ID 12047820260HB2644PN3625 - 537 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(17) SR 4004 over Quemahoning Creek, Lincoln Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31735, Project ID 120462Project Allocation 430,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $380,000)(18) SR 4005 over Tributary of Coxes Creek, Somerset Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31739, Project ID 120475Project Allocation 770,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $120,000)(19) SR 4025 over Two Mile Run, Jenner Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31768, Project ID 120471Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(20) SR 403 over Oven Run, Shade Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 538 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 31448, Project ID 120521Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(21) SR 4033 over Roaring Run, Jenner Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31780, Project ID 120463Project Allocation 1,100,000(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,000,000)(22) SR 7217 over Roaring Fork, Ogle Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31880, Project ID 123736Project Allocation 480,000(Base Project Allocation - $480,000)(23) SR 7222 over Gladdens Run, Southampton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 31897, Project ID 120384Project Allocation 277,500(Base Project Allocation - $180,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $82,500)(24) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 539 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 61. Sullivan County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 220 over Birch Creek, Laporte Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 31998, Project ID 116129Project Allocation 1,366,000(Base Project Allocation - $850,000)(Design and Contingencies - $516,000)(2) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 62. Susquehanna County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 540 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) Carmault Road over Choconut Creek, Choconut Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 69081Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(2) SR 1018 over Branch of Snake Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 32433, Project ID 120413Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(3) SR 1018 over Tributary of Snake Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 32434, Project ID 120414Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 541 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) SR 171 over Denton Creek, Great Bend Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 32283, Project ID 89705Project Allocation 370,000(Base Project Allocation - $240,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(5) SR 2027 over East Branch of Tunkhannock Creek, Clifford Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32525, Project ID 120417Project Allocation 1,420,000(Base Project Allocation - $770,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(6) SR 2046 over Tunkhannock Creek, Gibson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32551, Project ID 112539Project Allocation 901,415(Base Project Allocation - $816,415)(Design and Contingencies - $85,000)(7) SR 2053 over Brewster Pond Creek, Bridgewater Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 32556, Project ID 120418Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 542 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) SR 247 over Delaware and Abandoned Hudson Railroad, Forest City Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32292, Project ID 120410Project Allocation 385,840(Base Project Allocation - $255,840)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(9) SR 29 over Jones Creek, Liberty Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32177, Project ID 120404Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(10) SR 3023 over Tributary of Elk Lake Stream, Rush Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32620, Project ID 120421Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(11) SR 374 over East Branch of Tunkhannock Creek, Clifford Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32330, Project ID 120412Project Allocation 1,396,476(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 543 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,266,476)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(12) SR 374 over Lowe Lake Outlet, Herrick Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 32334, Project ID 118120Project Allocation 798,233(Base Project Allocation - $715,000)(Land Allocation - $33,233)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(13) SR 4005 over Silver Lake Creek, Silver Lake Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 32653, Project ID 120422Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(14) SR 4022 over North Branch of Wyalusing Creek, Middletown Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 32674, Project ID 120423Project Allocation 612,400(Base Project Allocation - $482,400)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(15) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 544 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 63. Tioga County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Delmar Township, Greenway over Marsh Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 70519, Project ID 105066Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $900,000)(2) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1007 over Tributary of Elk Run, Sullivan Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 67981, Project ID 117832Project Allocation 1,089,889(Base Project Allocation - $589,389)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $440,500)(2) SR 15 over Slate Creek, Richmond Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 70718, Project ID 11515820260HB2644PN3625 - 545 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,400,000)(3) SR 2022 over Tioga River, Elk Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 33047, Project ID 117507Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $5,000)(4) SR 2022 over Zimmerman Creek, Elk Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 33106, Project ID 117507Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $5,000)(5) SR 2022 over Kettle Creek, Elk Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 33077, Project ID 117507Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $5,000)(6) SR 2022 over Cedar Run, Elk Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 33071, Project ID 117507Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 546 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $5,000)(7) SR 2022 over Babbs Creek, Elk Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 32909, Project ID 117507Project Allocation 125,000(Base Project Allocation - $120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $5,000)(8) SR 4002 over Tributary of Catlin Hollow Creek, Charleston Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 33133, Project ID 114170Project Allocation 1,070,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $420,000)(9) SR 4024 over Cummings Creek, Farmington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 33190, Project ID 117304Project Allocation 290,000(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(10) Township Road 387 over Tributary of Stony Fork Creek, Delmar Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 33252, Project ID 117361Project Allocation 215,25020260HB2644PN3625 - 547 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $5,250)(Design and Contingencies - $60,000)(11) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 64. Union County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Hartley Township, Township Road 319 over Penns Creek, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 33593, Project ID 113459Project Allocation 504,750(Base Project Allocation - $412,500)(Land Allocation - $8,250)(Design and Contingencies - $84,000)(2) East Buffalo Township, Turtle Creek Road over Turtle Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 33583, Project ID 120868Project Allocation 612,000(Base Project Allocation - $612,000)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge Preservation20260HB2644PN3625 - 548 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 65. Venango County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 208 over SR 80, Clinton Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 33726, Project ID 2232Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 549 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) SR 62 over Upper Two Mile Run, Sugarcreek Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 33687, Project ID 98544Project Allocation 7,740,000(Base Project Allocation - $7,500,000)(Design and Contingencies - $240,000)(3) SR 62 over Upper Two Mile Run, Sugarcreek Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 33687, Project ID 120814Project Allocation 2,650,392(Base Project Allocation - $2,400,392)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(4) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 66. Warren County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 550 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1011 over Tributary of Conewango Creek, Glade Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34113, Project ID 120832Project Allocation 1,145,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $180,000)(2) SR 1011 over Tributary of Hatch Run, Glade Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34114, Project ID 120832Project Allocation 1,145,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $15,000)(Design and Contingencies - $180,000)(3) SR 62 over Slater Run, Watson Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 34022, Project ID 120844Project Allocation 1,395,800(Base Project Allocation - $1,165,800)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(4) SR 62 over Wiltsie Run, Pine 20260HB2644PN3625 - 551 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Grove Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34042, Project ID 117804Project Allocation 110,000(Land Allocation - $10,000)(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(5) SR 666 over Two Mile Creek, Sheffield Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 34070, Project ID 120847Project Allocation 940,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Design and Contingencies - $140,000)(6) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 67. Washington County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Chartiers Township, SR 7207 over Tributary of Chartiers Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35263, Project ID 121006Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(2) Cross Creek and Independence 20260HB2644PN3625 - 552 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Townships, SR 7208 over Tributary of Cross Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35264, Project ID 117314Project Allocation 435,000(Base Project Allocation - $435,000)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1006 over Branch of Peters Creek, Nottingham Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34777, Project ID 90757Project Allocation 225,000(Base Project Allocation - $175,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(2) SR 1059 over Peters Creek, Peters and Nottingham Townships, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34857, Project ID 122504Project Allocation 780,000(Design and Contingencies - $780,000)(3) SR 19 over Pigeon Creek, Amwell Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 553 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 34967, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(4) SR 19 over SR 22, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34362, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(5) SR 19 over SR 22, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34365, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(6) SR 19 over SR 70, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34423, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(7) SR 19 over SR 70, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35073, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(8) SR 19 over SR 79, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 554 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 34540, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(9) SR 19 over SR 79, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18191, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(10) SR 19 over SR 519, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 46840, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(11) SR 19 over SR 519, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 46832, Project ID 121012Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $316,667)(12) SR 2005 over Smith Run, Amwell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34873, Project ID 116370Project Allocation 200,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(13) SR 2079 over Lilley Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 555 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 California Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35029, Project ID 116372Project Allocation 200,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(14) SR 221 over Tenmile Creek, Morris Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34647, Project ID 113601Project Allocation 2,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $900,000)(15) SR 221 over Tenmile Creek, Morris Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34647, Project ID 122508Project Allocation 2,911,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,290,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,321,000)(16) SR 3014 over Chartiers Creek, South Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35056, Project ID 11608420260HB2644PN3625 - 556 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 300,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(17) SR 3014 over Branch of Chartiers Creek, South Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35041, Project ID 116084Project Allocation 300,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(18) SR 331 over Branch of Brush Run, Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 34685, Project ID 90622Project Allocation 200,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(19) SR 4029 over Burgetts Fork, Smith Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35186, Project ID 116369Project Allocation 200,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(20) SR 4035 over Tributary of South Fork Cross Creek, Cross Creek Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 71008, Project ID 12278820260HB2644PN3625 - 557 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $40,000)(Design and Contingencies - $460,000)(21) SR 4045 over Chartiers Run, Mount Pleasant Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35208, Project ID 116608Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(22) SR 519 over Branch of Westland Run, Mount Pleasant Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 70955, Project ID 122895Project Allocation 2,700,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $850,000)(23) SR 79 over Branch of Chartiers Creek, South Strabane Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34569, Project ID 89131Project Allocation 330,000(Base Project Allocation - $330,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 558 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (24) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 68. Wayne County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1023 over Equinunk Creek, Manchester Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35635, Project ID 120424Project Allocation 659,400(Base Project Allocation - $529,400)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(2) SR 1025 over Tributary of North Branch of Calkins Creek, Damascus Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35638, Project ID 120426Project Allocation 1,650,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 559 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(3) SR 1031 over Hollister Creek, Damascus Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35645, Project ID 120427Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(4) SR 191 over Delaware River, Buckingham Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35488, Project ID 118295Project Allocation 2,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(5) SR 3028 over Middle Creek, Palmyra Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40407, Project ID 122296Project Allocation 314,800(Base Project Allocation - $224,000)(Design and Contingencies - $90,800)(6) SR 3034 over Middle Creek, South Canaan Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 35720, Project ID 12042920260HB2644PN3625 - 560 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 363,600(Base Project Allocation - $233,600)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(7) SR 371 over Delaware River, Damascus Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35534, Project ID 118294Project Allocation 2,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(8) SR 4001 over Van Auken Creek, Clinton Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35733, Project ID 115743Project Allocation 1,120,001(Base Project Allocation - $1,120,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1)(9) SR 4007 over Equinunk Creek, Manchester Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 35746, Project ID 120439Project Allocation 872,600(Base Project Allocation - $742,600)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(10) SR 4024 over Branch of Equinunk Creek, Buckingham Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 35786, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 561 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 120443Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(11) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 69. Westmoreland County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Sewickley Township, SR 7215 over Sewickley Creek, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36964, Project ID 121011Project Allocation 100,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(2) Mt. Pleasant Township, Township Road 486 (Shady Lane) over Welty Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36935Project Allocation 2,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,450,000)(3) Mt. Pleasant Township, Township Road 562 (Pheasant Run Road) over Boyer Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 562 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 36936Project Allocation 2,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,450,000)(4) Mt. Pleasant Township, Township Road 565 (Fairground Road) over Sewickley Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36937Project Allocation 2,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,450,000)(5) Mt. Pleasant Township, Township Road 775 (Boyer Road) over Boyer Run, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 36940Project Allocation 1,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(6) Mt. Pleasant Township, Township Road 822 (Welty Run Road) over Welty Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36942Project Allocation 2,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,450,000)(7) Mt. Pleasant Township, Township Road 823 (Klaka Road) over Welty Run, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 563 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 48524Project Allocation 1,750,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(8) Cook Township, Township Road 920 (Mansville Road) over Keefer Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36884Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $50,000)(9) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1005 over Branch of Shannon Run, St. Clair Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36367, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(2) SR 1009 over Bacon Run, Morgan Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 564 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 18203, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(3) SR 1019 over Breakneck Run, Bullskin Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16737, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(4) SR 1027 over Branch of Irish Run, Bullskin Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16745, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(5) SR 1061 over Froman Run, Union Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34858, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(6) SR 1061 over Beaver Run, Salem Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36453, Project ID 122507Project Allocation 2,690,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,290,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 565 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $1,100,000)(7) SR 119 over Bates Fork Creek, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 44414, Project ID 117558Project Allocation 375,000(Base Project Allocation - $375,000)(8) SR 119 over Jacks Run, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36101, Project ID 117558Project Allocation 375,000(Base Project Allocation - $375,000)(9) SR 119 over Little Tenmile Creek, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34336, Project ID 117558Project Allocation 375,000(Base Project Allocation - $375,000)(10) SR 119 over Ruff Creek, Amwell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 40011, Project ID 117558Project Allocation 375,000(Base Project Allocation - $375,000)(11) SR 2001 over Rudolph Run, Wayne Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18242, Project ID 11832420260HB2644PN3625 - 566 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(12) SR 2034 over Pike Run, West Pike Run Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 69541, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(13) SR 2037 over Branch of Fourmile Run, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36509, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(14) SR 2041 over Pike Run, West Pike Run Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35003, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(15) SR 231 over Branch of Templeton Fork, East Finley Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34667, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(16) SR 30 over SR 3077, Hempfield Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35929, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 567 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 119608Project Allocation 9,476,000(Base Project Allocation - $9,476,000)(17) SR 30 over Branch of Tubmill Creek, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36375, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(18) SR 30 over Branch of Brush Creek, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36704, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(19) SR 30 over Branch of Poke Run, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36199, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(20) SR 30 over Township Road 532, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34457, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(21) SR 30 over Branch of Keffer Run, Cook Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 568 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 36243, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(22) SR 30 over Branch of Pucketa Creek, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36200, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(23) SR 30 over Mill Creek, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35967, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(24) SR 30 over Cats Creek, Cook Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16646, Project ID 120968Project Allocation 500,000(Base Project Allocation - $500,000)(25) SR 3008 over Jacobs Creek, Nicholson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16898, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(26) SR 3009 over Branch of Toms Run, Gilmore Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 569 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Restoration, Bridge Key 18384, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(27) SR 3009 over Branch of Buffalo Creek, Buffalo Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 35048, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(28) SR 3009 over Speers Fun, Rostraver Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36539, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(29) SR 3010 over Branch of Sewickley Creek, South Huntingdon Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36542, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(30) SR 3011 over Branch of Hargus Creek, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18392, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 570 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (31) SR 3013 over Branch of Pursley Creek, Center Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18412, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(32) SR 3014 over Sewickley Creek, Hempfield Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36552, Project ID 120056Project Allocation 100,000(Design and Contingencies - $100,000)(33) SR 3018 over Branch of Blacks Creek, Aleppo Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 18419, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(34) SR 3041 over Sewickley Creek, Sewickley Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36611, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(35) SR 3063 over Andrews Run, Hempfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36627, Project ID 116470Project Allocation 205,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 571 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(Land Allocation - $55,000)(36) SR 331 over Branch of Brush Run, Independence Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 34681, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(37) SR 4001 over Rush Run, Luzerne Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16954, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(38) SR 4001 over Rush Run, Luzerne Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 16955, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(39) SR 4038 over Youghiogheny River, Perry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 17042, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(40) SR 4041 over Haymakers Run, Penn Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 36743, Project ID 11255420260HB2644PN3625 - 572 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 525,000(Base Project Allocation - $525,000)(41) SR 4089 over Branch of Chartiers Run, Allegheny Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36772, Project ID 118324Project Allocation 150,000(Base Project Allocation - $150,000)(42) SR 4091 over Stream to Kiskiminetas River, Allegheny Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36773, Project ID 112902Project Allocation 3,200,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $900,000)(43) SR 56 over Kiski and Norfolk Southern Railroad and SR 2054, East Vandergrift Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 36017, Project ID 112391Project Allocation 1,300,911(Base Project Allocation - $1,300,911)(44) SR 8007 over Branch of Sewickley Creek, New Stanton Borough, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 573 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 37032, Project ID 120578Project Allocation 2,500,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(45) SR 819 over Branch of Shupe Run, Mount Pleasant Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 56700, Project ID 120576Project Allocation 2,487,500(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $900,000)(Design and Contingencies - $87,500)(46) SR 906 over Tributary of Monongahela River, City of Monessen, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36282, Project ID 91136Project Allocation 2,700,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $900,000)(47) SR 982 over Sawmill Run, Youngstown Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 36335, Project ID 105837Project Allocation 1,400,000(Land Allocation - $500,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 574 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $900,000)(48) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 70. Wyoming County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 2002 over Branch of Marsh Creek, Northmoreland Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37226, Project ID 120445Project Allocation 454,000(Base Project Allocation - $324,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(2) SR 29 over Tributary of Meshoppen Creek, Lemon Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37115, Project ID 11726720260HB2644PN3625 - 575 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,950,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Design and Contingencies - $950,000)(3) SR 3001 over SR 6, Laceyville Borough, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37278, Project ID 120446Project Allocation 515,000(Base Project Allocation - $385,000)(Design and Contingencies - $130,000)(4) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 71. York County.(a) Local BridgesLocal State(1) Windsor Township, Circle Drive over Pine Run, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 51645Project Allocation 328,000(Base Project Allocation - $283,000)(Design and Contingencies - $45,000)(2) Fawn Township, SR 7209 over South Branch of Muddy Creek, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 38122, Project ID 11701120260HB2644PN3625 - 576 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 110,000(Land Allocation - $110,000)(3) Various Municipalities, Various Local Bridges over Various Routes, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)(b) State Bridges(1) SR 1003 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches, Fairview Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37647, Project ID 100205Project Allocation 2,568,576(Base Project Allocation - $2,143,576)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $375,000)(2) SR 1004 over Tributary of Conewago Creek, East Manchester Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37650, Project ID 100075Project Allocation 770,345(Base Project Allocation - $120,345)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(3) SR 1008 over Codorus Creek, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 577 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Hellam Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37652, Project ID 100159Project Allocation 150,000(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(4) SR 1012 over Tributary of Codorus Creek, Manchester Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37660, Project ID 78884Project Allocation 780,308(Base Project Allocation - $120,308)(Land Allocation - $60,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(5) SR 1019 over Hartman Run, East Manchester Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37672, Project ID 117717Project Allocation 1,058,600(Base Project Allocation - $408,600)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(6) SR 1021 over Tributary of Little Conewago Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37680, Project ID 100077Project Allocation 1,573,387(Base Project Allocation - $923,387)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 578 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(7) SR 1041 over SR 30, Hellam Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37378, Project ID 100150Project Allocation 1,850,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(8) SR 114 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches Creek, Fairview Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37474, Project ID 100177Project Allocation 900,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(9) SR 116 over Tributary of Codorus Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37475, Project ID 100179Project Allocation 787,140(Base Project Allocation - $137,140)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(10) SR 124 over Branch of Cabin Creek, Lower Windsor Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37490, Project ID 10018020260HB2644PN3625 - 579 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 995,704(Base Project Allocation - $345,704)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(11) SR 194 over Tributary of Bermudian Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37521, Project ID 87519Project Allocation 1,959,845(Base Project Allocation - $1,217,426)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $642,419)(12) SR 194 over Tributary of Bermudian Creek, Franklin Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37522, Project ID 87598Project Allocation 1,851,523(Base Project Allocation - $1,036,523)(Land Allocation - $115,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(13) SR 194 over North Branch of Bermudian Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37520, Project ID 100182Project Allocation 700,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 580 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $50,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(14) SR 2012 over Tributary of Bull Run, Lower Windsor Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37704, Project ID 100081Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(15) SR 2013 over Kreutz Creek, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37708, Project ID 117654Project Allocation 2,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Design and Contingencies - $400,000)(16) SR 2018 over Otter Creek, Chanceford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37714, Project ID 117655Project Allocation 299,097(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $199,097)(17) SR 2027 over Branch of Cabin Creek, Lower Windsor Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 581 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 37723, Project ID 100164Project Allocation 715,367(Base Project Allocation - $65,367)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(18) SR 2028 over Branch of Muddy Creek, Peach Bottom Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37724, Project ID 100085Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(19) SR 2033 over Cabin Creek, Lower Windsor Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37735, Project ID 100168Project Allocation 1,832,731(Base Project Allocation - $1,182,731)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(20) SR 2038 over Little Muddy Creek, East Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 68656, Project ID 63121Project Allocation 303,354(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $283,354)(21) SR 2038 over Little Muddy 20260HB2644PN3625 - 582 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, East Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37737, Project ID 63121Project Allocation 303,354(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $283,354)(22) SR 2039 over Otter Creek, Chanceford Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37739, Project ID 100170Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(23) SR 2040 over Toms Run, Lower Chanceford Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37740, Project ID 100172Project Allocation 1,674,698(Base Project Allocation - $1,024,698)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(24) SR 2043 over Michael Run, Peach Bottom Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37745, Project ID 100086Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 583 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(25) SR 2044 over Tributary of South Branch of Muddy Creek, East Hopewell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37748, Project ID 100176Project Allocation 1,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $800,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(26) SR 2047 over Fishing Creek, Peach Bottom Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37753, Project ID 100088Project Allocation 749,961(Base Project Allocation - $99,961)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(27) SR 2048 over Branch of Muddy Creek, Chanceford Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37754, Project ID 78901Project Allocation 995,726(Base Project Allocation - $638,198)(Land Allocation - $130,000)(Design and Contingencies - $227,528)(28) SR 2048 over Branch of Muddy Creek, Chanceford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 68509, Project ID 7890120260HB2644PN3625 - 584 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 995,726(Base Project Allocation - $638,198)(Land Allocation - $130,000)(Design and Contingencies - $227,528)(29) SR 2053 over Neill Run, Fawn Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37762, Project ID 87552Project Allocation 1,646,136(Base Project Allocation - $1,271,136)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $350,000)(30) SR 2067 over Branch of Rambo Run, East Hopewell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37776, Project ID 100091Project Allocation 883,431(Base Project Allocation - $208,431)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(31) SR 2067 over Rambo Run, East Hopewell Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37777, Project ID 100094Project Allocation 707,879(Base Project Allocation - $57,879)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(32) SR 2073 over Toms Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 585 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Chanceford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37791, Project ID 92585Project Allocation 525,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(33) SR 2073 over Toms Run, Chanceford Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 92585, Project ID 92585Project Allocation 525,000(Base Project Allocation - $200,000)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(34) SR 2085 over Barshinger Creek, York Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37808, Project ID 117716Project Allocation 2,450,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $150,000)(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(35) SR 2087 over East Branch of Codorus Creek, Springfield Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37810, Project ID 107325Project Allocation 350,00020260HB2644PN3625 - 586 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(36) SR 2095 over Tributary of East Branch of Codorus Creek, North Hopewell Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37819, Project ID 112496Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(37) SR 216 over South Branch of Codorus Creek, Glen Rock Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37542, Project ID 117728Project Allocation 2,118,530(Base Project Allocation - $1,468,530)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(38) SR 216 over Lake Marburg, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37532, Project ID 100153Project Allocation 1,900,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,250,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 587 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(39) SR 216 over Tributary of Codorus Creek, Manheim Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37535, Project ID 100040Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(40) SR 216 over Seaks Run, Springfield Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37547, Project ID 100045Project Allocation 1,600,000(Base Project Allocation - $950,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(41) SR 216 over Seaks Run, Springfield Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37549, Project ID 91354Project Allocation 1,065,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $65,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(42) SR 216 over Tributary of Codorus Creek, Codorus Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37538, Project ID 20260HB2644PN3625 - 588 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 100043Project Allocation 726,736(Base Project Allocation - $76,736)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(43) SR 216 over South Branch of Codorus Creek, Glen Rock Borough, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37542, Project ID 100185Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(44) SR 234 over Honey Run, West Manchester Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37553, Project ID 100187Project Allocation 750,000(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(45) SR 24 over Norfolk Southern Railroad, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37347, Project ID 81069Project Allocation 2,580,851(Base Project Allocation - $1,930,851)(Land Allocation - $50,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 589 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(46) SR 24 over Codorus Creek, East Manchester Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37349, Project ID 73962Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $16,667)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(47) SR 24 over Tributary of Codorus Creek, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37348, Project ID 73962Project Allocation 316,667(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $16,667)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(48) SR 24 over Mill Race to Codorus Creek, East Manchester Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37350, Project ID 73962Project Allocation 316,666(Base Project Allocation - $100,000)(Land Allocation - $16,666)(Design and Contingencies - $200,000)(49) SR 30 over SR 2005 (Memory Lane), Springettsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 590 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bridge Key 37372, Project ID 116744Project Allocation 10,887,559(Base Project Allocation - $10,537,559)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(50) SR 30 over SR 30, West Manchester Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37357, Project ID 116745Project Allocation 4,997,555(Base Project Allocation - $4,347,555)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(51) SR 30 over Township Road 764 (Pleasant Acres Road), Springettsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37377, Project ID 116754Project Allocation 3,999,010(Base Project Allocation - $3,649,010)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(52) SR 30 over Township Road 764 (Pleasant Acres Road), Springettsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 591 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 37376, Project ID 116750Project Allocation 3,230,460(Base Project Allocation - $2,880,460)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(53) SR 30 over SR 24, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37374, Project ID 116748Project Allocation 3,219,400(Base Project Allocation - $3,169,400)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(54) SR 30 over SR 1014, Hellam Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37382, Project ID 116751Project Allocation 2,783,575(Base Project Allocation - $2,458,575)(Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(55) SR 30 over Kreutz Creek, Hellam Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37381, Project ID 116751Project Allocation 2,783,575(Base Project Allocation - $2,458,575)20260HB2644PN3625 - 592 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Land Allocation - $25,000)(Design and Contingencies - $300,000)(56) SR 30 over Tributary of Beaver Creek, Paradise Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37351, Project ID 100014Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(57) SR 30 over Tributary of Beaver Creek, Paradise Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37352, Project ID 100038Project Allocation 766,494(Base Project Allocation - $116,494)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(58) SR 3001 over Tylers Run, Spring Garden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37828, Project ID 97195Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 593 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (59) SR 3006 over South Branch of Codorus Creek, Shrewsbury Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37832, Project ID 87599Project Allocation 1,040,544(Base Project Allocation - $315,544)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(60) SR 3011 over Centerville Creek, Shrewsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37836, Project ID 20970Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(61) SR 3012 over Pierceville Run, Codorus Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37838, Project ID 21169Project Allocation 1,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $750,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(62) SR 3016 over South Branch of Codorus Creek, Springfield Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 20260HB2644PN3625 - 594 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 37842, Project ID 78967Project Allocation 2,556,200(Base Project Allocation - $1,906,200)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(63) SR 3022 over Trout Run, Shrewsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37849, Project ID 117666Project Allocation 650,000(Design and Contingencies - $650,000)(64) SR 3029 over Poor House Run, Spring Garden Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37851, Project ID 100128Project Allocation 1,800,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,150,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(65) SR 3029 over Mill Creek, Spring Garden Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37852, Project ID 100209Project Allocation 824,639(Base Project Allocation - $174,639)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(66) SR 3035 over Long Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 595 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Manheim Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37854, Project ID 92584Project Allocation 1,250,000(Base Project Allocation - $600,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(67) SR 3047 over Oil Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37886, Project ID 20972Project Allocation 1,668,659(Base Project Allocation - $1,018,659)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(68) SR 3047 over Tributary of Oil Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37887, Project ID 91368Project Allocation 727,187(Base Project Allocation - $77,187)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(69) SR 3047 over Bunch Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37888, Project ID 91369Project Allocation 708,91420260HB2644PN3625 - 596 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $58,914)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(70) SR 3047 over North Branch of Codorus Creek, Heidelberg Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37884, Project ID 20973Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(71) SR 3054 over Hokes Run, City of York, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37896, Project ID 100131Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(72) SR 3056 over Tyler Run, York Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37901, Project ID 91372Project Allocation 2,183,481(Base Project Allocation - $1,533,481)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(73) SR 3058 over Gunpowder Falls 20260HB2644PN3625 - 597 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Creek, Manheim Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37903, Project ID 87523Project Allocation 2,555,384(Base Project Allocation - $1,495,984)(Land Allocation - $67,400)(Design and Contingencies - $992,000)(74) SR 3060 over Tributary of Gun Powder Falls Creek, Manheim Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37907, Project ID 100133Project Allocation 781,132(Base Project Allocation - $131,132)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(75) SR 3061 over Codorus Creek, West Manchester Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37909, Project ID 100135Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(76) SR 3073 over Plum Creek, Penn Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37928, Project ID 91373Project Allocation 1,546,50820260HB2644PN3625 - 598 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $246,508)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $1,200,000)(77) SR 3092 over Bunches Creek, Jackson Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37938, Project ID 90631Project Allocation 1,722,832(Base Project Allocation - $1,200,000)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $502,832)(78) SR 382 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches Creek, Fairview Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37573, Project ID 117673Project Allocation 600,000(Base Project Allocation - $300,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(79) SR 392 over Big Spring Run, Newberry Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37579, Project ID 120706Project Allocation 2,400,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,750,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)20260HB2644PN3625 - 599 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(80) SR 4001 over Willis Run, City of York, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37944, Project ID 100215Project Allocation 2,150,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,500,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(81) SR 4002 over Tributary of Conewago Creek, Dover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37955, Project ID 78986Project Allocation 3,175,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,500,000)(Land Allocation - $75,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(82) SR 4006 over Tributary of Conewago Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37965, Project ID 100137Project Allocation 1,622,854(Base Project Allocation - $972,854)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(83) SR 4008 over Davidsburg Run, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 600 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Dover Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37968, Project ID 100217Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(84) SR 4011 over Little Conewago Creek, Conewago Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37973, Project ID 100139Project Allocation 1,410,565(Base Project Allocation - $760,565)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(85) SR 4012 over North Branch of Bermudian Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37975, Project ID 117753Project Allocation 2,563,742(Base Project Allocation - $2,413,742)(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(86) SR 4015 over Davidsburg Run, Dover Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37980, Project ID 78989Project Allocation 815,45720260HB2644PN3625 - 601 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Base Project Allocation - $556,631)(Land Allocation - $20,000)(Design and Contingencies - $238,826)(87) SR 4031 over Tributary of Yellow Breeches Creek, Fairview Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 38003, Project ID 117683Project Allocation 150,000(Design and Contingencies - $150,000)(88) SR 4043 over North Branch of Bermudian Creek, Washington Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 38021, Project ID 100145Project Allocation 1,050,000(Base Project Allocation - $400,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(89) SR 4045 over Dogwood Run, Carroll Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 38022, Project ID 100146Project Allocation 1,457,733(Base Project Allocation - $1,432,633)(Land Allocation - $25,100)(90) SR 425 over Orson Run, Lower Chanceford Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37586, 20260HB2644PN3625 - 602 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project ID 100047Project Allocation 731,234(Base Project Allocation - $81,234)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(91) SR 462 over Tributary of Kreutz Creek, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37595, Project ID 100194Project Allocation 2,825,000(Base Project Allocation - $2,000,000)(Land Allocation - $125,000)(Design and Contingencies - $700,000)(92) SR 462 over Kreutz Creek, Hellam Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37598, Project ID 100196Project Allocation 2,021,735(Base Project Allocation - $1,796,735)(Design and Contingencies - $225,000)(93) SR 462 over Tributary of Codorus Creek, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37593, Project ID 100189Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 603 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(94) SR 462 over Tributary of Kreutz Creek, Springettsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37594, Project ID 100192Project Allocation 1,650,000(Base Project Allocation - $1,000,000)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(95) SR 462 over Tributary of Kreutz Creek, Hellam Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37601, Project ID 100197Project Allocation 836,084(Base Project Allocation - $186,084)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(96) SR 462 over Tributary of Kreutz Creek, Hellam Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37602, Project ID 100200Project Allocation 836,084(Base Project Allocation - $186,084)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(97) SR 616 over Tributary of 20260HB2644PN3625 - 604 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 South Branch of Codorus Creek, Shrewsbury Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37604, Project ID 100157Project Allocation 1,752,094(Base Project Allocation - $1,102,094)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(98) SR 616 over South Branch of Codorus Creek, Shrewsbury Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37606, Project ID 87696Project Allocation 824,378(Base Project Allocation - $174,378)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(99) SR 616 over Krebs Creek, Codorus Township, Bridge Replacement, Bridge Key 37609, Project ID 117730Project Allocation 550,000(Design and Contingencies - $550,000)(100) SR 624 over Cabin Creek, Lower Windsor Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37620, Project ID 117653Project Allocation 3,685,000(Base Project Allocation - 20260HB2644PN3625 - 605 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $3,335,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $250,000)(101) SR 624 over Fishing Creek, Lower Windsor Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37616, Project ID 100201Project Allocation 2,169,643(Base Project Allocation - $1,519,643)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(102) SR 624 over Kreutz Creek, Wrightsville Borough, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37626, Project ID 81040Project Allocation 950,000(Base Project Allocation - $250,000)(Land Allocation - $100,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(103) SR 74 over Dogwood Run, Carroll Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37403, Project ID 100203Project Allocation 853,168(Base Project Allocation - $203,168)(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(104) SR 74 over Wolf Run, Washington Township, Bridge 20260HB2644PN3625 - 606 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Replacement, Bridge Key 37399, Project ID 117739Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(105) SR 83 over SR 2002 (Springwood Road), York Township, Bridge Rehabilitation, Bridge Key 37431, Project ID 116480Project Allocation 2,769,400(Base Project Allocation - $2,202,053)(Land Allocation - $30,000)(Design and Contingencies - $537,347)(106) SR 83 over Conewago Creek, Newberry Township, Bridge Restoration, Bridge Key 37457, Project ID 112297Project Allocation 650,000(Land Allocation - $50,000)(Design and Contingencies - $600,000)(107) Various State Bridges over Various Routes, Various Municipalities, Bridge PreservationProject Allocation 5,000,000(Base Project Allocation - $5,000,000)Section 72. Limitation on expenditure of funds.20260HB2644PN3625 - 607 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following shall apply:(1) Any money derived from the incurring of debt shall be used solely for effecting the rehabilitation, replacement or removal of bridges located on State highways. All other bridge rehabilitation, replacement or removal shall be financed from current revenue.(2) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the projects itemized in the act of December 8, 1982 (P.L.848, No.235), known as the Highway-Railroad and Highway Bridge Capital Budget Act for 1982-1983, may be financed from current revenue.Section 73. Debt authorization.The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time, in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum of $4,766,821,816 as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the State projects specifically itemized in this act.Section 74. Issue of bonds.The indebtedness authorized in this act shall be incurred from time to time and shall be evidenced by one or more series of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth in such aggregate principal amount for each series as the Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer shall determine, but the latest stated maturity date shall not exceed 30 years from the date of the bond first issued for each series.Section 75. Estimated useful life of projects.The General Assembly states the estimated useful life of the 20260HB2644PN3625 - 608 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects itemized in this act is 30 years.Section 76. Appropriation.The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the department in the maximum amount of $3,804,519,537 to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial costs of the State projects specifically itemized in this act. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay out to the department the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.Section 77. Federal funds.In addition to those funds appropriated in section 76, all money received from the Federal Government for the public improvement projects specifically itemized in this act are also hereby appropriated for those projects.Section 78. Allocation of funds.(a) General rule.--Whenever the department or the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources determines that the full estimated financial costs of the projects itemized in this act are not necessary for the proper design, acquisition or construction of such projects, the excess funds no longer required may be allocated by the department or the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources to increase the estimated costs of any one or more of the projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.(b) Reimbursement of municipal expenditures.--Money raised or expended by municipalities after the effective date of this act, in anticipation of receipt of funds authorized for projects itemized by this act, may be reimbursable to those municipalities.20260HB2644PN3625 - 609 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 79. Policy on jobs and materials.(a) Jobs.--It is the declared policy of the Commonwealth that the construction projects authorized in this act be used, to the greatest extent possible, to provide for the creation of jobs and the rehiring of the unemployed in this Commonwealth. In order to reach this goal, firms with Commonwealth-based facilities shall be actively solicited to make bids on contracts to furnish products and materials, including, but not limited to, steel and steel products, to be used in these projects.(b) Materials.--Every contract document entered into to undertake a project contained in this act shall provide that any steel or other products to be used or supplied in the performance of this contract be required to be manufactured by plants in the United States unless the secretary determines, on a contract-by-contract basis, that certain required products are not produced in the United States in sufficient quantities to meet the requirements of the contract. Such a determination and the reasons therefor shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. Decisions made under this subsection shall not be inconsistent with the general provisions of the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.(c) Minorities and women.--It is also the declared policy of the Commonwealth to require and encourage substantial participation by minorities and women in the construction projects authorized by this act.Section 80. Payment of capital debt service.The repayment of any debt incurred pursuant to this act shall be made from the account and such repayment shall have first claim on the revenues of the account.Section 81. Authorization and debt cumulation.20260HB2644PN3625 - 610 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The additional authorization and debt allowance provided for in this act shall be added to the total authorizations and debt incurred pursuant to the act of December 8, 1982 (P.L.848, No.235), known as the Highway-Railroad and Highway Bridge Capital Budget Act for 1982-1983, as amended and supplemented.Section 82. Editorial changes.In editing and preparing this act for printing following the final enactment, the Legislative Reference Bureau shall insert or revise letters or numbers for projects where the letters or numbers are missing or require revision. The bureau shall also revise the total monetary amounts for the total authorization, debt authorization, appropriations and departmental totals as necessary to agree with the total monetary amounts of the projects.Section 83. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2644PN3625 - 611 - 12345678910111213141516